Authors
"Average Joe" Barlow
Number of Reviews
93

Title
Review for Notting Hill (1999)
        Anna Scott (Julia Roberts) is the world's most beloved
actress.  While in London to promote her latest film, she
wanders
into a dilapidated bookstore run by Will Thacker (Hugh Grant),
the
even more dilapidated owner.  Anna is charmed by Will's amiable
personality, and the fact that he treats her like a person as
opposed to a celebrity.  A second accidental meeting later on
sets the amour wheels in motion... as well as the inevitable
complications stemming from their vastly different backgrounds.
        There's nothing new about the structure of "Notting
Hill";
the "rich girl falls for poor boy" scenario is
well-established,
having been employed in movies ranging from "Titanic" to
Disney's
"Lady and the Tramp," and the delights of the film certainly
owe
nothing to the formulaic way in which the story devlops.
Still,
the movie does offer some pleasant surprises along its journey
to
Happily Ever After-ville.  The biggest one: the performances.
Although the lead actors are fine (and Hugh Grant is
significantly
more than that), the show is stolen by the strong supporting
cast,
which include a wheelchair-bound woman that Will has always
loved...
despite the fact that she's married to his best friend.  Will's
little sister is pleasantly freaky, stuck working in London's
worst record store to make ends meet.  Comic relief is provided
by Will's sleezy roommate Spike (Rhys Ifans), the Jar Jar Binks
of the story.  I was quite frankly more interested in learning
more about these folks than I was in seeing the outcome of the
tale itself, primarily because they were all so interesting and
unusual.
        Visual grace is not Roger Michell's strong point.  Most
of the time he chooses to simply point the camera at his cast
and turn it on, allowing the sweet chemistry between his two
lead
actors and the clever screenplay from Richard Curtis to carry
the
momentum.   Much has been made of the fact that the movie was
actually shot in the Notting Hill region of London, but we
never
get to see very much of it, and that's a little disappointing.
Too much of the film plays like a montage of talking heads:
there's a lot of dialogue, and not much else.  There are,
however,
two amazing shots that I must make mention of.  The first is
the
impressive pullback of Anna and Will sitting alone on a park
bench,
enjoying a rare moment of privacy together.  Through the
pullback,
the camera not only allows them a much-deserved moment of
solitude,
but also foreshadows a later discussion on perspective, a scene
upon which the whole movie hinges.  There's also a great
weather
montage: Michell shows the passage of several months by having
Will walk down the street, through bright sunlight, into rain,
then snow, and back into the sunlight again, all in one
continuous shot, while Bill Withers' "Ain't No Sunshine" plays
softly in the background.
        "Notting Hill" isn't really a film about relationships
so much as the concept of 'celebrity.'  We're given a glimpse
into
the claustrophobic life of a big-name movie star, watching as
her
personal life is basically irradicated before our very eyes.
It's
undeniably interesting... but surprisingly, it's not really
involving on an emotional level.  Although Grant and Roberts
look
great together, I had trouble believing their relationship.
The
script flings them together much too quickly-- the first kiss
occurs after they've been together only a handful of minutes.
Nor
did I understand why Grant's character, so charming and
intelligent,
was utterly smitten with a woman who treats him so horribly.
It's
probably not a good sign when, while watching a romantic
comedy,
you're hoping the guy will dump the girl and find someone who
actually deserves his affections.  I can understand the lure
and
appeal of Hollywood glitz and fairy dust, but they should not
be
a key factor in deciding whether or not to pursue a
relationship
with a person.
        There are some problems with the film--and significant
ones--
but in the end I was won over by the movie's utter sweetness
and
great comedy.  I don't often laugh out loud at the theater, but
"Notting Hill" got me on at least five occasions, and had the
rest of the audience rolling in the aisles as well.  It's that
beloved rarity: a romantic comedy in which the humor is
actually
given the same amount of attention as the love story.  The
touching
but hilarious scene in which Will poses as a reporter for
"Horse and
Hound" magazine simply so he can be near his beloved shows both
the absurdity of love, and the lengths to which people will go
to
keep it.  The entire movie is full of gems like this.
        "Notting Hill" is a paint-by-numbers story, completely
predictable from start to finish... but since the ride was an
entertaining one, I have absolutely no problem with that.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to: joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com
--== Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/ ==--
---Share what you know. Learn what you don't.---

Title
Review for Babe: Pig in the City (1998)
        As a critic, "Babe: Pig in the City" paints me into a
difficult corner: on one hand, I was charmed by the sheer visual
delights which awaited me; on the other, I was mortified that
Hollywood actually considers this a "family" film.  Parents who
are expecting a light-hearted distraction for little Junior had best
be warned: young children have no business anywhere near this
movie.  The simple fact that "Babe: Pig in the City" (which for
the sake of brevity will henceforth be referred to as "Babe II")
received a G rating is a disconcerting affirmation of just how far
out of touch the MPAA is with its own rating system.
        "Babe II" is a contradiction in terms, a disquieting but
frequently enchanting blend of humor, warmth and darkness that
has the misfortune of being marketed as children's entertainment.
It's hard to review a film like this, as two of the factors I use to
critique movies are: 'How entertained was I?' and 'How successful
is the movie in achieving its goals?'  With "Babe II," there's a
substantial conflict in the answers to these questions: while I was
admittedly entertained, I was also shocked by the story's surprisingly
dark tone.  It's as if director George Miller is trying to mimic the
style of Tim Burton's "Batman," but replaces the grim, human
characters with funny, colorful animals who talk and sing.  Talk
about surreal!
        The bleak overtones start early, with kindly farmer Arthur
Hoggett (James Cromwell) suffering a severe accident for which his
beloved pet pig Babe (voiced by Elizabeth Daily) is inadvertently
responsible.  Unable to work, Hoggett stands in danger of losing his
farm to the bank.  His wife Esme (Magda Szubanski) takes matters
into her own hands, and heads to a county fair to give a demonstration
of Babe's sheep-herding skills (depicted in the first film), an event
which will help raise the money needed for the mortgage payment.  Fate
conspires against them, however, and through no fault of their own
they miss their connecting flight, leaving them with a multiple-day
layover in a strange city.
        Eventually finding a hotel that will allow pets, Mrs. Hoggett
thinks the worst of her trip is over.  She is mistaken.  Babe is
essentially pig-napped by Fugly Floom (Mickey Rooney), a clown who
uses chimpanzees as part of his act.  Babe is eager to participate,
mistakenly believing that his show-business antics are helping the
farm: "I'm a pig on a mission," he explains proudly when the other
animals question him.  The hotel has its own problems, however: the
dozens of animals who live there are a clear violation of city health
laws, and the hotel operates much like the Underground Railroad, with
animals sheltered in secrecy, out of sight of the villainous law
enforcement agencies.
        This tone of shadow may not sit well with many viewers,
particularly those who liked the upbeat innocence of the first film.
"Babe II" is to "Babe" what "The Empire Strikes Back" was to
"A New Hope"; a mature, thoughtful work, covered by a layer of
darkness.  Be aware: animals and human alike are severely injured
(and nearly die) on at least three occasions in the film.  A chase
sequence between Babe and a mob of angry dogs could potentially
horrify young children.  And a scene in which the hotel is raided
by animal catchers is so bleak that I was reminded of the liquidation
of the Ghetto, from "Schindler's List."  While I did not personally
object to the tone, I remain unsure who "Babe II" is supposed to
appeal to: families who enjoyed the first film?  No, not really.
Fans of film noir?  No, because they're unlikely to see a movie
starring talking animals.
        One thing for which Miller cannot be faulted is a lack of
vision: the city in "Babe II" looks great, recalling the looming
skyscrapers and slippery shadows that marked "The Crow,"
"Dark City," and the aforementioned "Batman."  Comparisons
with Fritz Lang's "Metropolis" are unavoidable, and the film beats
viewers to the punch by borrowing the name of Lang's wonderous city
(the film's working title was "Babe in Metropolis").  As envisioned
by Miller, Metropolis is a city unencumbered by both time and space:
The Statue of Liberty is visible on the horizon, along with the Eiffel
Tower, the Hollywood sign, the canals of Venice, and other instantly
recognizable landmarks from around the world.  Modern cars share the
road with Model-T Fords, and we understand the point: Metropolis
exists anywhere and everywhere.
        Fans of the original "Babe" may be a little disappointed by
the fact that Babe himself isn't really the focus of this outing;
although the plucky little pig gets plenty of screen time, the
emphasis is more on the interaction of the animals, all of whom work
together to solve the various dilemmas, rather than on Babe himself.
Most of the important resolutions occur despite, rather than because
of, his presence here.  That's not to say that Babe is irrelevant to
the story; he functions as a sort of lighthouse through the dark
events, dispensing advice and wisdom.  (A mean stray dog explains, "I
have a professional obligation to be malicious."  Babe helpfully
suggests, "Maybe you should change professions.")
        But if Babe is content to stay in the background for much of
the time, the story doesn't really suffer.  Dozens of animals dot the
landscape of Metropolis, all of whom are fun and interesting in their
own right (watch for the singing cat choir!).  My favorite character
by far was a Godfather-like orangatan named Thelonius (voiced by James
Cosmo), who possesses a sad weariness that suits his character
perfectly.  You can actually see the regret in his eyes as certain
events unfurl, giving him a better range of expression than some of
the human characters.  He's a shoo-in for "Best Supporting Chimp."
        "Babe II" isn't a bad film by any stretch of the word: I found
it visually stunning and a great deal of fun; nonetheless, I think it
will distress its intended audience: young children are going to be
confused or scared (if not both) by what they discover in this
particular city.  My relatively low rating of two and a half stars is
an attempt at compromise: I liked the film a good deal more than
this review indicates, but I can't actually "recommend" it with a
clear conscience to anyone under the age of ten.
("Babe: Pig in the City" is scheduled for video release on May 4th.)

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing
list.  Or, you can subscribe directly from my web page.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Ravenous (1999)
        Black comedies have always courted the concept of
cannibalism, but few have done so with the fervor of Antonia
Bird's "Ravenous."  Like so many recent films, the idea
probably sounded better on paper: a group of soldiers develop
a taste for human flesh, and are forced to deal with the
conflicting emotions this stirs within them.  But "Ravenous"
uses its perch not to entertain but to preach: it's a thinly
disguised morality lesson on mankind's animal tendencies,
told with some of the most disquieting violence I've ever seen
on the big screen.
        I'm willing to believe that cannibalism can be funny--
those of you who are Monty Python fans will no doubt recall the
comedy team's famous skit about an outbreak of the practice among
the British Royal Navy.  "Ravenous," however, takes the same three
minutes of humor and pads it out to two hours, losing the focus
and immediacy of the comedy along the way.
        Captain John Boyd (Guy Pearce), a decorated veteran of the
Mexican-American War, finds himself transferred to the wayward Fort
Spencer in the mountains of California.  The outpost is a small one,
staffed by only eight people, but Boyd doesn't mind: it sounds like
the perfect place to recuperate from his recent combat trauma, not
all of which is physical.
        He's not the only new arrival, however: a Scottish man
named Colqhoun (Robert Carlyle) is found nearly frozen to death
in the snow outside the camp.  He soon recovers, and tells his
hosts a strange tale involving the cannibalistic habits of his
former traveling companions when they were trapped in a cave
together during a fierce winter storm.  Colqhoun escaped, he
claims, just in time to avoid becoming their next meal.
        Col. Hart (Jeffrey Jones, the bumbling principal from
"Ferris Bueller's Day Off"), leads the group to the nearby cave
to investigate Colqhoun's story.  What they find there I will
not reveal, except to mention that multiple members of the party
eventually succumb to the temptation of tasting human flesh,
which has ramifications they do not initially suspect.
        "Ravenous" is essentially a vampire movie without the
fangs, as the characters who develop a taste for human meat are
forced to deal with their unnatural cravings without arousing the
suspicion of their companions.  Had the film been clever enough
to further develop these ideas, we may have been treated to a fine
psychological thriller, or at least a decent black comedy.  But
no: the tale repeatedly goes for cheap shots and cliche'.  Robert
Carlyle, so charming in "The Full Monty," enjoys playing the
demented madman here: observe how he cackles like a mad scientist
while dragging his latest victim into a cave.  Carlyle is no
stranger to playing psychotic characters: he was the dangerous
Begbie in "Trainspotting."  But he is less convincing as Calqhoun,
probably because the character is so thinly sketched.  He
contradicts his story so many times over the course of the movie
that I never knew whether I was supposed to feel horror, sympathy
or mirth towards him.
        There are some interesting avenues for character
development, which the film unfortunately chooses to ignore:
Boyd's experiences in the war are fascinating enough that they
deserve their own movie, not the cursory flashback that "Ravenous"
allows them.  David Arquette's portrayal of the cackling drug-
addicted camp cook seems so inconsequential that I wonder if it
was improvised.  He has few lines, preferring instead to giggle
continuously throughout the movie.  The two Indians who live in
the camp also appear to have larger stories to tell, though the
film doesn't give them the opportunity to become anything more
than dialogue placeholders.
        It's possible that the movie may have been a worthy
thriller if it had stayed within its psychological boundaries;
Calqhoun's tale, for example, hits a fine note of tension and
horror, and we are at least able to understand the reasoning
behind his actions, even if we don't condone them.  But "Ravenous"
goes for cheap horror cliches time and time again: Dead people
repeatedly spring back to life, ala "Friday the 13th."  People
who are on death's door can be completely healed by a simple taste
of human flesh, since the meat gives supernatural powers to any
who might eat it, or some similar nonsense.  By the time the
film attempted to explain itself, I'd quit paying attention.
        There are a couple of nice touches.  The landscape
photography is beautiful (I've always been a sucker for well done
snow photography).  Also, the musical score from Michael Nyman is
unconventional, seeming to consist of three notes played over and
over again, conveying a sense of looping, sonic madness.  I liked
the subtle but disquieting effect this generated.
        There are a few entertaining moments in "Ravenous," but
they are few and far between, a fact that is not helped by the
story's slow pacing.  The movie is much too long to justify a
plot this miniscule; a more liberal fat-trimming during the
editing stage (or a better script) would have made it more
watchable.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to: joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com

Title
Review for Shuang long hui (1992)
        To review a Jackie Chan film is to announce that one
has too much time on one's hands.  A more futile gesture is
hard to imagine: I doubt anyone has ever decided whether or
not to see a Chan movie based on anything so trivial as a
review or critique, and with good reason: such items are not
needed, for Chan's track record speaks for itself.  Over the
course of the past three decades, he's churned out dozens of
martial arts extravaganzas which have delighted audiences all
over the world, making him one of Asia's biggest (and richest)
stars.  Chan fans, a group I count myself part of, go to see his
films not because of their breathtaking intellect, but because we
enjoy seeing the master kick a little ass, and make us laugh
while he does so.  Who cares what the critics think?
        Chan is a rare breed: a hybrid who possesses not only
stunning physical grace but also a sly streak of self-depreciating
humor-- he's not one of those buff Ah-nold clones, and that's
part of his appeal: he looks like "everyman," and uses his wits
(and a dash of good ol' dumb luck) to pull himself out of the dire
situations he continuously finds himself confronted with.  In that
regard, his performances parallel the great silent comedians of
cinema's earliest days: both Chaplin and Buster Keaton are
acknowledged by Chan as major influences.
        The plot of "Twin Dragons," made in 1992 but just
released in America, consists of the usual silliness: some bad
guys are running around Hong Kong, and only some tightly-edited
kung-fu and astonishing stunt work by Chan can make the streets
safe again.  The twist this time is that Jackie plays two roles,
a pair of identical twin brothers separated at birth.  One grows
up to be a master martial artist named Boomer, a tough guy
raised in the hard streets of Hong Kong.  His twin, John Ma, is
a revered classical pianist and conductor, educated in the finest
schools and possessing no martial arts ability.  Having no
prior knowledge of each other's existence, both men are soon
mistaken for their twin, leading to some predictable but amusing
fish-out-of-water comedy (Boomer being forced to conduct a
symphony orchestra (one of Chan's all-time great comedic
scenes), the wimpy Ma being forced to duke it out with the
bad guys, etc.)
        The final showdown, in which Boomer and Ma bust
some heads in a deserted car factory, is the film's shining
moment, containing some of Chan's most impressive (and
dangerous!) stunts.  Watching the action, we realize that
the action is closer to the Three Stooges than Bruce Lee.
(One room in the automotive factory is an environmental
testing lab, surrounded on all sides by glowing red walls.
The room beside it contains numerous showers, designed to
simulate rainfall.  Some of the biggest laughs occur as Jackie
and the villains fight in the hot room until one of them can't
take the heat any more.... then they dash into the showers,
cool off for a few moments, then return to the hot room to
fight some more!)  But Chan never sacrifices intensity for
humor.  "Twin Dragons" contains some of his best and most
exciting stunts to date: I still cringe when I think of the
numerous times he was almost converted into a Jackie
pancake.
        It's silly to even consider commenting on the story itself;
the dialogue and obligatory love tangents (one of which features
Maggie Cheung, Chan's co-star in "Supercop") are here only to
give the action sequences something to alternate with.  Suffice
it to say that this isn't "Casablanca," nor is it intended to be.
It succeeds at what it attempts to do: take the audience on a
wild ride through some hilarious and tense moments, with barely
a moment to catch one's breath.  It's a winner on two levels:
this is not only the tightest Chan movie I've yet seen... it's also
the funniest.
        The only major disappointment with "Twin Dragons" is
the fact that there are no bloopers or outtakes attached to the
final reel.  (For those of you not in the know, Chan makes it
a policy to include a number of humorous outtakes intermixed
with the end credits of each of his movies, showing flubbed
lines and stunts.)  It's a long-standing tradition, and I'm
perplexed as to why these were not included with this
American release of the film.  With such impressive stunts, I'm
sure the outtakes would've been fascinating.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to: joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Shakespeare in Love (1998)
        A theater life has always been one full of doubt and
uncertainty, but never more so than in 16th century London.  In
addition to the formidible task of merely turning a profit,
one also had to contend with the Plague, unsanitary working
conditions, and rival theater owners engaged in a cut-throat
war to steal each other's customers-- hardly the easiest way to
make a living.
        But for a young playwrite named William Shakespeare,
the situation is even more dire: lacking romantic inspiration
in his life, he has developed a stubborn case of writer's block.
"I fear I've lost my muse," he explains to a local theater owner.
("Oh?  Who is she this week?" he queries.)
        Poor Will, it seems, has been living a rather lonely
existence.  Without a soulmate to spark his imagination, he is
finding it difficult to write anything other than cliched rubbish,
including his current project, a lackluster comedy entitled
"Romeo and Ethel, the Pirate's Daughter."  He explains his
frustration to his therapist:
        But now his inspiration has dried up, leaving him to
simply go through the motions.  This doesn't bode well for
Mr. Henslowe (Geoffrey Rush), the theater manager who has
pre-paid Will for delivery of the (very) overdue manuscript.
Unless Will completes the play quickly, the financially-
strapped theater will have no new offering for the public,
and could be driven out of business.  Everyone's expecting a
new masterpiece to flow forth from Will's pen, and the
playwrite is frantic over his inability to provide it for them.
        Shakespeare isn't the only one having difficulties,
however.  Across town, the lovely Viola De Lesseps
(Gwyneth Paltrow) is lamenting twin hardships of her own:
a pending loveless marriage, arranged by her father for
purely financial means, and the realization that her dream
of being an actor cannot come to pass, as women are
banned from the London stage.  ("Stage love will never be
true love while the law of the land has our heroines being
played by pip-squeak boys in petticoats!" she frets to her
nurse.)  Reflecting upon the various suitors her father has
selected for her, Viola decries their cold, unartistic nature:
        Unwilling to accept her forced destiny, she hatches a
brilliant, desperate scheme to change her situation.
        Shortly thereafter, Shakespeare finds his spirits lifted
by the arrival of a talented new actor at the theater, a lad
named Thomas Kent.  The young man has a remarkable talent for
delivering Will's dialogue; much impressed, the writer casts
Thomas as Romeo in the still unfinished play.  Ah, but there's
a twist: Thomas is actually Viola in disguise, and it doesn't take
long for the clever Will to figure it out.
        Their relationship soon turns amorous, and Will,
astonished at the passion this remarkable woman inspires
within him, is soon filling sheets of parchment as quickly
as his pen can fly over them.  Channeling all his emotions and
desire into his writing, the manuscript comes alive with poetry
and metaphor; as the incomplete play goes into rehearsal (with
Will bringing in new pages daily), everyone praises the work's
boldness and originality.  The only thing that doesn't appear
to be working is the play's title; "Romeo and Ethel" somehow
lacks the passion that the material requires.  A brash young
actor named Ned Alleyn (Ben Affleck), however, comes to the
rescue: "Will, why not 'Romeo and Juliet?'  Just a suggestion."
        "Shakespeare in Love" may be the most original film I've
seen in the past year.  Poetic dialogue drips like honey from the
mouths of the actors, which simultaneously embraces and satirizes
the Bard's work.  The story can be appreciated on mulitple levels,
thanks to a brilliant screenplay (which was co-penned by Tom
Stoppard, the playwrite who gave us "Rosencrantz and
Guildenstern are Dead," another Shakespearean spoof).  Those who
are not overly familiar with Shakespeare's plays can still get caught
up in the story, while the rest of us will enjoy an extra layer of
subtle humor (Will stealing ideas from playwrite Christopher Marlowe
(Rupert Everett), or the wonderful scene in which Will overhears
someone saying "The rose smells thusly rank by any name.  I say,
a plague on both their houses!" and twists these words into two of
his most famous quotes).  Don't forget the delicious irony of the
female Viola pretending to be a young man in the role of Romeo...
while "Juliet" is played by a male, pretending to be female.  This
is the rare movie that actually gets better with multiple viewings,
giving the audience a chance to see what they missed earlier.
       There's not a bad performance in the entire film.  Joseph
Fiennes is a masterful Shakespeare, conveying both the dramatic and
humorous moments with a light touch, never going over the top;
likewise, Gwyneth Paltrow is a marvel in her dual role as
Viola/Thomas.  But the show is positively stolen by Ben Affleck's
brief performance as Ned, the spoiled young actor who attempts
to usurp the limelight away from Will with his arrogant
self-importance.  (Observe how Will tricks him into accepting
the much smaller role of Mercutio by appealing to Ned's ego, and
how Ned smirks before announcing, "I would play him."  It was one
of many laugh-out-loud moments for me.)
        "Shakespeare in Love" is a vibrant piece of satire,
capturing the tone and eloquence of Shakespeare's beloved
masterpiece while simultaneously turning it upside-down.  Full
of wit, humor, and passion, this film reminds us of the gift and
curse of true love.  I imagine that a sophisticated verbal comedy
about William Shakespeare's love-life won't appeal to everyone,
but if you like movies which deviate from the beaten path, you'll
have a marvelous time.  You might actually learn something,
though; consider yourself warned.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.  Or,
you can subscribe directly from my web page.  Thanks.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Simon Birch (1998)
        "You're already a bastard; you may as well be an enlightened
one."  Such is the advice twelve year-old Simon Birch offers to his
best friend Joe Wenteworth, but the remark is not a flippant one: Joe
was born out of wedlock and has never learned the identity of his
father, a fact for which he is mercilessly ridiculed by his schoolmates.
Simon knows how he feels.  Suffering from a rare form of dwarfism, he's
so incredibly tiny that the members of his Sunday School class fling
him around like a medicine ball whenever the teacher steps outside the
room.  Since both boys are basically outcasts, they've developed the
kind of deep, fiercely loyal friendship reserved only for those who
have no one else to turn to.
        "Simon Birch" is a remarkable film.  Loosely based on John
Irving's novel "A Prayer for Owen Meany," the story follows a year in
the life of these two unusual friends, allowing us to witness their
intense devotion to each other.  The film works best when tiny Simon
(played with warmth and zest by Ian Michael Smith) and Joe (played as
a child by Joseph Mazzello and as an adult by Jim Carrey) are simply
being kids.  One of my favorite scenes is their charmingly naive
discussion about breasts, which takes place on a dock early in the
story.
        The film is episodic in structure, divided into a number of
separate but interrelated tales.  Most interesting are the stories
involving Joe's quest to discover the identity of his father, and
Simon's constant disagreements with the local church officials.  A
devout Christian who believes that God has a special plan for him,
Simon takes exception to the bland, uninteresting services performed
by Rev. Russell (David Strathairn), leading to some hilarious confron-
tations.  These scenes provide a touch of religious satire completely
unexpected in a film of this type.  A paraphrased example:
        The cast is very good.  Ian Michael Smith is entertaining as
Simon, and young Joseph Mazzello (who you may remember as the little
boy from "Jurassic Park") is excellent, traversing the widest emotional
arc of any character in the film, and always making us believe him.
Jan Hooks from "Saturday Night Live" turns in a thankless performance
as the slimy "holier-than-thou" Sunday School teacher, Miss Leavey.
Ashley Judd and Oliver Platt are pleasant as Joe's mother and her
boyfriend, and have a sweet screen chemistry together.  And Jim Carrey
is fine in his second consecutive dramatic role, though he isn't really
the star: his primary function is to provide the movie's "Wonder
Years"-style narration, though he does appear onscreen during the
opening and closing scenes.  Only David Straithairn (Rev. Russell)
seems unsure of how to play his part.  After leaving the theater, I
found that I still didn't understand him... and considering that much
of the film's final scenes revolve around him, that's unfortunate.
        But "Simon Birch" is a lot of fun, maintaining a sweet,
innocent tone for most of its two-hour running time.  One disappointing
event occurs at roughly the film's two-third mark, however: Simon
plays Baby Jesus in the church's Christmas padget.  Now that's fine: as
a deeply religious young man, Simon is certainly capable of performing
the role.  But during this scene, Simon exhibits behavior totally
against his character, for no discernable reason.  I won't reveal what
he does, but it causes the entire film to screech to a halt while we
witness what basically amounts to five minutes of "Home Alone"
outtakes.  It just doesn't make sense, and is a jarring change of tone
from the rest of the story.  See if you don't agree.
        And yes, the rumors are true: the film has a tremendously sad
ending, with two of our most likeable characters dying over the course
of the movie.  If "Titanic" caused you to reach for a hanky, be warned:
you may need to bring two this time.
        But "Simon Birch" leads us through its plot with great joy and
exhiliration; I found it impossible not to be moved by little Simon
and his irresistable pluck.  Although clearly influenced by "Stand By
Me" and "The Wonder Years" (with just a hint of "Forrest Gump"), Mark
Steven Johnson has created a thoroughly enchanting movie which can be
enjoyed by all but the most stone-hearted.  I was surprised by how much
I liked it.  Bring the whole family, but don't forget the tissues.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.  Or,
you can subscribe directly from my web page.  Thanks.

Title
Review for Armageddon (1998)
STARRING:   Bruce Willis, Liv Tyler, Ben Affleck, Billy Bob Thornton,
            Steve Buscemi, Michael Duncan
DIRECTOR:   Michael Bay
WRITERS:    Tony Gilroy and Shane Salerno
RATED/YEAR: PG-13/1998
        "Armageddon" is the latest in a recent flood of films about big
rocks striking the Earth, a subject Hollywood can't seem to get enough of.
Roger Corman, known primarily for his many low-budget horror films of the
'50s, began the trend with last year's TV mini-series, "Asteroid."  This
summer has already seen the release of "Deep Impact," and while "Armageddon"
is a better film than either of its predecessers, I find myself wondering if
it will be too little too late to satisfy movie-goers.
        The story is straightforward enough.  Several small meteorites
have struck New York City, causing extensive damage to life and property.
NASA discovers that these small rocks are but a prelude: an asteroid the
size of Texas is on a collision course with Earth.  The rock's size means
that it's a "planet killer," with the potential to destroy all life on the
planet, right down to the bacteria.
        Realising that no amount of weapons fired from the Earth's surface
will stop the asteroid, NASA chairman Dan Truman (an excellent Billy Bob
Thornton) sends a team to intercept the rock.  Their mission: drill 8OO
feet into the surface of the rock, plant a nuclear bomb inside, then
detonate it once they are safely away.  The resulting explosion will
hopefully split the rock in two, causing it to miss the Earth.
        Bruce Willis (Die Hard) plays oil-driller Harry Stamper, recruited
to head the mission because of his expertise drilling into unusual surfaces.
Also along for the ride are A.J. (Ben Affleck), Rockhound (Steve Buscemi),
Bear (Michael Duncan) and several other professional drillers.  Although the
team doesn't particularly like each other, they are forced to work together
against a common obstacle.  Since this is Hollywood, the act naturally brings
them closer together.
        This should be a compelling story in its own right, but director
Michael Bay and screenwriters Gilroy and Salerno don't seem sure of their
ability to make it interesting; as such, they throw tons of ridiculous
subplots and groanably silly catastrophes into the mix for the crew to
encounter.  This is the sort of film where if there's even the slightest
chance for something to go wrong, it will.  So naturally, the drill gets
stuck, the timer on the nuclear bomb doesn't work, one of the crew members
turns out to be Evil (with a capital E), the ship won't start when they
try to take off, important levers break off in our heroes' hands at critical
times for no particular reason... well, you get the idea.  This film turns
"suspension of disbelief" into an art form.  After a while, these
misfortunes cease to be suspenseful and become laughable.
        Like "Deep Impact," "Armageddon" has the obligatory disfunctional
family.  Tea Leoni does not get along with her father in "Deep Impact";
Bruce Willis does not get along with his daughter in "Armageddon."  Leoni
hates her father's new girlfriend in "Impact"; Willis hates his daughter's
boyfriend (played by Affleck's character) in "Armageddon."  Leoni and
father reconcile in "Impact"; Willis and daughter reconcile in "Armageddon."
How sweet.  It might be remotely interesting if I hadn't just seen it.
        Although Aerosmith is not credited with the film's musical score,
they do perform the lion's share of the tunes.  No doubt this is due to
the strong presence of Liv Tyler (daughter of Stephen, Aerosmith's lead
singer).  If you like Aerosmith, you're in for a treat.  If you don't...
well, you might wanna bring a walkman.
        "Armageddon" won't go down as a sci-fi classic, but it's probably
worth seeing.  What sets the movie apart from the other rock flicks is not
its intelligence (which is only average), or its special effects (which are
fine though not extraordinary).  The acting is the key here, and the cast
does not disappoint.  Tyler and Affleck are a great screen couple, the
epitome of young lovers who are uncertain of the future and what it may
bring.  Thornton is also excellent as the NASA official helping out the
team from the ground.
        Surprisingly, humor is a big part of the film's charm; witness Steve
Buscemi (Reservoir Dogs, The Wedding Singer), who's played primarily for
laughs here and comes through in spades.  His observations about the
space shuttle's construction are particularly entertaining.  Other moments
to look for: an amusing cameo by Godzilla in the film's opening scene, a
Russian cosmonaut afflicted with a serious case of space madness, and the
wonderful scenes in which the crew undergoes NASA psychological testing.
        I hope this film does well at the box office.  Not because it's
a great artistic achievment, mind you; I simply want director Michael
Bay to make enough money to buy a tripod.  Honestly, I've never seen a
movie so afraid of static shots.  Some scenes vibrate as though the
cameraman was bouncing around the set on a pogo stick; others make me
wonder if the photographer mistook the camera for an etch-a-sketch and
was trying to erase the picture he'd drawn.  The visual style of the film
is often quite effective, though, so bring along some Dramemine and enjoy
the ride.
This review was originally written: July 5, 1998
Copyright (c) 1998 by Joe Barlow.  This review may be freely distributed as
long as ABSOLUTELY NO CHANGES are made and this disclaimer remains attached.
It may not reproduced for profit without the written consent of the author.
If you have comments or questions, please send them to: jbarlow at earthling
dot net (substituting the appropriate symbols, to discourage spam).

Title
Review for Hope Floats (1998)
        Not long ago I read a fascinating book on Jack the Ripper, a
subject which has always intrigued me: the images of dark London streets,
draped in the glow of gaslights and a damp blanket of fog, embody a
certain romance for me.  But the thing that struck me most about this
particular volume was the cold, blunt way in which it described the
ferociousness of the killer, with statements like "The victim was stabbed
fifty-three times, with twelve of the wounds being fatal in and of
themselves."  The horrific image this conjures up in my mind, of a
Victorian woman desperately trying to free herself while knowing she's
going to die, actually gave me nightmares when I began researching the
subject for a report several years ago.
        "Hope Floats," the new film starring Sandra Bullock, is similar
to Saucy Jack's victims in one respect: it knows it's dying, but continues
to struggle.  As screenwriter Steven Rogers stabs his script with the
most cliched dialogue and situations I've seen all year, the story still
valiantly attempts to break free.  Unfortunately, like the Ripper's
victims, we know it will never escape: any number of its wounds are also
fatal in and of themselves.
        In our opening scene, we meet the lovely Birdee (Bullock), a
former Texas beauty queen who's been invited onto a Jerry Springer-type
talk show by her best friend, Connie (Rosanna Arquette).  The sweet but
naive Birdee thinks she's there to get a free makeover, but Connie just
wants to reveal that she (Connie) has been having an affair with Birdee's
husband, Bill.  Zoom in on Birdee's shocked and hurt expression.
        Humiliated and angry, Birdee and her daughter Bernice promptly
move back in with Birdee's mom, Ramona (Gina Rowlands).  Birdee must now
come to terms with being back in the same sleepy town in which she grew
up, a place she's been trying to put behind her for years.  Along the way,
if we're to believe the script, she rediscovers herself, puts the past
behind her, and quickly learns to love again.
        The film wastes no time: mere moments after she returns home,
Birdee meets Justin Matisse (Harry Connick Jr.), a local handyman.  Thanks
to the Laws of Hollywood Cliches, we know that he'll become the new love
interest in her life because (1) he's attractive, (2) Bernice hates him,
and (3) he's pretty much the only guy in the entire town.  I could forgive
all of the above if only the two of them had any screen chemistry
together; sadly, there's nothing there.  Bullock and Connick have both
done fine work in other films ("Speed" and "While You Were Sleeping" for
Bullock, "Memphis Belle" for Connick), but this isn't a great pairing.
One of the reasons I thought "Titanic" worked so well was because I
believed the passion that DiCaprio and Winslet had together; in "Hope
Floats," our two romantic leads seem like just what they are: two actors
reciting memorized dialogue to each other.  Affection never really touches
either character's eyes, and Connick in particular seems to be thinking
about other things most of the time.
        After a bit, a ridiculous subplot develops involving Bernice's
torment at the hands of "Big Delores," the school bully.  (We know Delores
is evil, because she's not beautiful.)  This subplot is not so much
resolved as forgotten: one moment Bernice is scared for her life... then
suddenly, all is well and Delores is never mentioned again.  This type of
unfocused quality is typical of the film's construction.  What happened
to Justin while he was in California?  What's the fate of Travis (Cameron
Finley), the little boy that Ramona is watching while his mother (Birdee's
unseen sister) is out of state?  Does Birdee's father, who recently had a
stroke, ever recover?  We don't find out.  The run-of-the-mill dialogue
adds no surprises or insight.
        The film is so formulatic that the plot becomes little more than
a paint-by-numbers exercise.  It's the sort of movie where, after seeing
the first scene, you can predict the rest of the story without even
bothering to watch it.  Each scene sets up the next so obviously that
actually watching it seems redundant.  Just like this paragraph.
        "Hope Floats" also hits upon one of my big pet-peeves: beautiful
actresses playing characters who think they're ugly.  The lovely Janeane
Girafalo began this unfortunate trend in "The Truth About Cats and Dogs";
"Hope Floats" takes things one step further with Birdee's belief that
she's ugly and worthless.  Ugly... despite the fact that Sandra Bullock
is beautiful.  Despite the fact that all the other women in the story
envy Birdee's good looks.  Despite the fact that the film tells us quite
clearly that Birdee was the most beautiful girl in school, even winning
the local beauty padget three years in a row.  Despite the fact that all
the women in town marvel at how Birdee hasn't aged since high school (and
is therefore still beautiful).
        One bright spot in the film is the performance by young Mae
Whitman, who plays Birdee's daughter.  She's absolutely flawless: awkward
in her new surroundings, angry at her mother, hurt by her father's
behavior, aloof from her new schoolmates, Whitman plays the role like her
salvation depends upon it.  (The scene in which Bernice tries to get her
father to take her away with him is one of the most heartbreaking
performances I've ever seen from a child actor.)  Keep an eye on young
Ms. Whitman: she may very well turn out to be the next Christina Ricci.
        There's little point of seeing this film, though.  "Hope Floats"
is by-the-book screenwriting, created strictly for the lowest common
denominator, and I can't imagine anyone even remotely film-savvy enjoying
it.  The biggest flaw: in a story that's so clearly character-centric,
we never really get to know any of these people.  Justin is just as big
a mystery to us at the film's conclusion as he is at the outset, the
young Travis seems to have no purpose in the story other than failed
attempts at comic relief, and Ramona is the kind of mother we all love
to hate.  The film commits drama's worst sin: it remains boring right up
to the final shot, in which all the characters join hands and walk into
the house, while holiday fireworks cheerfully explode overhead.
Puh-lease.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.

Title
Review for Wing Commander (1999)
STARRING:   Freddie Prinze Jr., Matthew Lillard, David Warner,
                Ginny Holder, Tche'ky Karyo, Saffron Burrows
DIRECTOR:   Chris Roberts
WRITER:     Kevin Droney (based on the computer game)
RATED:      PG-13
RELEASED:   1999
        Few computer games have ascended to the rank of "cultural
icon," but "Wing Commander" is one that has.  Released by Origin
Systems almost a decade ago (yes, it really has been that long),
the game, a self-professed "space combat flight simulator," featured
state-of-the-art graphics, terrific replay value, and frantic (not to
mention addictive!) arcade action.  I was one of the many who got
hooked, rushing home after work each day so I could resume my quest
to save the universe from the evil Kilrathi.  "Wing Commander" (and
eventually "Wing Commander II") dominated my life for several months;
I gained proficiency in blowing up alien spacecraft even as my social
calendar evaporated before my uncaring eyes.
        But all things must pass, and eventually the game was replaced
by newer challenges on my hard drive.  At least four sequels (and
possibly more) have appeared since the glory days of "Wing Commander
II" ("Wing Commander III," "Wing Commander IV," "Wing Commander
Academy," and "Wing Commander: Privateer"), but I never played any of
them.  Indeed, I rarely play video games at all these days: I spend
most of my life working in front of computers, and the last thing I
want to do is spend even more time in front of one for relaxation
purposes.  But I've nonetheless retained an affection for the games
of by-gone years, and when I heard that a big-screen adaptation of
"Wing Commander" was headed for theaters, I was delighted.
        The plot of 20th Century Fox's movie follows that of
Origin's computer game fairly closely: it's 500 years in the future,
and Earth is at war with a fierce alien race called the Kilrathi, who
in the game looked like big tigers, but here resemble nothing so much
as Hans Moleman's head grafted onto Arnold Schwarzenegger's body.  The
Kilrathi have stolen a device called a NavCom from an Earth-owned
asteroid base, and this is bad news indeed for our planet: the NavCom
will allow the Kilrathi to discover the jump coordinates they need to
bombard our homeworld.
        A group of hot young space pilots may be the only thing
that can stop the attack.  Operating from a battered starship
called the Tiger's Claw, this group, headed by Jeanette "Angel"
Devereaux (Saffron Burrows), their wing commander, is determined
to do anything they can to thwart the aliens' plan.  The fighters
include Chris Blair (Freddie Prinze Jr.), who lives with discrimi-
nation every day of his life; the aptly-named Todd "Maniac"
Marshall (Matthew Lillard), who's an overconfident show-off but
an excellent pilot; and Rosie Forbes (Ginny Holder), a young black
woman eager to prove that Maniac isn't the only daredevil on the
ship.
        "Wing Commander's" opening credits are spectacular, mixing
audio clips from famous space-related speeches (Kennedy's vow to put
a man on the moon by the end of the '60s, etc.) with a visual montage
of star-charts and nebulas.  As the credits continue, other
fictitious but real-sounding news bulletins are heard, such as the
first broadcast from the Mars colony, the declaration of war on the
Kilrathi, etc.  I loved the effect; it got me interested in the story
right away, lending a sense of historical weight to the events even
though they're fictional.
        Unfortunately, it's also the extent of the movie's cleverness.
For the rest of its duration, "Wing Commander" runs strictly on auto-
pilot, giving us a bunch of largely interchangeable characters
who fly around in spaceships and shoot things.  (Imagine how the
Death Star battle in "Star Wars" would've been if Luke Skywalker had
called in sick that day.)  The movie never even bothers to tell us
why we're at war with the Kilrathi-- merely because they're there,
I expect.  (In all fairness, the game was equally vague on this
point.)  This was one of the big disappointments from me: I was
hoping to get a better glimpse at the culture of a formidable space
foe, but the movie paints them as targets, not adversaries.
        "Wing Commander" flings exposition at the audience as though
we were in elementary school.  Lacking any creative way to integrate
information seamlessly into the story, the film has the characters
speak at great length about things they should already know.  An
example: early in the film, some of our key characters find them-
selves being drawn towards what appears to be black hole.  As they
work frantically to free themselves, someone asks what will happen
if they are unable to break free.  The reply: "We're all gonna be
sucked into space, one molecule at a time."  Shouldn't a crew of
veteran space explorers already know this sort of thing?  Should
they waste valuable time talking about it?
        But that's tame compared to the movie's biggest blunder.
The Blair character is descended from a race called The Pilgrims,
who are despised and mistrusted by every other race.  In a laughable
scene, Blair visits his captain to ask why everyone despises his
heritage.  The captain, bless his heart, then proceeds to explain
the history of Blair's own race to him!  This would be comparable
to a black man going up to a white man during the '50s and asking
why those guys in the white hoods and robes are mean to him!  ("Well,
Billy, a long time ago there was a thing called slavery...")  I burst
into muffled laughter at the thought that the Blair character
wouldn't know the history of his own race, when apparently EVERY
OTHER CHARACTER IN THE MOVIE is well aware of it.  You'll be pleased
to know that I successful restrained an urge to hurl popcorn at the
screen.
        Character interaction is handled with as little dialogue
as possible, causing many of the protagonists to come across as
nothing more than walking plot points.  Commander Gerald (Jurgen
Prochnow), for example, makes an anti-Pilgrim slur in virtually
every single line of his dialogue.  Every time he appeared on the
screen, the movie basically halted for a moment while Gerald spewed
forth a flood of racist comments.  Angel, so interesting in the
computer game, never really feels real here: I didn't buy the way
she handled a particular crisis late in the film involving Maniac,
nor did I appreciate the formulaic relationship between her and
Blair, which certainly didn't exist in the game and feels tacked on
here, possibly as a result of a market study which indicated that
the film needed another love story.  Matthew Lillard's portrayal of
Maniac is a bright point, however: Lillard has played lunatics in
three films now ("Scream" and "She's All That" are the other two);
he's comfortable depicting psychopaths, and is getting better with
practice.  I liked his interactions with the Rosie character: their
constant "I'm better than you are" competitions are amusing and
oddly sweet, culminating in the film's best bit of dialogue:
        The movie isn't consistently entertaining, but it has a
pulse.  Largely hollow characters and a frequently disappointing
script are somewhat balanced by the movie's visual effects (the
combat scenes actually feel more like ballet than typical action
sequences).  Parts of the film are undeniably fun, but overall,
"Wing Commander" is rather like watching someone else play your
favorite video game for two hours-- you keep wishing they'd leave,
so you could have a turn.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to: joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com

Title
Review for Opposite of Sex, The (1998)
        Actress Christina Ricci closes a door on her life in Don Roos'
brilliant new film, "The Opposite of Sex."  Gone forever are the days of
Wednesday Addams and "That Darn Cat"; here, Ricci delivers a performance
that is strong, confident, memorable, and more adult than we have any
right to expect from an actress her age.  (The end credits actually carry
a message assuring the audience that "no minors engaged in any sexual
activities" during the filming of the movie.)
        To say that sixteen year-old Dedee, the character Ricci plays, is
a bad seed would be a gross understatement.  She's sassy, mean, tough,
and so resentful of her parents that she hurls stones and obscenities at
the coffin during her stepfather's funeral.  She chain-smokes, has no real
friends, and is so fond of the physical aspects of life that when she
suddenly finds herself pregnant, it's anybody's guess who the father is.
        Hating the atmosphere at home, Dedee flees to the house of her rich
gay brother Bill (Martin Donovan), a man she has seen exactly once in her
life.  Putting on her most pathetic-looking face, the manipulative Dedee
tearfully asks to stay for a few weeks.  Bill, taken in by her charm and
apparant helplessness, caves in at once.  The poor guy doesn't realise
he's making the biggest mistake of his life.
        All goes well until Dedee takes a liking to Bill's boyfriend Matt
(Ivan Sergei).  The two forge an uneasy friendship, with the homophobic
Dedee trying to convince Matt that he'd enjoy sex with a woman if he'd
only try it.  She offers him her body, and eventually Matt succumbs...
which gives Dedee the opportunity to name Matt as the father of her child.
Matt, who isn't exactly the sharpest stick in the bunch, believes her
completely.
        All this takes place in the first few minutes of the film; the
rest of the movie depicts Bill and his friend Lucia (Lisa Kudrow) chasing
Matt and Dedee across North America as her pregnancy develops.  Along the
way the characters will fall in and out of love with each other, commit
numerous felonies, and wonder what the hell they're doing.  As well they
should.
        That capsule summary may make the film sound like nothing more than
an empty-headed teen-comedy, but the film is much more than this; it's
closer to "Taxi Driver" than "Cannonball Run."  Roos, who also wrote
"Single White Female," presents us with equal parts film-noir and
in-your-face comedy.  This is a staggeringly funny movie, driven by a
fierce intelligence.  And though it's an undeniably dark and twisted ride,
it contains the highest joke-to-scene ratio of any film since "Clerks."
The movie's split-personality is a big part of its charm.
        The film is narrated by Dedee, who constantly reminds us that we're
not supposed to like her.  She knows she's a bitch and couldn't care less.
"I don't have a heart of gold and I don't grow one later," she warns in
the opening voice-over, and it's true.  But amazingly, Dedee never feels
like a caricature or stereotype.  Ricci plays the role with all her heart,
giving us a memorable character that manages to grow and change over the
course of the movie despite her best efforts not to.  Dedee will never be
Mother Teresa, and that's fine, but neither is she a one-note heroine/
villain.  The life Ricci brings to the part has to be seen to be believed.
There's already talk of an Oscar nomination for her, and I couldn't agree
more.
        Ricci is obviously getting the most attention of the film's cast,
but she's not the only one doing admirable work.  Just try not to smile at
the amiable Carl (Lyle Lovett), a shy policeman who only has eyes for
Lucia... who in turn only has eyes for Bill... who's still in love with
Matt... who ran off with Dedee... who feels alone.  Moments like this are
exactly why the film works so well: it knows that love isn't always a wonderful
thing.  It frequently hurts, disappoints, offends, and frustrates.  Carl is
easy to love; Lovett's portrayl conveys the sense of longing we've all felt,
wanting someone who doesn't know we exist.  Lisa Kudrow also manages to
charm as Lucia, the former ugly-duckling who only wants to be loved... but
would sooner die than admit it to anyone.
        This is admittedly not a film that has much use for political
correctness; it will offend as many as it thrills (indeed, it already has).
But if you're not afraid of a movie that shows no fear, get to a theater
immediately.  This is by far the best film I've seen this year.
Copyright (c) 1998 by Joe Barlow.  This review may be freely distributed as
long as ABSOLUTELY NO CHANGES are made and this disclaimer remains attached.
It may not reproduced for profit without the written consent of the author.
If you have comments or questions, please send them to: jbarlow at earthling
dot net (substituting the appropriate symbols, to discourage spam).

Title
Review for Avengers, The (1998)
        If you think about it, movies are a lot like animals.  "Saving
Private Ryan" is definitely a cat: it stretches out comfortably on the
couch and looks at you with cool indifference.  It yawns occasionally.
It doesn't like to be touched, because warm, caring relationships are
too stifling for its lifestyle.  It's not the least bit interested in
who you are, as long as you feed it.
        "The Avengers," on the other hand, is a frisky little puppy.  It
nips playfully at your heels, races all around the house, and piddles
excitedly on the rug.  It desperately wants to please you, because it
loves you unconditionally.  It begs you to play with it, and will happily
lick your face for an hour before dashing off to chew your shoes.
        Never before has a movie so horrid been so wonderful.  During a
summer dominated by extremely long and pretentious films, it's a great
joy to watch a fairly brief movie that not only knows it's bad, but takes
great delight in the fact.
        Ralph Fiennes stars as John Steed, a British secret agent who
works for an organization known only as The Ministry.  He's a mild-
mannered but undeniably dapper chap, never without his umbrella, bowler
hat, or smirk.  He does a fine job of protecting London, as long as it
doesn't interfere with his tea-time.
        Uma Thurman is Dr. Emma Peel, a beautiful, brilliant scientist
who has been framed for a crime she claims she didn't commit.  She's
sexy, tough, and somehow manages to consume as much tea as Steed does.
The Ministry orders Steed to help her clear her name, and the two are
off.
        Sean Connery is Sir August De Wynter, a supervillain who's evil
only because the script says so.  He's just as brilliant as our heroes
but dresses better (check out his lovely color-coordinated kilts, for
instance).  He will not rest until he's taken over the world... except
to drink lots of tea, of course.  Thus do we have our movie.
        What else can be said?  The film, like the television show of the
same name, is pure camp.  (One of the action sequences involve Steed and
Peel chasing a flock of life-size, rainbow-colored teddy bears through
the streets of London.)  The dialogue alternates between horrible
puns and failed attempts to make the characters seem witty.  An actual
scene from the movie (paraphrased):
        Your reaction to the above paragraph will tell you whether or not
you should see "The Avengers."  If you groaned and buried your head in
your hands, stay away.  If you thought it was witty, brilliant dialogue,
seek professional help immediately.  But if you groaned and rolled your
eyes but nonetheless got a goofy grin on your face for a moment or two,
this film may be your cup of (ahem) tea.
        Why?  After all the negative things I've said about the movie,
how can I possibly recommend it?  Simple: it's a lot of fun.  Fiennes,
Thurman and Connery are clearly having a good time, and their goofy
enthusiasm is contagious.  Connery imparticular is wonderful, throwing
his considerable acting talent into a brainless role.  He's the most
memorable "screen meanie" we've seen all summer, and the fact that he
actually manages to deliver his cornball dialogue with a straight face
makes me respect him even more.
        There are some nice directorial touches as well; at one point,
Peel finds herself trapped in an Escher-esque labyrinth... the sort of
place where stairways lead nowhere, and walking through a doorway takes
you back into the room you just left.  I found this to be quite an
impressive sequence (I remember thinking, "She's trapped in the maze from
ZORK I!").  Some other shots are also memorable: look for the lovely
camera pan across the "snowglobe table" in Connery's house.
        Sure, there are some fairly substantial problems with the film:
a subplot involving clones is never really resolved, the final confron-
tation between heroes and villain is extremely unsatisfying, Uma's
British accent comes and goes, and one of the film's action sequences
is a none-too-subtle (but less-effective) reworking of the speeder bike
chase from "Return of the Jedi."  In addition, the movie contains what
is possibly the highest numbers of continuity errors ever captured in a
film (something I frequently don't notice).  But none of that matters;
indeed, I wonder if some of the above was intentional, to add to the
camp feel.
        Director Jeremiah Checkhik remains faithful to the feel of the
television series in many other subtle ways as well.  The hairstyles,
clothes, and cars are all straight out of the sixties, for example.
These items were so subtly integrated into the movie that I didn't even
notice them until the film was halfway over.
        The interplay between the characters is also well-done.  The
sexual tension between Steed and Peel is not only present, but often
very humorous.  (Steed at one point suggests to Dr. Peel that they call
each other by less formal names.  She reluctantly makes a concession:
"Very well.  You may call me *Mrs.* Peel.")
        I've no doubt sealed my fate as a film critic: not only did I
pan "Saving Private Ryan" while raving about "Halloween: H20," but I've
just recommended a movie which is, by my own admission, pretty bad.  But
when a film is this much fun, friends, "bad" is no reason not to attend.
The lynch mob starts over there.  Tea, anyone?
This review was written August 17, 1998.
Copyright (c) 1998 by Joe Barlow.  This review may be freely distributed as
long as ABSOLUTELY NO CHANGES are made and this disclaimer remains attached.
It may not be reproduced for profit without the written consent of the
author.  If you have comments or questions, please send them to: jbarlow
at earthling dot net (substituting the appropriate symbols, to discourage
spam).
-----
  "Average Joe" Barlow * MiSTie #73097 * Writer/musician/aspiring filmmaker
       jbarlow@YOURearthling.PANTSnet http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow
              {Remove YOUR PANTS to e-mail me.}        

Title
Review for In Dreams (1999)
        "In Dreams" is such a strikingly original film that one
is somewhat tempted to forgive its excesses.  A psychological
thriller comprised of equal parts intrigue and phantasmagoria,
the story effectively drenches the audience in shadowy insanity,
even if the characters themselves never really involve us.  It's
a textbook example of style over substance.
        The plot involves Claire Cooper (Annette Bening), a New
England housewife who finds herself mentally linked to a serial
killer, sensing his every thought.  (The name Claire was chosen,
I suspect, as a pun on the word "clairvoyant.")  Slowly going
insane from the experience, Claire attempts to find and confront
the killer, with whom she has a personal score to settle.
        It sounds great on paper, but the film is ultimately
not as satisfying as one might expect.  Despite its promising
start, "In Dreams" loses sight of its surprisingly effective
macabre tone just past its halfway point, eventually collapsing
into a tangled mess of contradictions and confusion.
        Much of the story is standard issue: Claire's husband
Paul (a thankless performance by Aidan Quinn) tries to convince
the police that his wife's psychic abilities are genuine and can
assist them in the search for the killer; they scoff, but
eventually come around.  Claire, meanwhile, is locked up in a
mental institution, but manages to escape with a little help
from that old movie standby, the ventilation ducts.  Soon she's
on the trail of the killer, a deeply disturbed fellow by the name
of Vivian (actor's identity withheld; see below), and things are
wrapped up by not one but *two* tried-and-true staples of
American cinema: the chase scene and the gunfight.  Yawn.  Did
someone forget that the film was supposed to be a psychological
thriller?  Did they think they were making "Die Hard part 19?"
        Since the movie goes to great pains to hide the identity
of the actor playing Vivian until the last possible moment, I
won't reveal the surprise, except to mention that it's a
satisfactory performance, though perhaps a bit too over-the-top
to be truly "great."  On the other hand, Annette Bening's work
here gets steadily better as the film progresses; surprisingly,
she's far more convincing as a lunatic than the smiling housewife
she portrays in the story's opening scenes.  Aidan Quinn's
performance as Paul, however, is given too little screen time to
really become anything more than a fleeting face in the shadows.
        As is so often the case, there's a bit too much story
contained in the movie.  Particularly puzzling is a subplot
involving an affair Paul may or may not have been having with
an Australian woman-- after a brief mention in the story's opening
scenes, the whole issue is completely abandoned.  I question its
inclusion in the film's final cut; it adds nothing but confusion to
the story.  Since the movie clearly thinks Paul is a good guy,
why question it?
        Nonetheless, "In Dreams" has flashes of remarkable
originality, marred primarily by its reliance on a conventional
resolution for a plot that is *anything* but ordinary; director
Neil Jordan deserves credit for even attempting a project of
this nature.  Boldly photographed and directed, the movie
comes frustratingly close to greatness, though in the end its
efforts are undermined by a generic finale and logic gaps that
could probably have been fixed if another draft of the screenplay
had been written.  (Question: if Claire and Vivian are psychically
connected, why can't he find her when she's hiding in the woods?
And why did the hospital put Claire in the *exact same room*
that Vivian had occupied 25 years before?  That blows beyond
mere "suspension of disbelief" and enters into the boring realm
of "plot contrivance.")  And Neil Jordan's bizzare symbolism fills
the frame: what's the significance of the apples?  Are we supposed
to be this perplexed while watching?  Sometimes the director is so
determined to prove that he's clever that coherency and plot are
sacrified in favor of technique.
        But there's still the potential for entertainment here,
especially if you like film noir, a genre that doesn't get much
attention these days.  The movie definitely has some great moments;
the "Titanic"-like underwater scenes at the local reservoir are
haunting, as are many of Claire's hallucinations.  Through them,
we can feel (and share) her madness.
        I screened "In Dreams" with my brother, himself a fine
amateur critic, and his summary of the film says it all: it's like
"Nightmare on Elm Street" meets "What Dreams May Come."
That should tell you all you need to know.  Thanks, Adam; I
couldn't have said it better myself.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.  Or,
you can subscribe directly from my web page.  Thanks.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Analyze This (1999)
        Paul Vitti (Robert De Niro) has a problem: although he's
one of the most feared and powerful gangsters in the country, he's
lost his passion for his work.  Things aren't as simple as they
once were ("We gotta change with the times," states an advisor.
"What, are we gonna get a web site?" sneers Vitti in reply).  But
there are other reason for the boss's recent distaste for violence:
having just witnessed the murder of his best friend, Vitti is so
torn with stress and tension that he now bursts into tears at the
slightest provacation.
        The members of Vitti's "family" are concerned: if word gets
out that their boss is turning into a quivering crybaby, their
organization will lose prestige and power.  Hoping to reclaim his
composure and save his career, the boss seeks the help of an
unwitting psychiatrist, Dr. Ben Sobol (Billy Crystal).  Sobol wants
nothing to do with the infamous Vitti, but the gangster won't take
"no" for an answer.  Soon the two men are working through the
complex issues which have resulted in Vitti's breakdown.
        Harold Ramis's "Analyze This" could just as easily be
called "There's Something About Gangsters."  Funny and clever,
the film gathers up the entire "Untouchables" genre and shakes
it vigorously.  The jokes are sly, revolving more around verbal
gags than we expect from an action-film spoof, though the humor
never once descends to the level of stupidity which earmarked
lesser mobster parodies, such as "Mafia!"  It is, quite simply,
the most unabashedly funny movie I've seen since last autumn's
"Rush Hour," with Jackie Chan and Chris Tucker.
        The interplay between Crystal and De Niro is well
developed: their psychiatric sessions skip by like a live-action
episode of Comedy Central's "Dr. Katz, Professional Therapist,"
including a great scene in which Sobel tries to explain Oedipel
complexes to Vitti.  Sobol also challenges Vitti's adulterous
habits:
        We are given ample insight into Vitti's personality,
witnessing both his crumbling power and growing insecurity with
himself.  De Niro makes Vitti real to us: he may be a hardened
criminal, but he's also a loving father (observe how he casually
gathers up his kids' wildly strewn Disney videos before making
his escape in one crucial scene).  It's a clever directorial
touch from Ramis, and it adds a subtle degree of characterization.
        Much of the film reminds me of "What About Bob?", the
Bill Murray/Richard Dreyfuss psychiatric comedy in which a
clingy patient pushes his psychiatrist to the limit.  The same
thing happens in "Analyze This," as Vitti demands more and more
of Sobol's time, much to the chagrin of the doctor's fiancee',
Laura (a spunky Lisa Kudrow, fresh from her success as Lucia
in "The Opposite of Sex").
        Only two minor items mar the film: (a) the Billy
Crystal character finds himself forced to attend a Mob meeting
for reasons that struck me as thoroughly unbelievable, and (b)
the story culminates in a yawn-inducing shoot-out with a rival
"family."  I was hoping for a more original resolution to the
movie, as the film sparkles with energy and wit for the
rest of its duration.
        These are not major flaws, however, and won't stop me
from unhesitatingly recommending "Analyze This," the best comedy
to emerge so far in 1999.  Great acting, great directing, great
writing, and a cameo by Tony Bennett?  Oh man, I am *so* there.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to: joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com

Title
Review for Blade (1998)
        I'd intended to start this review with a really lousy pun--
something along the lines of, "Being a vampire is a real pain in the
neck."  Fortunately, my good sense intervened and reminded me of two
very important things: not only do many people despise puns, but, if I
wasted a joke like that on this review, I would be expending far more
creativity than any critical analysis of "Blade" deserves.  Perhaps a
more appropriate opening line would be, "Hey d00d, vampirez are kewl!!!"
        Wesley Snipes *is* Blade, a sword-toting vampire hunter who spends
much of his time sneering at people, then chopping them up.  A half-vampire
half-human hybrid, he has the speed, strength, and heightened senses of a
nosferatu, but is able to walk around in broad daylight.  He hangs around
with Whistler (Kris Kristofferson), a remarkably grizzled inventor who
creates the weapons that Blade uses to fight his foes.  Whistler also
periodically injects his friend with a special serum, designed to alleviate
the cravings generated by Blade's non-human half.  But after many years of
these injections, Blade's body is beginning to build up a resistence.
Soon he may start to experience the same bloodlust which afflicts the
creatures he has vowed to destroy.
        That sounds like an intriguing concept for an action movie, but
screenwriter David Goyer (Dark City) and director Stephen Norrington
(Death Machine) have little interest in building on it; instead, their
emphasis is solely on the construction of one frantic fight sequence
after another.  I can hardly blame them.  A good plot has never been a
prerequisite for a financially-successful action movie; knowing this,
Norrington and Goyer haven't wasted any time developing one.  The result
is a film that flings chunks of kinetic energy at the audience like
watermelon fragments at a Gallagher show.
        In all fairness, these scenes are well-done: their pacing is
satisfactory, the photography is innovative, and the performances are
sufficient.  The physically buff Snipes is more than able to convey the
strength and agility that his character supposedly possesses, even if
Blade himself undergoes no emotional development whatsoever during the
course of the film.  But after seeing the movie's 200th vampire slaying,
most of the novelty had worn off.
        "Blade" tries to hide the fact that it's an incomprehensible mess
via quick editing; it's a rare shot indeed that lasts for more than a
couple of seconds, and the action sequences explode by with such rapidity
that I actually found a few of them difficult to follow.  In that regard,
"Blade" echoes "Armageddon": it's spliced together as though it were a
trailer, rather than the feature itself.
        Stephen Dorff is horribly miscast as Deacon Frost, an ambitious
young vampire who dreams of conquering the world.  Even if Blade weren't
out to stop him, there's no way he'd get very far.  First of all, the guy
is a twig.  It's hard to be intimidated by someone who looks like a
strong gust of wind could knock him on his skinny little bottom,
particularly when beefcake Blade is so physically intimidating.  Deacon's
most frightening trait: he can sneer just as effectively as Blade.  During
one scene, in which hero and villain have a lengthy chat, so many sneers
were exchanged that I feared one of them would injure a facial muscle.
        Deacon isn't the smartest guy in the world, either: his fiendish
plan consists entirely of summoning a Vampire Blood God, or some equally
silly nonesense.  As he explains his evil plan to a hostage (looking for
all the world like a whisper-thin, blond Snidley Whipflash as he does so),
he boldy proclaims, "The vampire god will turn ALL humans into vampires!
Everyone you know and love will become one of us!"  Um, excuse me Deacon.
You've just spent the first half of the movie talking about how humans are
merely "cattle" (ie, vampire food).  Let's think about this: if you turn
all of us into vampires, what're YOU gonna eat?  To the best of my
knowledge, vampires can't just sit at home and pop a Lean Cuisine meal
into the microwave.  No humans = vampire crash diet, right?  Maybe I'm
crazy, but it seems like a pretty significant problem.  (Did no one on the
film's production crew catch this?)
        The movie flirts with sophistication in a couple of places,
teasing us with plot twists that could've sparked the audience's interest:
in addition to Blade's growing immunity to the serum, our heroine, Karen
(N'Bushe Wright), may be turning into a vampire herself, and Whistler is
being eaten alive by cancer.  All three of these sub-plots deserved more
time than the film gives them.  None are resolved satisfactorally, and the
one involving Karen is so ham-fisted that I actually laughed at its
resolution.  (She "borrows" an entire roomful of blood-processing
equipment from the hospital in which she works, in order to create a cure
for vampirism.  Yeah, okay.  I can see how the local hospital would loan
her all their most expensive, state of the art blood-research gear.  It's
not like they ever use it, right?  Remind me never to stay at that
hospital.)
        And yet despite all that, "Blade" is kinda fun.  The movie, which
is based on the popular Marvel comic of the same name, succeeds in creating
a comic-book world in which anything is possible.  Bold, striking visuals
leap from the screen.  Shadows are used to great effect, while the camera
spins dizzily, suggesting an off-balance world.  Even the day scenes are
drenched in darkness, a small cinematic touch that I loved.
        The extreme violence of "Blade" will probably not bother too many
viewers, either: it's so over-the-top that it stops being "real" and
instead becomes an exercise in surrealism.  This effectively enhances the
movie's comic-book flavor.  (Check out the scene in which a man's skeleton
comes to life and claws its way out of his body, through the mouth.)
        "Blade" is no masterpiece, but it does take great joy in sharing
its vision of a realm in which nothing is as it seems.  I actually enjoyed
much of it, while simultaneously laughing at its many flaws.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.

Title
Review for Thin Red Line, The (1998)
        As a freelance film critic, my schedule is often pushed to the
point of overload with the sheer quantity of movies that I'm called
upon to see each month.  Pen in hand, I approach each of them as a
lion might stalk its prey: analyzing, looking for weakness.  Try as I
might, I'm sometimes unable to prevent myself from focusing more on
the individual details of a cinematic work, rather than the overall
experience and tone that it creates.  I recognize this as perhaps my
biggest failing; after re-reading some of my older reviews last week,
I noticed that I often judge a film's merit based on the way a few
choice scenes move me (or don't move me, as the case may be).  I'm
trying to be more objective these days, but I suppose it's human
nature to occasionally toss aside the big picture because of emotional
intervention.  Heaven knows I do it all the time in my day-to-day
life.
        I'm not sure, but I'm betting that director Terrence Malick
approaches filmmaking the same way.  With his latest offering, the
World War II epic "The Thin Red Line," Malick crafts together a
stunning piece of cinema that seems heavily rooted in the individual
moment rather than an overall 'big picture' or plot line; indeed,
conventional narrative storytelling is tossed cheerfully out the
window in service to the *scene*.  Seemingly unimportant details are
given ample (some would say excessive) screen time, as moments which
have no apparent relevence to the story are followed via lengthy
tangents.  These nuances build, however, into an intricate mosaic of
feelings and images over the course of the tale's three-hour running
time.  In a way, I was reminded of the illusionary pictures which
often adourn the walls of waiting rooms: look at one up close and you
see a group of small, individual pictures.... but stand back a bit and
the images mesh together to form a completely different visual.
        Divided into three distinct acts, the movie unfolds itself as
we chronicle several weeks in the lives of a group of American
soldiers during World War II.  Through the incredible hardships they
are forced to endure, they grow from strangers to friends, and finally
into a strange type of family, headed up by the fierce Lt. Col. Gordon
Tall (an excellent performance by Nick Nolte), who is so militantly
delighted to be in a real war that he looks as though he might burst
into song at any moment.  War's biggest inconvienence for Private Bell
(Ben Chaplin) is the separation from his wife; his devotion to her is
as sweet and selfless as any woman could ever hope to have.  Woody
Harrelson is brash and impetuous as Sgt. Keck, yet Sean Penn's
portrayl of Sgt. Welsh is mature and weary-- a man who has seen his
share of war and death, and just wants it all to be over.
        Malick has inflicted the film with the visual poetry of which
he is justly famous.  Natural landscapes have rarely been as well
photographed as they are here, and his creative use of natural
lighting and shadows add much to the mood.  And by giving us a
"soldier's-eye" view for much of the picture, he effectively draws us
into the events our characters experience.  Unlike "Saving Private
Ryan," which used hand-held, documentary-style photography during its
combat scenes, Malick wisely chooses to involve us in the characters'
fear by effectively making us one of them, via the camera.  The
Japanese soldiers are as much a faceless stranger to the audience as
they are to our heroes-- during the combat scenes, we never get a
glimpse of the faces of any of "the enemy."  Only later are we able
to realize that they too are people, just as unhappy to be fighting as
our protaganists are.  One of the film's most unshakeable images
involves a dead Japanese soldier, face half-buried in the mud, open
eyes gazing mournfully towards Heaven, as if demanding accountability
from God.
        "The Thin Red Line" also breaks conventions by taking us
inside the minds of our main characters, revealing their thoughts to
us via poetic voice-overs as war explodes around them.  The
disenchanted Private Witt (James Caviezel), for example, muses about
the futility of war during the film's opening montage.  "I've heard
people talk about immortality," he thinks.  "But I ain't seen it."
Private Bell's thoughts of his wife are all that keep him going;
whenever things get too stressful for him, he flashes back to happier
days.  Malick allows us to travel back with him, and we better
understand the sense of loss he feels at her absence.
        "The Thin Red Line" never allows its characters (or the
audience) to bask in the glory and bravada which usually marks this
type of picture; war isn't glamorous, and Malick knows it.  We're also
not permitted to think that man's actions have no consequences on the
innocent, either: countless soldiers are mowed down by Japanese
gunfire and we barely pause for a moment to register the image... but
when a bird is caught in the crossfire, its dying moments are shown to
us for an excruciatingly long time before the camera mercifully cuts
away.  The most overwhelming image for me: the shot of two stray dogs
casually nibbling on the bloody dead soldiers which cover the hills.
This image is surely as chilling as any I've seen in a war movie, and
conveys a much different kind of horror from bombs and bullets.  It's
a jarring, disturbing visual... but fits into the film so well, so
*rightly*, that its presence cannot be questioned.
        This film was destined (cursed?) by its reputation even before
the first trailer was released, if only because of its director.
Commonly referred to as "the J.D. Salinger of modern cinema," Terrence
Malick returned to the film world after a twelve-year absence from
behind the camera to helm this project.  Already a legend based on his
first two critically-adored films, "Badlands" and "Days of Heaven,"
Malick has created not so much a film as a piece of visual poetry.
With "The Thin Red Line," he stirs the soul and the imagination, shows
us scenes of unparalled beauty interspersed between others of
unimaginable horror, and manages to make us feel and ponder what the
people on the screen are going through, even hours after leaving the
theater.  I haven't been able to shake the experience viewing this
work, and I hope I never do.
        Put simply, "The Thin Red Line" is a masterpiece, woven
together so deftly by the actors and director that its seams are never
visible through the cinematic cloth, allowing the images to service
one of cinema's greatest virtues: its ability to transport the
audience.  There are those who say the film is too long, and call the
"thought monologues" delivered by the characters distracting and
nothing more than poor attempts at introspection.  They suggest the
work could be made stronger via judicious pruning of its slower
passages.  I respectfully disagree.  One of the reasons I thought the
film worked so well was the simple fact that it *did* take the time to
show the monotony and tedium of combat, rather than non-stop
excitement and trauma.  It's a decision that, for me, made the film
rise far above the typical war movie.  To cut one frame from this film
would be to slash away a corner of the "Mona Lisa" or "The Last
Supper."  This film is not about sprightly pacing, and those who
complain about its length have, I fear, missed the point entirely.
"The Thin Red Line" is Art, with a capital "A," and is meant to be
experienced, not watched with an eye on one's wristwatch.
         This movie was released in certain parts of the country in
December of 1998, but didn't open nationwide until last Friday, which
is the same day that I saw it.  It's a pity my city (Raleigh, NC)
didn't get it earlier; had I seen this before my December 30th voting
deadline, I would've unhesitatingly named "The Thin Red Line" as my
top film of 1998.  As it stands, the film will have to be content with
gaining admitance to my inner circle of favorite movies, a short list
with also includes "Star Wars," "Schindler's List," "Casablanca" and a
small handful of others.  Be warned before you head to the theater,
however: this is not a movie concerned with taking your hand and
gently pulling you through a simplistically violent plot.  It's about
the sharing of experiences, visual grace, stunning camera work, and
the madness that mankind is capable of inflicting upon itself and
others.  This is a completely new kind of filmmaking-- it's not afraid
to delve into internal rationality, long passages of photographic
splendor, or slower moments which have absolutely no relevence to the
film's storyline, but which nonetheless add depth and shading to the
events and emotions being depicted on the screen.  This unusual
deviation from the norm, I suspect, is the very reason that so many
critics have fallen in love with the movie while so many viewers are
befuddled by it.  Adjust your expectations accordingly, then go see
what all the fuss is about.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.  Or,
you can subscribe directly from my web page.  Thanks.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Mummy, The (1999)
        Whether we like it or not, it has become standard practice for
Hollywood to remake classic films for modern audiences.  Stephen
Sommer's new cinematic retelling of "The Mummy" marks the first time
Universal Pictures has revisited one their most popular (and
profitable)
characters since the 1950s, a decade dominated dominated by cinematic
werewolves, vampires, and aliens.  Thanks to the popularity of the "B"
movie during this time period, the Mummy developed a loyal and
dedicated fan base.  The fact that he's back in theaters in '99 is not
nearly as surprising as the amount of time it took to get him there.
Is
the wait worth it?
        Early indications looked good-- the film has been receiving
favorable write-ups in entertainment magazines for a while now, and
innovative TV ads and a great trailer have only served to whet the
appetite of horror fans.  The thought of seeing a new story about one
of
the genre's premiere villains seemed like a great way to spend a
couple
of hours, and my expectations were high as the theater lights dimmed.
But alas, this movie won't go down as a classic, as some have
suggested; nor is it a modern "Raiders of the Lost Ark," although
portions of this movie are clearly inspired by it.  "The Mummy"
suffers
from a pace that borders on laconic, characters that are the epitome
of
cardboard, and a formulaic plot that's a little too neatly (ahem)
wrapped
up.
        The story opens with a splendidly filmed flashback.  Nearly
two
thousand years before the birth of Christ, an Egyptian priest named
Imhotep (Arnold Vosloo) tempted fate by doing the unthinkable: falling
in
love with the Pharoah's mistress.  For this act of trechery, the
priest
was buried alive, and, for reasons I'm still not sure I understand,
imbued
with a curse: if his tomb is ever disturbed, the mummified priest will
come back to life and bring ten mighty plagues (the usual stuff:
locusts,
fireballs, turning water into blood, etc.) to Egypt.  (Why?  I have no
idea.)  But the Egyptians are so concerned that the priest will one
day
rise from his grave that they appoint a group of soldiers to guard his
temple (rather like the Holy Grail society in the third Indiana Jones
film).
This elite group is maintained over the millenia, with sons taking
their
father's places as they die.
        Flash forward to 1925, as Rick O'Connell (Brendan Fraser) and
his partners Johnathan (John Hannah, Gwyneth Paltrow's boyfriend in
"Sliding Doors") and Evelyn (Rachel Weisz, who looks like she's
desperately trying to be Kate Winslet) undertake an archaeological dig
in
the city of Hamunaptra.  No points for guessing what they find and
accidentally unleash while they're there.  Soon the locusts are a
buzzin'
and the sores are a runnin' as our explorers try to defeat the
reincarnated
Imhotep, who plans to imbue his mummified lover with Evelyn's spirit.
        With me so far?  Good... then perhaps you've already noticed
some
of the same problems that I did.  Let's start with the 'Guardians of
the
Priest's Tomb' concept.  Look, if the Egyptians are so concerned that
a
dead mummy might one day come back to life that they actually bred
generations of soldiers to guard his tomb, why not just burn the body?
For that matter, if this particular curse is such a dangerous one, why
cast it in the first place?  If the guy is that evil, why didn't they
just
kill him back in B.C. times and be done with it?  If they hadn't
cursed
him, he couldn't have come back to life later, and there'd be no need
to
breed generations of guards.  It seems like a silly loophole to me.
Or if
they simply *must* curse the poor guy, is it really wise to bury the
tools
needed to bring him back to life within easy reach of anyone who
should
happen to find the tomb?  Ever think about storing them somewhere
else,
guys?
        I have no problem with films that require little or no
thought;
indeed, if "The Mummy" hadn't caused me to think at all, I could at
least
have enjoyed it as a strictly visceral experience.  As it stands, I
spent a
lot of time mentally cataloguing the numerous plot inconsistencies and
contradications (of which the above paragraph is only the tip of the
iceberg) when I should've been paying attention to the eye candy and
special effects.  Spotting the various plot holes gave me more
enjoyment
than the movie itself.
        It's not all bad, though.  Much has been written about
Universal's
complete overhaul of the Mummy character, and I must admit that
they've
succeeded in making him pleasantly creepy.  Gone is the moaning,
slowly-walking man in the white bandages, replaced by a formidable (if
obviously computer-generated) opponent with complete mastery over the
elements.  The Mummy actually succeeds in becoming an interesting
character!  (Now that's a sentence I never thought I'd write.)  Too
bad he
appears in so little of the movie-- the film is halfway over before he
puts in his first appearance; hence the laconic pacing I referred to
earlier.  Brendan Fraser also does fine work in his first
"action-hero" role.
Although the script attempts to paint the character as an Indiana
Jones
clone, Fraser succeeds in rising above mediocre material and being
genuinely likeable, just as he did in "Blast From the Past."  This is
a
man who knows how to play up to a camera, and the audience absolutely
loved him.
        The second half of "The Mummy" is actually kinda fun, though
it's not extraordinary-- it's standard popcorn fare, with a lot of
action,
great special effects, and some audience-pleasing quips and humor.
The
tedious opening scenes, however, go on far too long and don't contain
enough relevent information to justify their length.  People don't go
to a
movie called "The Mummy" because they want to see people sitting
around a table talking; they go because they want to be scared, have
fun,
and root for someone (be it hero or villain).  The movie's second half
realizes this, and it's no surprise that it's the more rewarding of
the two.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to: joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Never Been Kissed (1999)
        "Never Been Kissed" is the sort of film that would thrill
the cast of "Mystery Science Theater 3000," the legendary
television show which has elevated the process of watching
horrible movies into an art form.  They'd have a field day with
this film's attempted sentimentality, its happy-go-lucky acting
style, and the numerous jokes which fall far short of anything so
blatant as outright humor.  They'd also likely appreciate the
story's attempts to bring warm and fuzzy cheeziness to every
convention it attempts to embrace.  Ah, thank you, movie.
        If you've seen the trailer, you basically know every twist
of the story.  Twenty-five year-old Josie Geller (Drew Barrymore)
is a junior editor for the Chicago Sun-Times, though she dreams
of pursuing her passion: writing.  Her editor doesn't think she's
ready to be a reporter, but she finally gets her big break thanks
to her youthful appearance.  Her mission: go undercover as a high-
school student and write a series of articles about the trials and
tribulations modern teens have to face on a daily basis.  It's a
choice assisgnment; if she does well, it could break her career
wide-open.
        The problem is, Josie is much too conservative and spastic
to be accepted into the elite cliques she's supposed to be milking
for story material; she is even, horror of horrors, considered
"uncool."  Because of her plain, unattractive features (yes, Drew
Barrymore is playing an ugly duckling-- more on this later), she
is relegated to the outskirts of the school's social circle,
eventually befriending a fellow nerd named Aldys (Leelee Sobieski
from "Deep Impact").  Aldys appears to be a sweet, highly-
intelligent girl, whose biggest problem is her unusual name.  "Try
being named after a guitar-playing pussycat," laments Josie in a
joke that apparently flew over the heads of the fourteen year-olds
who filled the theater at my advance screening.
        Even among the monsoon of wretchedness currently
playing at your local cinema, "Never Been Kissed" stands out
as a shining beacon of irrelevance, a shimmering tower of
"Who Cares?".  None of us are strangers to bad movies, but
even so, it's fairly rare to get one which is not only clueless,
formulaic, and obviously tailored to the lowest common
denominator, but completely oblivious to its own lack of merit
as well.  "Never Been Kissed," bless its little heart, actually
seems to think it's telling the audience an entertaining story,
rather than one full of stereotypes and the cinematic cliches
we've seen so many times before.  It's rather like watching
"Casablanca," as performed by a group of first-graders.  It's
crude, shallow, and insulting.  I have absolutely no doubt it
will make at least a hundred million dollars at the box office.
        As anyone who has seen the trailer already knows, Josie
eventually blossoms into a creature of grace and beauty.  No
surprise there, and the sooner the better: the scenes with the
"ugly" Josie are among the most unintentionally funny that I've
witnessed all year.  Barrymore looks like a woman desperately
trying to hide the fact that she's a knockout, rather like Rachel
Leigh Cook in "She's All That."  No amount of crusty hairdos or
horrid, overdone zombie-esque makeup can hide the fact that our
star is hot stuff, and the way the movie expects us to simply buy
into the fiction shows us just how low Hollywood's opinion of the
average moviegoer's mentality is.  (See also "The Truth About
Cats and Dogs," "Hope Floats," and the aforementioned "She's
All That.")  Nonetheless, we are subjected time and time again
to cheap gags involving Josie's confirmed "loser" status while
the film meanders slowly towards its utterly predictable
conclusion.
        One thought ran through my mind like a mantra as I watched
this movie: if you're an adult who's so insecure that you require
acceptance from a group of high-school students, you've got bigger
problems than never having been kissed.  The film asks us to cheer
for Josie, even as she tries to befriend a group of people who would
make Ace Ventura look like a Jedi master.  Poor Josie falls in love
twice, once with her teacher (Michael Valtan), and once with the
school's O.D.M.O.C. (Obligatory Dashing Man on Campus).  It's all
sweet and gooshy and smarmy, but I wonder how innocent it
would've felt if Josie had instead been a twenty-five year-old
guy, picking up a seventeen year-old schoolgirl under false
pretenses.  Would the teenyboppers in the audience still have
cheered at the conclusion of the film?  Probably not.  Double
standards are "cool," you know.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to: joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for You've Got Mail (1998)
        "You've Got Mail," the new Tom Hanks/Meg Ryan extravaganza,
strikes a chord somewhere between 'engaging romantic comedy' and
'shameless product placement,' with very little manuvering room on
either side.  Not since "The Wizard," the late '80s film starring
Fred Savage and a bunch of Nintendo games, have I seen a movie so
determined to inspire consumer spending (in this case, the America
Online service).  It's one thing to have a character use a real-world
product in a film; it's quite another to have the film grind to a halt
while the product is shamelessly promoted by the characters.
        It's true that product placement, the process by which
vendors pay movie studios big bucks to get their wares up on the
screen for a fleeting moment or two, is a neccessary evil, allowing
the studios to offset the cost of shooting their latest $100 million
blockbuster.  If Hollywood can make an additional million dollars by
having Bruce Willis wear an Adidas cap in one scene, they're gonna
go for it.  I can understand this practice (even if I don't like it)
in an expensive effects-laden film.  I'm less eager to accept it in a
romantic comedy.  There are no special-effects costs to offset here.
        Joe Fox (Hanks) and Kathleen Kelly (Ryan) are both booksellers
in modern-day Manhattan.  Kelly is the owner of The Shop Around the
Corner, an intimate childrens' bookstore founded by her mother, which
has been serving the New York community for thirty years.  The store
is Kelly's passion: she knows every customer by name, and is
intimately familiar with each and every book on her shelves.  Nothing
gives her greater joy than helping a customer find just the right
selection.
        Joe is the manager of Fox Books, a mammoth Barnes and
Noble-type retail outlet which opens down the street from Kathleen's
store.  Soon the new arrival has usurped all her old business, and The
Shop Around the Corner teeters on the brink of bankruptcy.  Seeking
advice and reassurance, Kelly turns to the same place many people go
when they seek comfort: cyberspace.
        For quite a while, Kathleen has been corresponding with a
friendly guy she met in an AOL (America Online, for the uninitiated)
chat room.  Over the past several weeks they've become good friends,
but they have one unusual stipulation in their friendship: they don't
want to share any personal information with each other, including
their real names.  They address each other only be their handles
(Kathleen is SHOPGIRL; he is NY152).  Naturally, Kathleen's e-mail
buddy turns out to be none other than Joe Fox, her arch-enemy in
real-life.  The rest of the film chronicles their adventures as the
two engage in their inevitable descent into amour.
        Forgetting the issue of product placement, the biggest problem
I had with this movie is the lack of intimacy on the part of our two
protaganists.  Surely anyone who is as smitten as both Hanks and
Ryan's characters are would not be content to keep their e-mail on
such a cold, distant level, never opening up or revealing any personal
details about themselves.  (In fact, I question whether people truly
*can* become infatuated with each other when no personal details are
known.  Perhaps in real life, when physical beauty can make up for a
lack of information, but not in cyberspace.  Let me know your thoughts
on this subject, dear readers.)  The fact that they refuse to share
anything personal about each other, even their real names, positively
reeks of "forced plot contrivance"; ie, a screenplay that forces its
characters to do something that makes little or no sense, simply
because there would otherwise be no story.
        Director/co-writer Nora Ephron, who also worked with Hanks and
Ryan in "Sleepless in Seattle," based her screenplay on the Jimmy
Stewart classic, "The Shop Around the Corner" (in which the two
characters fall in love via postal letters, rather than e-mail).  If
her screenplay is a little heavy-handed at times, her direction is
quite adequate, and she coaxes strong, confident performances from the
entire cast.  Particularly fun is Parker Posey ("The House of Yes"),
who appears briefly as Hanks' girlfriend.  Greg Kinnear also appears
as Ryan's sweetheart, and is entertaining with his character's
puffed-up self importance.
        "You've Got Mail" is neither the best or worst of the current
crop of holiday films.  Occasionally simple-minded and perhaps fifteen
minutes too long, it is nonetheless light-hearted, and admittedly kind
of fun (particularly after Hanks discovers Ryan's identity, and
chooses to keep her in the dark a while longer).  Significantly, this
movie is one of the few non-animated films in recent memory to earn a
family-friendly PG rating.  And I hate to adopt the cliche', but I'm
hard-pressed to think of a better 'date' movie.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.  Or,
you can subscribe directly from my web page.  Thanks.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Governess, The (1998)
     Sandra Goldbacher's "The Governess" is, like Minnie Driver
herself, a creation of uncommon beauty.  Every frame of the
film shimmers with color and exquisite visuals, thanks to
Ashley Rowe's incredible cinematography and keen eye for
detail.  The lovely score from Edward Shearmur finds the proper
tone for every scene, never once intruding into the dialogue or
serving as a phony emotional cue (ie, "This is a sad moment, so
we'll beat you over the head with weepy violins now.")  Even
if it contained nothing but these items, the movie would still
be worth a peek.
     Fortunately for us, it also contains one of the year's
best performances.  Rosina da Silva (Ms. Driver) is the
educated, spirited daughter of a wealthy Jewish merchant,
living with her family in one of London's Sephardic communities
during the early nineteenth century.  Although content with
life, Rosina sometimes feels constrained by the demands imposed
on her by Victorian etiquette ("Try not to look so tall, dear,"
frets her mother).  Although she has no training, she dreams of
one day leaving home to become an actress, exposing her soul on
the stage for all the world to see.
     Her dream soon becomes reality, though not in the way
she'd hoped.  After her father passes away unexpectedly, the
family finds itself in desperate need of money.  Rosina, the
eldest daughter, decides to look for a domestic service job to
help the family struggle by, and she eventually receives an
offer to act as governess to young Christina Cavendish
(Florence Hoath) at the Cavendish family home in Scotland.  The
only catch: the devoutly Christian Cavendishs don't know that
Rosina is Jewish; if they did, she'd never be allowed to work
for them.  Needing the job, Rosina buries her heritage and
invents a Gentile persona named Mary Blackchurch.  If
questioned about her heritage, she plans to tell her employers
that her olive skin is the result of the (fictional) Italian
blood she received from her mother's side of the family.  Thus
begins Rosina's acting career... though it's far from what she
originally had in mind.
     After arriving at the Cavendish home, Mary quickly becomes
enamored with her employer, Charles (Tom Wilkinson, last seen
as the grumpy foreman in "The Full Monty").  Highly
intelligent, and charming in his own fumbling way, Charles is
working in an exciting new field known as "photography," though
he has not yet figured out how to keep an image from fading
mere moments after the picture is developed.  Rosina/Mary,
possessing an extensive knowledge of chemistry, begins to
assist him in his work.  Soon a strong bond forms between them,
the ramifications of which will change both of them forever.
     As usual, Minnie Driver devours her role, acting with such
skill and charisma that I forgot about everything in the world
except the story I was watching.  I wasn't looking at a movie
screen; I was gazing through a window into the nineteenth
century, watching a beautiful, intelligent young woman trying
to sort out her own tormented emotions.  Ms. Driver was
nominated for "Best Supporting Actress" for her work in
last year's "Good Will Hunting," though the award ultimately
went to Kim Basinger ("LA Confidential").  I predict another
Oscar nomination, and quite possibly a win, for her performance
in "The Governess."
     The material could have been approached in a number of
ways: as a Great Statement about prejudice, a commentary on
nineteenth-century social classes, a depiction of the maternal
relationship Rosina/Mary develops with young Christina, a
journey of female self-discovery, a steamy historical romance,
etc.  Director Sandra Goldbacher, however, has chosen to
include ALL these things in her film.  It's both the movie's
strength and biggest hindrance.
     Quite simply, there's a little too much story contained in
"The Governess"; at its conclusion, we're left with as many
questions as answers.  In particular, the final scene is
maddeningly vague, and we're left to ponder its meaning as the
end credits roll.  It's not a fatal flaw; the film still
resonates with enough simple truth that it can't be derailed so
easily, but the less interesting subplots (such as the ones
involving Charles' son Henry) do cause the pace to drag from
time to time.
     One other (admittedly petty) thing concerned me: why does
Rosina/Mary need to go to Scotland for a job?  Is no one in
London hiring?  Or England, for that matter?  There may well be
a good reason for this; my knowledge of Victorian Europe is
basically non-existant, but the question nagged at me while
watching the film.  If the script hadn't made it so clear that
Rosina was uncomfortable about taking a job so far away from
her family, I would've simply chalked it up to her spirit of
adventure.
     With that said, "The Governess" remains a film of rare
beauty.  Its wonderful acting, cinematography and music place
it a notch above the usual historical costume drama.  Only an
overly long running time and a slightly unfocused script
detract from its visual elegance.  This is a fine debut; if
Sandra Goldbacher can learn to prune her future work a bit more
liberally while keeping her direction and photography at this
level, she could very well emerge as one of Europe's most
interesting directors.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film: http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to: joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Title
Review for 200 Cigarettes (1999)
        Just as the 1970s begot a widespread cultural nostalgia
for all things '50s, the end of the '90s has brought forth an
eruption of longing for the '80s.  Filmmakers have been quick to
capitalize on this trend: witness "Boogie Nights," "The Wedding
Singer" and "The Last Days of Disco," three recent films which
used the '80s as joke fodder, to varying degrees of success.
        "200 Cigarettes," the latest entry in the 1980s nostalgia
wave, does not follow suit.  Dumb and lumbering, the film confuses
its quantity of characters with quality characterization.  Rather
than developing any of the relationships it establishes early on,
the movie simply piles more actors on the screen any time the pace
lags, making it virtually impossible to keep track of everyone
without making a chart.
        The story opens on New Year's Eve, 1981, and the Big Apple
is bustling with lonely people in search of sex partners with
whom to celebrate the special night.  Let's run down the list.
It gets complicated, so try to pay attention:
        Kevin (Paul Rudd) and Lucy (Courtney Love) are two friends
in search of a good time.  Kevin, who has just been dumped by his
girlfriend Ellie (Janeane Girafalo), would have preferred to sit
at home and mope, but Lucy convinces him to attend a New Year's
party with her.  It's a time to celebrate, she explains, especially
as it happens to be Kevin's birthday.
        Val and Stephie (Christina Ricci and Gaby Hoffman,
respectively) are two teenagers in search of the same party,
which is being hosted by Val's neurotic cousin Monica (Martha
Plimpton) and Monica's friend Hillary (Catherine Kellner).  But
when Val loses her cousin's address, the duo is stuck wandering
the streets without a destination.
        Ben Affleck is a handsome bartender whose company is
much desired by the aforementioned Lucy, plus two customers,
Bridget (Nicole Parker) and Caitlyn (Angela Featherstone).
The bartender, whose name is never given, promises to stop by
the much discussed party after he gets off work that night.
(What kind of bar closes before midnight on New Year's Eve,
anyway?)
        Meanwhile, Monica thinks her party will be a disaster:
apart from Hilary, only Eric (Brian McCardie), her Scottish
ex-boyfriend, has stopped by.  Eric doesn't want to party,
however: he only wishes to bombard Monica with questions about
his perceived sexual inadequacy.  (Bridget, his girlfriend for
the past six months, dumped him earlier that evening.)  But
Hillary and Eric soon hit it off, leaving Monica even more
depressed than before.
        Jack (Jay Mohr) and Cindy (Kate Hudson) are on their second
date, about to head to (you guessed it) Monica's New Year's party.
Jack is walking on air after discovering that he claimed Cindy's
virginity the previous evening, though she quickly grows tired of
his constant queries about the event.  ("Why me?  How was it?")
        In the interim, Val and Stephie (remember them?) hook up
with Tom (Casey Affleck, brother to Ben) and Dave (Guillermo
Diaz), a pair of friendly punks who are looking for a good time.
Val accommodates, although Stephie just wants to go home and spends
most of the film whining (very loudly) about this fact to anyone
who'll listen.
        Dave Chappelle, perhaps the funniest guest ever to appear
on Comedy Central's "Dr. Katz, Professional Therapist," valiantly
tries to anchor "200 Cigarettes."  He plays a cab driver (the only
one on duty in all of New York, apparently) who sees his job as an
opportunity to dispense advice to his customers.  He approaches
life as though he were a set of Isaac Hayes lyrics: everything
revolves around sex for him.  ("Music makes booty spin round!" he
cheerfully explains to a perplexed Kevin.)
        There's no plot, per-se; people exist here only to be
cross-referenced and indexed, not to advance a coherent storyline.
I scribbled page after page of notes while watching this movie,
trying to sort out the knotted web of relationships that the film
drapes over us.  It's not an easy task.  By the time the story is
over, most of the characters have been gotten jiggy with at least
one of the others, even though the relationships appear doomed
before they even begin.  The main question asked by the film seems
to be, "Who is going to leave Monica's party with whom?"  I have a
better one: "Who cares?"
        Most of the cast looks uncomfortable.  The usually
flawless Christina Ricci seems unsure of how to handle the Val
character, and chokes on her own Northern accent.  Ben Affleck,
given nothing of consequence to do, is content to stand back
and look pretty, giving brother Casey the chance to upstage him.
As for the rest of the cast, only Martha Plimpton, Brian McCardie
and Dave Chappelle really seem to come alive, emerging as
interesting people despite the screenplay's attempts to relegate
them to the background.  I don't blame the other cast members for
their performances, though: they had almost nothing to build their
roles upon.  Whether this is due to a poor screenplay by Shana
Larsen or simple inexperience from first-time director Risa Bramon
Garcia is unclear, although it may be a combination of the two.
        "200 Cigarettes" is bursting at the seams with characters,
so many that no one has the opportunity to emerge as anything more
than dialogue placeholders.  We don't once care about anyone here,
because they've breezed past us with such rapidity that we have a
hard time remembering who they were.
        The film also makes poor use of its setting: why set the
story in the '80s if none of the humor or drama reflects the time
period?  "200 Cigarettes" could have been set in 1999 with zero
changes to the script, apart from a throwaway gag involving Elvis
Costello in the final scene.  Had the date not been revealed as
1981 at the outset, I would have assumed we were watching a story
set in contemporary times.  Nothing about the slang, costumes or
hairstyles indicates otherwise.
        "200 Cigarettes" is an incoherent, sprawling mess.  Although
it does occasionally throw in a clever joke or gag, much of the
"humor" stems from unflattering stereotypes (such as Cindy's constant
clumsiness) or crude visuals (an unappetizing stain which appears
on the dress of one of the characters, for example).  Lacking all
but the cheapest of payoffs, "200 Cigarettes" deserves a warning
from the Surgeon General's office: "This film may be hazardous to
your intellect."

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to: joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com

Title
Review for Faculty, The (1998)
        It's not uncommon for teenagers to think all adults are from
outer space.  It's much less common, however, for them to be correct
in that assumption.
        "The Faculty," the new horror-thriller from director Robert
Rodriguez (El Mariachi, From Dusk Til Dawn) and screenwriter Kevin
Williamson (The "Scream" movies), is an interesting experiment.  A
unique (but not entirely successful) blend of gore, suspense and
comedy, the film plays like a high-speed collision between "Fast Times
at Ridgemont High" and "Invasion of the Body Snatchers."  The movie
tells the tale of a mysterious alien force which is taking over the
inhabitants of our lovely but ever helpless planet, one person at a
time.  The aliens take over the minds of humans by inserting a
slug-like creature into the victim's ear (opening scene of "Star Trek
II: The Wrath of Khan" anyone?).  But don't worry: six plucky
teenagers are on the case, so it'll all turn out okay in the end.
        These astute young heroes, a varied lot that includes the
geeky Casey (Elijah Wood), walking crack-house Zeke (Hartnett), spooky
goth-gal Stokely (Clea DuVall), school football legend Stan (Shawn
Hatosy), the incredibly sweet but none-too-bright Marybeth (Laura
Harris), and sexy head cheerleader Delilah (Jordana Brewster), are the
first to notice that something strange is happening.  The notoriously
ill-tempered Coach Willis (Robert Patrick, who you'll remember as the
evil terminator from "T2") is suddenly full of smiles and gentleness.
The mousy school principal (Bebe Neuwirth) starts dressing and acting
like a sex goddess.  And the entire faculty chugs enough water each
day to float an ark.  Naturally, the only explanation must be that
aliens are taking over the world.
        You all know I have a soft spot for ridiculously bad horror
films, as my review of "Halloween: H20" no doubt revealed.  It's a
good thing, too, because "The Faculty" is a ridiculously bad film.  As
with "From Dusk Til Dawn," Robert Rodriguez seems totally unsure what
kind of story he's supposed to be telling: a comedy?  Action?
Suspense?  A dark thriller?  Following the "more is better" principle,
he seems determined to throw all of the above into his movie.  The
result is a smorgasbord of different cinematic techniques, all of
which are competently done, yet somehow don't taste particularly good
when mushed up together.  C'mon, Robert, I've seen "El Mariachi."
You, of all people, should know that less can be more.
        If Rodriguez is at fault, however, it's only for being too
ambitious, and trying harder than the material really warrants.  Kevin
Williamson's screenplay makes no such mistake; in fact, it's such a
jumble that at times it seems to be on vacation.  Lacking the wit that
made the two "Scream" films such commercial (and critical) successes,
Williamson here seems to be playing it a little too safe.  His
dialogue lacks the fire and biting satire of his previous work.
Rather than pushing the boundaries of horror, this screenplay seems
firmly rooted in the very situations he mocked so brilliantly in
"Scream" and its excellent sequel.
       This isn't to say that "The Faculty" is without merit, provided
you know what to expect.  The special effects are adequate (though not
spectacular), the acting isn't bad, and the film's pacing is
excellent, a testimony to Rodriguez's directing/editing style.  I
actually had more fun at this film than my review may lead you to
believe.  You might, too, as long as you're not expecting "Citizen
Kane."  Or "Scream," for that matter.
  (If you're a diehard horror fan, add one star to the rating I gave
the film.)

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.  Or,
you can subscribe directly from my web page.  Thanks.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Haunting, The (1999)
I've noticed that critics all too often miss the point of movies these
days. Increasingly, film criticism seems to revolve around the process
of holding movies up to an invisible yardstick, with the film's
quality determined by its literary merit, or how well its themes
compare to established genre classics. Or, in English: movies are
often panned because they're not sophisticed enough. Although I've
probably been guilty of such cinematic elitism myself, I'm no longer
sure this is the right way to judge a film. Come on, admit it: there's
something to be said for a story which knows it isn't Great Art. After
all, movies were intended to be diversionary entertainment from the
very first days of cinema-- a way of temporarily forgetting about
life's problems and immersing one's self in another world. Despite a
century of evolution in the cinematic arts, audiences still haven't
lost their love for the occasional bit of passive, no-thought-required
entertainment. That's good news indeed for The Haunting, the new film
from Jan de Bont (Twister), which purports to be an adaptation of
Shirley Jackson's classic horror novel The Haunting of Hill House.  It
actuality, it bears only a passing resemblance to Jackson's work. 
First things first: The Haunting knows its place. It's not a great
movie, but it never tries to be. It only wants to generate good
old-fashion chills, the kind Bela Lugosi and Boris Karloff used to
scare up before audiences became jaded. And because the film is
unconcerned with anything other than providing visual (and visceral)
delights with all the bravado it can manage, it succeeds more often
than not at being entertaining. Its eagerness to please is strangely
affecting in that regard. 
The story: a psychologist named Dr. Marrow (Liam Nesson) is sponsoring
an insomnia study at Hill House, a gothic mansion straight out of Tim
Burton's wet dreams. The three volunteers who respond to Marrow's open
call for test subjects are a varied lot: there's the shy Eleanor (Lili
Taylor), sex goddess Theo (Catherine Zeta-Jones), and the bullish Luke
(Owen Wilson), all of whom are initially apprehensive about the
experiment but eventually come around. But Dr. Marrow has more tricks
up his sleeve: he's not a sleep doctor at all, but a scientist
studying the nature of fear. He plans to use his subjects to determine
why people react in certain ways when they're afraid. But Dr. Marrow
soon finds himself with much more than he bargained for after a number
of supernatural occurances begin to manifest themselves. 
Visually, The Haunting can not be faulted. The film contains some of
the most stunning sets and locations ever to grace a movie screen,
with dark, brooding shadows that tell us more about the house's untold
secrets than any amount of dialogue could ever hope to convey.
Everything looks great, with no shortage of atmosphere. The chills the
movie desperately wants us to feel are quite present during many parts
of the tale-- I nearly leapt out of my seat during a particularly
tense fireplace scene. 
The story is, alas, a somewhat weaker link. The biggest problem is the
slightly rough script which feels rushed-- not so much bad as
unfocused.  While Eleanor gets some token character development
throughout the course of the tale, we learn nothing whatsoever about
anyone else here with the possible exception of the house itself,
which becomes as much a character as any of the actors. And it's
always a shame when Liam Neeson, one of the finest actors working
today, is given nothing of consequence to do. 
Are these flaws severe enough to prevent audiences from enjoying the
movie? Probably not: most horror fans know that the plots in these
sorts of movies are absolute jokes, so we cheerfully overlook the
flaws as long as the movie delivers the desired level of creepiness.
And while The Haunting is not a horror classic, it does have enough
going on to make it consistently interesting. It's a fun,
slightly-above-average shudderfest that will promptly vanish from your
mind the instant you walk out of the theater. This is not a film
you'll carry with you the rest of your life, but if you're just
looking for some pleasant scares, you'll probably have a good time.
The cacophony of lights and sound also make it worthwhile for fans of
quality special effects. 

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film: http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write to:
joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com
----
"Average Joe" Barlow  (jbarlow@earthling.net)  MiSTie #73097
Joe Barlow on Film: http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
"The one good thing about the [life-size sticker of
 Jar Jar Binks on the door of Taco Bell] is you can
 pretty convincingly throw the SOB a roundhouse punch.
 I found it satisfying."   --Renard A. Dellafave

Title
Review for Blast from the Past (1999)
        "Blast From the Past" is the sort of film which makes
me pine for the bygone days of Hollywood, when studio-made
comedies were actually funny-- when wit and creativity, rather
than pratfalls and profanity, were the ingredients of
laughter.  "Blast From the Past" isn't the worst IQ offender
I've seen in recent months, although it may be the most
disheartening; after all, if a director is able to assemble
such a first-rate cast, why can't he give them a more
interesting story to tell?  Or at the very least, a more
interesting way in which to tell it?
        The tale itself certainly had potential.  In 1962,
as the Cold War continues to drag on, devoted family man
Calvin Webber (Christopher Walken) builds a luxurious,
self-sustaining fallout shelter beneath his modest California
home.  When the Cuban Missile Crisis hits its apex, Calvin
whisks his pregnant wife Helen (Sissy Spacek) into the
ground.  At that moment, a plane crashes into their house.
Calvin, detecting the flames and heat outside the shelter
door, naturally assumes that a nuclear bomb has been dropped
on the town.  Since the half-life of nuclear fallout is
thirty-five years, the couple begin their long wait...
unaware that the world above is perfectly habitable.
        Their son Adam is born almost immediately.  Lovingly
raised in this closed society and governed by his parents'
1962 morals and values, of which placing one's elbows on the
dinner table is the severest offense, Adam eventually grows
into an intelligent, polite young man (played by Brandan
Fraser), who, although happy, feels a sense of longing and
loneliness.  On his thirty-fifth birthday, he admits to his
mother that he's been thinking about girls "just these last
fifteen years or so."  And with these words, Adam is sent
out into the great big world to find his fortune.
        The problems begin with the story's pacing.  The film's
first-act is excruciatingly slow, due to the unnecessary amount
of exposition it thrusts upon us at the outset; indeed,
Brandan Fraser, the star of film, doesn't appear until nearly
30 minutes into the tale.  And the second-billed Alicia
Silverstone, who plays an unpleasant and unlikeable young
woman named Eve (the tale's requisite love interest), doesn't
appear until nearly a half-hour beyond *that*.
        Although Adam's adventures and interactions are
occasionally amusing, the story focuses on the wrong thing.
Rather than giving us insight into what he must be going
through psychologically, the film repeatedly tosses cheap
gags at the audience.  (An example: Adam has never heard a
certain four-letter expletive before, so his dad helpfully
explains that it's an archaic French word meaning "good."
Immediately we know that Adam will misunderstand and misuse
this word... not just once, but over and over.)
        There are a couple of excellent moments, where
Adam sees the sky (and later, the ocean) for the first
time; his sense of joy and wonder are contagious in these
scenes.  Had the film concentrated more on his feelings
and experiences rather than lame humor, it might have
been something special.  But these details are glossed
over: we don't feel a sense of awe when Adam meets another
human being for the first time.  After he gets lost in
the big city, we don't feel any sense of panic or terror
from him.  And when he sleeps at a hotel for the first
time, why don't we get a better sense of what he's feeling?
After all, this is his first night away from home!  (In its
defense, the film does mention this... but then it
immediately cuts to a scene required by the uninteresting
romance subplot, rendering Adam's emotions invalid.)
        The names of the characters (Adam and Eve) effectively
remove any suspicion about whether they will fall in love by
the end of the movie (and in case you miss it, one minor
character makes an observation that Adam's new home resembles
"the Garden of Eden").  But even without these clues, the
romance is foreordained: the film possesses neither the sense
of daring or originality needed to deviate from trite formula;
therefore, no matter how obvious it is to us that Eve is
completely wrong for Adam, she will eventually fall for the
big lug.  Cue the "happily ever after" music.
        "Blast From the Past" does succeed in generating a few
laughs, thanks to Fraser's effortless performance as Adam.
(Fraser has experience playing amiable goofballs, including
the title role in Disney's "George of the Jungle.")  His
effervescent charm is enough to make the movie bearable, but
only just.  That the film is as entertaining as it despite its
horrid screenplay is a powerful testament to Fraser's screen
presence.  The always entertaining Christopher Walken gives a
fun turn as Adam's quirky but well-meaning father.  But Sissy
Spacek feels miscast: at no time does she seem like anything
more than basic window dressing.  Come to think of it, that
criticism could be leveled at the entire film.
        It's a shame that this story wasn't handled with more
care, as it could've been fascinating.  A character study about
a family shut off from society for over three decades has the
potential for both humor and drama, though both are sacrificed
here for a formula romance that's neither involving or
convincing.  This story deserved better.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing
list.  Or, you can subscribe directly from my web page.

Title
Review for Next Stop Wonderland (1998)
        One of the biggest delights of Brad Anderson's "Next Stop
Wonderland" is the simple fact that our heroine, Erin Castleton (Hope
Davis), understands the absurdity of what's happening to her.  Beautiful,
intelligent, yet sadly cynical, Erin refuses to participate in the
standard romantic comedy cliches so prevalent in films of this type.
It's something we discover early on, as three men attempt to play a
cruel joke on her.  Erin cheerfully goes along with them, pretending to
be duped... then brilliantly turns the tables in one of the movie's
funniest scenes.  She's apparently seen "In the Company of Men."
        Being smart isn't enough to ensure her happiness, however.  Her
problems begin in the film's opening scene, in which her boyfriend Sean
(Philip Seymour Hoffman) uncerimoniously dumps her (via videotape, no
less) to go participate in an activist campaign.  Upon hearing the news,
Erin's mother takes matters into her own hands by placing a highly
misleading personal ad in the local paper, extolling her daughter's
virtues.  Erin, understandably furious by this invasion of her privacy,
nonetheless gives into curiousity and listens to her messages... all 64
of them.
        In another part of town, an aspiring marine-biologist named Alan
Monteiro (Alan Gelfant) is also unlucky in love.  He's the proverbial
"nice guy," eschewing the sexual advances of his friend Julie (Caro Buono)
because he'd rather wait for true romance.  His friends don't understand
his sensitive nature: when he complains that he can't find a woman he can
talk to, they burst into giggles.  "What are we, a bunch of chicks?" they
taunt.
        It's obvious that Alan and Erin are meant to be together, but
there's a small problem: they don't know each other.  Over the course of
the movie, we watch them almost meet on several occasions, but something
always happens to negate their encounter.  In the interim, Erin goes out
with many of the respondents to her personal ad (the "loser montage" is
wonderful) while Alan deals with some unpleasant events in his life,
including a gambling-addicted father and a career which isn't progressing
quite the way he wants it to.
        "Next Stop Wonderland" feels more "real" than the average
romantic comedy because it knows the pursuit of love is not a full-time
endeavor.  In the real world, single people go to work, pay bills, and do
things not related to the search for romance.  For this reason, the film
endeared itself to me: it doesn't seem like a fairy-tale, but instead
depicts a couple of everyday people coming to terms with being alone, and
not really minding it.  If they find love, great.  If they don't, they
know they'll survive.  It's definitely the right approach to take.
        Another small touch I liked: Erin practices a bit of philosophy
that I first encountered in Richard Bach's wonderful novel, "Illusions."
The technique states that one should never close an open book without
reading something from its pages, even if it's only a few words or
sentences.  Whatever you read will supposedly give you a clue to your
future.  The film uses this as a clever way to provide foreshadowing,
even though Erin (and we) don't always understand the clues initially.
("Linoleum?")
        "Next Stop Wonderland" has a lot to cover in its 110-minute
running time.  In order to fit everything in, writer/director Anderson
chooses to focus more on the big picture than the little details;
therefore, some subplots are not satisfactorially resolved.  These
include the sudden reappearance of Erin's ex-boyfriend, the fate of
Alan's father, and the outcome of a special assignment Alan is given,
pertaining to the aquarium he's employed at.  The big question is, will
Erin and Alan eventually meet and live happily ever after?  C'mon, it's
a romantic comedy.  What do you think?
        There's nothing really spectacular about "Next Stop Wonderland,"
but it tells its tale entertainingly and competently.  The script is
very funny, the characters are memorable, and the photography is highly
original (I found it interesting that Puff the Blowfish, one of the
aquarium's biggest attractions, is one of the film's most photogenic
characters).  I enjoyed the film a great deal.  If you don't typically
like romantic comedies, this one probably won't change your mind... but
if you do, I recommend you make "Next Stop Wonderland" your next stop at
the movies.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.

Title
Review for Civil Action, A (1998)
        How much are twelve human lives worth?  That's the primary
question director Steven Zaillian ("Searching for Bobby Fischer")
explores in his new courtroom drama, "A Civil Action," and boy, is
it a doozy.  Based on a true story, "A Civil Action" brings us
into a complex legal quagmire, explains the facts in an interesting
(if melodramatic) fashion, then leaves us to ponder the outcome as the
credits roll.  Little is truly resolved at the conclusion of the
tale... but for once, that's exactly as it should be.
        Something lurks in the drinking water of Woburn,
Massachusettes-- an unidentified substance which is robbing the
town's children of their lives.  Suspecting these deaths are
being caused by the toxic substances a local lumber company is
unleashing into a nearby river (which also doubles as the town's
water supply), a group of concerned parents hire personal injury
lawyer Jan Schlichtmann (John Travolta) to investigate.  A self-
professed "ambulance chaser," Schlichtmann is initially reluctant to
take the case, citing the low settlement the group could expect to
receive from such a financially-strapped company.  This reluctance
vanishes, however, after he discovers the company's ties to corporate
giant Beatrice Foods.  Schlichtmann has, of course, missed the
point entirely: the parents aren't seeking financial compensation for
the deaths of their children... merely a formal apology.  Alas,
apologies are not acceptable currency for Schlichtmann, and he pursues
the case purely as a means for financial gain.
        Assisting Schlichtmann are two colleagues from his law firm,
plus James Gordon (William H. Macy), the firm's accountant, who is
(justifiably, it turns out) concerned with the amount of time and
money the Woburn case is costing the company.  (Macy stole the show
for me, as he has in nearly every movie I've seen him in.)  Robert
Duvall is also fascinating as Jerry Facher, the eccentric Beatrice
Foods attourney who becomes Schlichtmann's arch-nemesis in the case.
His odd, nervous habits (bouncing a tennis ball during telephone
conversations, obsessing over an ink pen he finds during a meeting)
stand out all the more when compared with his shrewd, legal mind.  The
man is a brilliant lawyer, and Schlichtmann's firm knows it.
        The big strength of "A Civil Action," however, is Travolta's
cold, predatory performance as Jan Schlichtmann.  Conveying a hard,
self-serving streak which harkens back to his role in "Pulp Fiction,"
Travolta depicts Schlichtmann as a Scrooge-like landshark, interested
only in the money he can make from the misfortune of others.  The
film's opening scene, for example, is a chilling reading by
Schlichtmann of the relative worth of different types of people, as
seen by the court (most valuable on the list: rich, white males in
their 40s.  Least valuable?  "A dead child.")  Much of the story's
power ebbs in the second half, however, when Schlichtmann undergoes a
Grinch-like transformation from "stingy money grubber" to "moralistic
saint."  The change is a bit too sudden to be totally convincing, but
Travolta does what he can with the material.  His efforts are to be
commended, for he comes very close to pulling it off, despite the
lackluster writing in the film's final half-hour.
        "A Civil Action" is a better than average court movie,
probably because it concentrates on the legalities involved in such a
case.  It's made all the more fascinating by its basis in reality, and
fine acting.  Only Travolta's forced, Hollywood-induced spiritual
transformation makes it difficult to truly believe what you're seeing.
A pity.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.  Or,
you can subscribe directly from my web page.  Thanks.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Deuce Bigalow: Male Gigolo (1999)
"Deuce Bigalow: Male Gigolo" tips its hand from
the moment the theater lights go down.  In the first two minutes
of the film, all of the following events occur: (a) our protaganist
appears, nude, in a public aquarium, thereby allowing us a glimpse at
his bare bottom; (b) an old lady falls down a flight of steps; and
(c) a young lady's t-shirt gets wet, exposing... well, the fact
that she's not wearing any undergarments, for starters.  Most bad
films take at least ten minutes to reveal their wretchedness, so
give the movie credit for revealing its complete lack of
intelligence up front.  At least this way the audience develops
no expectation of quality or entertainment value.

Title
Review for Clash of the Titans (1981)
        Whenever I revisit a film like "Clash of the Titans,"
I'm simultaneously exalted and saddened-- exalted because
the movie is a tour-de-force of gripping, powerful storytelling,
and saddened because it makes me realize how much this
style of grand filmmaking belongs to a bygone era.  When
a movie like "Armageddon" becomes the highest-grossing film
of the year, it sends a very clear message to the studios: "You
have absolutely no reason to deviate from the commercially-proven
formulas you're using in all your other movies.  Give us more of the
same, please."  This increasing cinematic trend towards mediocrity,
particularly in the action-film genre, does not bode well for the
future.
        Well, prepare for a breath of fresh air, and check out
a classic you may have missed.  Directed in a beautifully
vibrant style by Desmond Davis, "Clash of the Titans" is a
brilliant, highly-stylized re-telling of the story of Perseus,
the Greek mythological hero who faced untold dangers and
obstacles in his quest for the fair Princess Andromeda.
Astonishingly photographed with equal parts light and
shadow, "Clash of the Titans," which celebrates its 18th
birthday this year, opens a window into the imagination and
allows it to soar for 118 minutes.
        As the story opens, Acrisius (Donald Houston), the
ruler of the seaside city of Argos, has condemned his only
daugher Danae (Vida Taylor) to death for a capital crime:
giving birth to a child out of wedlock.  Imprisoned in a
large wooden coffin, Danae and her young son, Perseus, are
hurled into the sea and left for dead.  Zeus (a magnificent
performance by Sir Laurence Olivier), however, has seen all
from atop Mt. Olympus, and for reasons which eventually
become clear to us, he spares their lives.  Displeased with
Acrisius's act of attempted murder, Zeus vows justice; soon
there are disasterous ramifications for Acrisius and his people.
        Danae and Perseus drift safely to the island of
Seraphos, where they are rescued and welcomed by the kind,
simple natives.  Their new home is a beautiful place, and
Perseus grows into a strong, handsome young man (played by
Harry Hamlin of "L.A. Law").  Happy and content in this
scenic paradise, they live carefree for many years... but alas,
the bliss cannot last forever.  The goddess Thetis (Maggie
Smith), displeased with the way Zeus has punished her son
Calibos (Neil McCarthy) with deformity, decides to seek
revenge.  Knowing that Zeus cares for Perseus, she magically
transports the young man away from Seraphos while he sleeps
on the beach.
        Perseus wakes in an ampitheater on the outskirts
of Joppa, alone, confused, and defenseless.  He is soon
befriended by Ammon (Burgess Meredith), a talented, amiable
playwrite who lives beneath the theater.  Looking for
information on his surroundings, Perseus visits Joppa,
where he learns of the beautiful Princess Andromeda (Judi
Bowker), imprisoned in the highest tower of the castle
which overlooks the city.  She's the victim of a curse by
Thetis; in order for it to be lifted, a suitor must correctly
answer a riddle.  If the riddle is solved, the suitor gets
not only Andromeda's hand in marriage, but half the kingdom
as well.  Death rewards those who guess incorrectly.
        Perseus, using great creativity (and the assistance
of the winged horse Pegasus), solves the riddle and is
awarded the hand of the princess.  This enrages the
tempermental Thetis, who orders the princess's
execution-- in thirty days, Andromeda is to be fed to the
Krakken, the last of the Titans, the mythological giants
which once dominated the Earth and its seas.
        The chances of Perseus defeating the Krakken look
bleak; as the Stygian witches inform him, "A hundred men
could not fight it; an army could not kill it."  But... perhaps
there's a small chance: the head of Medusa, the fearsome
Gorgon, whose face is so grotesque that it can turn any living
creature into stone.  But a desperate gamble is better than no
gamble at all, and Perseus sets off on his grand journey to save
the woman he loves.
        All the performances in the film are note-perfect.
Olivier is a formidable Zeus, quick to anger but possessing
a sly sense of humor and an occasional twinkle of mischief.
Burgess Meredith (from the "Rocky" films) is having a
marvelous time as Ammon, and Harry Hamlin's Perseus
never missteps or rings false; his conviction and dedication
to Andromeda are evident and applaudable--he's every inch the
hero.  I do question why Andromeda has a British accent when
no one else in the film does, but never mind.
        The stop-motion effects used to create the Krakken
and Medusa are the work of Ray Harryhausen (who also
co-produced the film), the legendary animator who created
the original "King Kong" (1933) and other noteable screen
creatures, including the creepy skeleton warriors in "Jason
and the Argonauts" (1963), a sort-of spiritual cousin to
"Clash of the Titans."  His work here was the last animation
he created prior to his retirement from the film world.  It
was a spectacular final note to a distinguished career--
although many call the special effects crude and unconvincing,
I think they're part of the fun: Harryhausen was going for a
classic, "epic" tone, and rather than being intrusive, I find
that they enhance the timeless feel of the story.  They're
naturally not as good as "Titanic" or "Star Wars," but I don't
think they were ever intended to be.  Like the stirring,
triumphant music by Laurence Rosenthal (the only orchestral
score that I prefer to "Star Wars," incidentally), the visual
effects are mythic in feel and convey the exact tone required
by Beverly Cross's clever screenplay.
        "Clash of the Titans" is an all-too-often overlooked
jewel of a film which has never received either the popularity
or critical acclaim that it deserves, and currently tops my
list of the movies I most want to see on DVD.  (I'd place it
4th on my list of all-time favorite films, just behind
"Casablanca," "Star Wars," and "Chasing Amy.")  Take a
break from the mindless action movies currently dominating
your video store's "New Release" display, and give this one
a try.  You might as well, since all the copies of "Armageddon"
are probably checked out anyway.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.  Or,
you can subscribe directly from my web page.  Thanks.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Walkabout (1971)
STARRING: Jenny Agutter, Lucien John, David Gulpilil
DIRECTOR: Nicolas Roeg
WRITER: Edward Bond (based on the novel by John Vance Marshall)
RELEASED: 1971
"We want water. That's as simple as I can make it. Anybody can
understand that." --The Girl, Walkabout 
Nicolas Roeg's Walkabout is quite literally a diamond in the rough.
It's difficult to name a single other film in which the setting
becomes quite so much a part of the tale, or another that is
photographed quite so lovingly. Freeze any frame and you have a
potential National Geographic cover shot. Every scene is deliberately
chosen for its cinematic effect, and there's not a moment in the film
which doesn't convey astonishing beauty--visual poetry, if you
will--even when the narrative is at its bleakest. 
But 'poetry in motion' is too simple a description for the wonders of
Walkabout; its success and brilliance stem not just from Roeg's
masterful use of the camera, but from the haunting, human characters
which inhabit this world. The film, an adaptation of the celebrated
novel by John Vance Marshall, follows the struggles of a fourteen
year-old girl (Jenny Agutter) and her little brother (Lucien John, son
of director Roeg) as they find themselves stranded in the Australian
outback after an excursion with their father ends in tragedy. 
An Aborigine boy (David Gulpilil) appears. He appears to be about
sixteen years old, and speaks no English. He's on his walkabout--an
Aborigine right of manhood in which a boy spends six months living in
the wilderness, surviving on his wits and hunting prowess. Realizing
that his two new friends are stranded, he travels with them, teaching
his companions (via gestures) how to survive in the Outback. 
To read the rest of this review, please visit:
http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/cc101.htm
This review is (c) Copyright 1999 by Joe Barlow, and may not be
reproduced without the written permission of the author.  All rights
reserved.

Title
Review for Good Will Hunting (1997)
STARRING:   Matt Damon, Robin Williams, Ben Affleck, Minnie Driver,
               Stellan Skasgard
DIRECTOR:   Gus Van Sant
WRITERS:    Matt Damon and Ben Affleck
RATED:      R (for adult language, violence, and sexual situations)
YEAR:       1997
SEEN AT:    Park Place 16, Morrisville NC
        True genius must be a hard thing to live with.  "Good Will
Hunting," the latest film from director Gus Van Sant (Drugstore
Cowboy), explores this concept through the eyes of a twenty year-old
who happens to be a mental giant, and is filled with self-loathing
because of it.
        Matt Damon is Will Hunting, a brilliant young man with
absolutely no ambition whatsoever.  He surrounds himself with losers,
a grungy ratpack which includes his best friend Chuckie (an engaging
Ben Affleck).  Most of the group's evenings are spent getting drunk
and/or looking for fights, two activities they never seem to grow
tired of.
        But there's more to Will than initially meets the eye.  Able
to flip through books at the rate of a page per second yet still
retain everything he reads, Will possesses the intellectual
equivalent of several college degrees, despite being a high-school
dropout.  His quick mind deconstructs even the most complex
mathematics into laughably simply equations, making him the envy of
every scholar he meets.
        This includes Gerald Lambeau (Stellan Skarsgard), an M.I.T.
professor who is the first to recognize Will's extraordinary
potential.  After Will easily solves an equation that has baffled
even Lambeau's most brilliant students, the professor comes to a
staggering conclusion: M.I.T. harbors one of the sharpest
mathematical minds the world has ever known... as its janitor.
        Yes, a janitor, for that is the extent of Will's ambition.
He walks around campus, emptying trashcans, mopping floors... and
solving the math problems Lambeau leaves lying around, simply because
he can.  By the time Lambeau realises what's going on, Will is in
jail, arrested once again for fighting.  The judge, who knows Will's
troubled past, does not wish to send him back to the streets, but
Lambeau intercedes.  If the judge is willing to release Will into
his custody, Lambeau promises he will find counseling for the boy,
plus keep him occupied with math-related work, which will hopefully
keep him too busy to get into more trouble.
        The math part is easy.  Finding a counselor willing to spend
more than ten minutes in the same room with Will, however, proves to
be a major challenge.  So clever is Will that he sees through every
psychiatric trick anyone tries to pull on him.  Desperate, Lambeau
calls in his old college roomate and arch-rival, Sean McGuire (Robin
Williams).  From this point on, the story focuses on the complex
relationship which develops between Sean and Will, with each man
determined to wear the other down, and neither willing to give up on
this goal.
        Robin Williams has never been better.  His performance as
Sean is so intense that the word "brilliant" simply doesn't do it
justice.  Of particular note is the tear-jerking monologue (performed
in a single unbroken take) that Sean recites to Will while the two
are sitting in a local park, experiencing what Will calls "a Taster's
Choice moment for guys."  This speech ranks right up there with
cinema's very finest.  Mr. Williams deservedly brought home the 1997
Academy Award for Best Supporting Actor for his work here; even if
the rest of the film had been horrible, this scene alone is powerful
enough to justify his nomination.
        Matt Damon is also very good.  He plays Will as an insecure
young man frightened by his potential; while not really malicious,
Will is slow to trust others, and automatically pushes people away
when they begin to get too close to him.  We see this in his
relationship with Skylar (Minnie Driver), a British student who falls
in love with him.  Their tumultuous romance forms one of the film's
emotional cornerstones, as well as providing the setup for the
story's bittersweet yet satisfying conclusion.
        "Good Will Hunting" is an emotional tour de force, running
the gauntlet from hilarity ("Do you like apples?") to heartache.
The script, written by stars Damon and Affleck, is smart and rich,
as are all the performances.  Never boring or uninvolving, the film
brings us deep into the world of a largely unsympathetic character
and makes him a "real" person.  Even as we recoil in horror at the
way Will treats Skylar, we understand *why* he acts the way he does.
His pain runs very deep; while that does not neccessarily excuse
his behavior, it does explain it.
        I read somewhere that Damon and Affleck's original idea for
the script was closer to James Bond: they wanted to write an
espionage/action film, with Will using his mental abilities to solve
a mystery while "bad guys" try to kill him.  Fortunately for us,
screenplays have a way of evolving into their own thing.  "Good Will
Hunting" is sweet, funny, touching, memorable, and the furthest
thing in the world from a ho-hum action movie.  It was one of my
favorite films of 1997.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.  Or,
you can subscribe directly from my web page.  Thanks.

Title
Review for Snake Eyes (1998)
        Paul Thomas Anderson's "Boogie Nights" wow-ed the critics last
year, and rightfully so: the film's frank portrayl of the pornographic
industry/drug culture of the late seventies was highlighted by a great
script, virtuoso acting, and some of the most innovative cinematography
ever seen in a low-budget film.  Virtually every review mentioned its
incredible opening shot, in which a "God's-eye-view" camera swoops down
from the sky, pans over the exterior of a popular night-club, then drifts
inside.  We then "walk" through the club, meeting our primary characters
as we dodge the dancers and waitresses.  This description may not sound
terribly impressive, but look closely: the shot was filmed in ONE
continuous four-minute take, with no cuts or edits.  The effect is
subtle, but it effectively draws us into the twisted world of the movie
by removing the cinematic devices (including edits) that tend to distance
audiences from the action.
        Director Brian De Palma, probably best-known for his famous film
adaptation of Stephen King's "Carrie," does Anderson one better with his
new movie "Snake Eyes."  In the opening scene, we meet Rick Santoro
(Nicholas Cage), a New Jersey police officer in charge of security at a
championship boxing match.  We follow Cage as he places a bet on the
match, fights a criminal, chats with both his wife and his mistress on
the telephone, hangs out with his best friend Kevin Dunne (Gary Sinise),
notices two suspicious women, watches the fight... and witnesses
a murder.  That's a lot to absorb in the opening scenes of ANY movie,
but get this: De Palma shoots it all in a single unbroken take, lasting
nearly twenty minutes!  It's a flawless performance from all involved, and
the actors never falter as the camera works its magic.  No matter what the
critics may think of the movie, this scene is going to get attention.
        The murder victim is an influential politician, heavily involved
with a secret government project (is there any other kind?) designed to
produce a new type of missile.  Santoro knows two things: other people
will die if the killer is not apprehended, and if he doesn't get to the
bottom of the case before the FBI arrives, his friend Dunne (who was away
from his post at the time the shooting occurred, violating the orders that
he'd received) may be blamed for the murder.  A tropical storm will
prevent the arrival of the FBI for ninety minutes, and the two men begin
their investigation.  The exits to the arena are sealed, and 14,000
people, one of whom is a killer, watch and wait.
        The film uses a creative technique to get us involved in the
mystery: we, the audience, never witness certain important events (such
as the boxing match, which contains an important clue) for ourselves.
Instead, we must rely on the recollections of the various characters, who
disagree with each other as often as not.  What really happened?  Who's
right?  This is the mystery that Santoro (and we) must find out.
        One of the many wonderful touches in this film is the passage of
time: one minute of screen-time equals one-minute of real time, so when
Santoro announces that they have ninety minutes to solve the crime, you
can set your watch by his word.  The film's attention to detail does not
rest there: one of our characters has very poor eyesight, and when she
loses her glasses early in the film, her subsequent scenes are shot out
of focus, giving us a window into her confusion.  The intelligence of the
movie is clearly shown via shots like this; De Palma clearly is a master
of drawing an audience into his world, something he demonstrated equally
well in "Carrie."  Our characters are consistently interesting, their
urgency is communicated, and the air of mystery is so high that when one
of our characters turns out to be something other then he/she initally
appears, we simply accept it.  We're too lost in this world to argue.
        Although we're not privy to everything, De Palma does allow us
access to certain information that the onscreen characters don't have.
In one scene, Sinise's character stands outside of a door, listening,
trying to decipher what he's hearing on the other side.  De Palma does
not leave us in suspense, though: the camera, initially behind Sinise,
rises, hovers over him, then gives us a peek over the wall and into the
room beyond.
        Another effective shot occurs later in the film, in which Cage's
character compares notes on the shooting with one of the "suspicious
females" he saw at the outset.  We get a "split-screen" display, in which
Cage's memory of the shooting is displayed in the left half, and the
woman's in the right.  They run tangent, in perfect synch, with only very
slight differences which reflect their own conflicting memories.  The
scene is brilliantly edited, and offers new insight into the crime.
Stylistic touches such as these make it impossible not to get drawn in.
        Sadly, it all comes undone in the film's final moments.  A major
plot problem: a murder has been committed, and the staff of the arena
knows that the police want to see all the security tapes that were shot
during the fight.  All of them are viewed, but the information they need
is not there.  Then, towards the end of the movie, an employee suddenly
remembers that he just installed a NEW, SECRET security camera that
very morning!  Sheesh, how do you forget about something like that?
        But the film's biggest offense is the final confrontation between
Cage and the villain.  It's an absolute joke: the outcome is decided not
by the chess-like strategy that the story has shown us thusfar, but by
dumb luck: imagine if, in the final lightsaber battle between Vader and
Luke in "The Empire Strikes Back," a giant asteroid had appeared from
nowhere, crashed through Cloud City, and knocked Vader down the exhaust
shaft.  That's the same ballpark as the plot-twist used to resolve "Snake
Eyes."  After being riveted by the movie up until this point, it was
impossible not to feel a bit cheated.  Pardon my crassness, but if this
film were a woman, she'd make out with you for two hours, rip off all
your clothes, then suddenly announce that she has to leave.  Sure, it's
fun at the time, but ultimately unsatisfying.
        Nonetheless, there's much to like about "Snake Eyes."  I'll
probably see it at least once more, if only for the flawless opening
scene and the other stylistic touches that typically mark De Palma's work.
I doubt I'll stay for the final fifteen minutes again, though.
This review was written: August 8, 1998
Copyright (c) 1998 by Joe Barlow.  This review may be freely distributed
as long as ABSOLUTELY NO CHANGES are made and this disclaimer remains
attached.  It may not be reproduced for profit without the written consent
of the author.  If you have comments or questions, please send them to:
jbarlow at earthling dot net (substituting the appropriate symbols, to
discourage spam).
-----
  "Average Joe" Barlow * MiSTie #73097 * Writer/musician/aspiring filmmaker
       jbarlow@YOURearthling.PANTSnet http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow
              {Remove YOUR PANTS to e-mail me.}        

Title
Review for True Crime (1999)
        I'll admit that I had high hopes for "True Crime," which may
partially explain the disappointment I feel after screening it.
Andrew Klavan's novel intrigued me, and seemed an ideal choice for
conversion to the big screen: it contains only a handful of major
characters, a great deal of tension, a riveting storyline, and
a number of thought-provoking questions about racism, guaranteed to
stick in the reader's mind.  Granted, it also includes lengthy
passages of exposition that, while perfectly suited to a book, would
only impede a cinematic adaptation.  I knew the conversion would be
a challenge for any screenwriter: he or she would have to be unafraid
to prune Klavan's chatty prose down to something that could be
reasonably covered in a two-hour film.  Even while reading the book,
I imagined how *I* might convert the novel into a screenplay: by
keeping the emphasis on the mystery, jettisoning the exposition, and,
above all, keeping things moving briskly.
        Clint Eastwood's adaptation of this involving novel does not
succeed in any of the above categories: rather than keeping the focus
on the story as a whole, we are repeatedly detoured into the rather
pathetic life of the story's protagonist, Steve Everett (played with
immense weariness by Eastwood himself).  Everett is a newspaper
reporter assigned to cover the impending execution of Death Row
convict Frank Beachum (Isaiah Washington), a black man accused of
murdering a white convenience store clerk over a $96.00 debt.
Beachum, however, has always claimed to be innocent, and something
about his story leads Everett to think he may be telling the truth.
Everett decides to investigate the case further, but time is not on
his side: Beachum faces a lethal injection in less than twelve hours.
        Sadly, Beachum is not the focus of the story, and that's
part of the problem.  I would've liked a better glimpse into the
convict's mind as he sat waiting to be executed for a crime he
claims he didn't commit.  The few scenes we get of Beachum coming
to terms with his fate (like when he tells his wife and daughter
goodbye) are haunting.  If only the tone had remained this honest
and intimate, "True Crime" could've been one of the year's most
touching and emotionally involving films; instead, we get far too
many scenes of Everett annoying nearly everyone he comes into
contact with as he bumbles through his investigation, culminating
in two well-worn staples of detective movies: a car chase involving
the hero and the police, and repeated close-ups of a clock on the
wall, counting down the seconds until Something Significant
happens.  By focusing on these items, the screenwriters have
sacrificed drama for cliche'.
        Clint Eastwood is a fine director, but as is often the case
when filmmakers star in the movies they're directing, he seems
reluctant to cut any scene in which he appears, even if these scenes
add nothing but length to the film.  We already know the film is on
a tight deadline, but the story is repeatedly placed on hold to
explore irrelevant tangents involving Eastwood's character: his
alcoholism, his failed marriage, his infidelities, his relationship
with his daughter, his poor work environment, etc.  I'm willing to
bet that Eastwood the actor overruled Eastwood the director during
the editing stages; why else would such a time-intensive story spend
so much of its length exploring Everett's backstory, rather than the
more time-critical issues at hand?  On more than one occasion I
wanted to reach into the screen, give Eastwood a firm shake, and
urge him to get on with it already.  In this film, he's not so much
Clint Eastwood as Clint Deadwood.
        "True Crime" is a thoroughly forgettable thriller that
begins to fade from the brain immediately after the end credits
roll.  Why in the world anyone thought we needed to see this much
of Steve Everett's life when the much more fascinating character of
Frank Beachum is right there on the screen, practically begging for
acknowledgement, is far behind me.  As is so often the case, the
most interesting components of this tale are rejected in favor of
formula details.  "True Crime" isn't just this movie's title: it's
also my opinion of the way this material was handled.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to: joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com

Title
Review for Governess, The (1998)
        Sandra Goldbacher's "The Governess" is, like Minnie Driver
herself, a creation of uncommon beauty.  Every frame of the film shimmers
with color and exquisite visuals, thanks to Ashley Rowe's incredible
cinematography and keen eye for detail.  The lovely score from Edward
Shearmur finds the proper tone for every scene, never once intruding into
the dialogue or serving as a phony emotional cue (ie, "This is a sad
moment, so we'll beat you over the head with weepy violins now.")  Even
if it contained nothing but these items, the movie would still be worth
a peek.
        Fortunately for us, it also contains one of the year's best
performances.  Rosina da Silva (Ms. Driver) is the educated, spirited
daughter of a wealthy Jewish merchant, living with her family in one of
London's Sephardic communities during the early nineteenth century.
Although content with life, Rosina sometimes feels constrained by the
demands imposed on her by Victorian etiquette ("Try not to look so tall,
dear," frets her mother).  Although she has no training, she dreams of
one day leaving home to become an actress, exposing her soul on the stage
for all the world to see.
        Her dream soon becomes reality, though not in the way she'd hoped.
After her father passes away unexpectedly, the family finds itself in
desperate need of money.  Rosina, the eldest daughter, decides to look
for a domestic service job to help the family struggle by, and she
eventually receives an offer to act as governess to young Christina
Cavendish (Florence Hoath) at the Cavendish family home in Scotland.  The
only catch: the devoutly Christian Cavendishs don't know that Rosina is
Jewish; if they did, she'd never be allowed to work for them.  Needing
the job, Rosina buries her heritage and invents a Gentile persona named
Mary Blackchurch.  If questioned about her heritage, she plans to tell
her employers that her olive skin is the result of the (fictional)
Italian blood she received from her mother's side of the family.  Thus
begins Rosina's acting career... though it's far from what she originally
had in mind.
        After arriving at the Cavendish home, Mary quickly becomes
enamored with her employer, Charles (Tom Wilkinson, last seen as the
grumpy foreman in "The Full Monty").  Highly intelligent, and charming in
his own fumbling way, Charles is working in an exciting new field known
as "photography," though he has not yet figured out how to keep an image
from fading mere moments after the picture is developed.  Rosina/Mary,
possessing an extensive knowledge of chemistry, begins to assist him in
his work.  Soon a strong bond forms between them, the ramifications of
which will change both of them forever.
        As usual, Minnie Driver devours her role, acting with such
skill and charisma that I forgot about everything in the world except the
story I was watching.  I wasn't looking at a movie screen; I was gazing
through a window into the nineteenth century, watching a beautiful,
intelligent young woman trying to sort out her own tormented emotions.
Ms. Driver was nominated for "Best Supporting Actress" for her work in
last year's "Good Will Hunting," though the award ultimately went to Kim
Basinger ("LA Confidential").  I predict another Oscar nomination, and
quite possibly a win, for her performance in "The Governess."
        The material could have been approached in a number of ways: as
a Great Statement about prejudice, a commentary on nineteenth-century
social classes, a depiction of the maternal relationship Rosina/Mary
develops with young Christina, a journey of female self-discovery, a
steamy historical romance, etc.  Director Sandra Goldbacher, however, has
chosen to include ALL these things in her film.  It's both the movie's
strength and biggest hindrance.
        Quite simply, there's a little too much story contained in "The
Governess"; at its conclusion, we're left with as many questions as
answers.  In particular, the final scene is maddeningly vague, and we're
left to ponder its meaning as the end credits roll.  It's not a fatal
flaw; the film still resonates with enough simple truth that it can't be
derailed so easily, but the less interesting subplots (such as the ones
involving Charles' son Henry) do cause the pace to drag from time to
time.
        One other (admittedly petty) thing concerned me: why does
Rosina/Mary need to go to Scotland for a job?  Is no one in London
hiring?  Or England, for that matter?  There may well be a good reason
for this; my knowledge of Victorian Europe is basically non-existant, but
the question nagged at me while watching the film.  If the script hadn't
made it so clear that Rosina was uncomfortable about taking a job so far
away from her family, I would've simply chalked it up to her spirit of
adventure.
        With that said, "The Governess" remains a film of rare beauty.
Its wonderful acting, cinematography and music place it a notch above
the usual historical costume drama.  Only an overly long running time
and a slightly unfocused script detract from its visual elegance.  This
is a fine debut; if Sandra Goldbacher can learn to prune her future work
a bit more liberally while keeping her direction and photography at this
level, she could very well emerge as one of Europe's most interesting
female directors.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.

Title
Review for Pleasantville (1998)
STARRING:   William H. Macy, Joan Allen, Tobey Maguire, Reese
                Witherspoon, Jeff Daniels, J.T. Walsh
DIRECTOR:   Gary Ross
WRITER:     Gary Ross
RATED:      PG-13 (for adult language and potentially disturbing
YEAR:       1998
SEEN AT:    Park Place 16, Morrisville NC
        "Don't judge a book by its cover" has long been the
motto of enlightened readers, who recognize that the story
contained within the pages of a novel often bears no
resemblance to the illustration on the front.  I'd like to
take this concept a step further and propose a new maxim for
moviegoers: "Don't judge a film by its trailer."
        Movie trailers (the "previews" which run before the
main feature) have been used to promote upcoming films for
almost as long as movies have been around.  Their job is a
simple one: entice the audience back to the theater at a
future date, just as a book cover's job is to get you to buy
the novel you're leafing through.  But beware: like all forms
of advertising, trailers often stretch the truth a bit.
"Chasing Amy," a thought-provoking comedy/drama from director
Kevin Smith, was depicted as a happy-go-lucky "bimbo" movie by
Miramax's ads.  And if I didn't see new movies as a matter of
course, I would have skipped "Dance with Me," a warm, rich
drama full of life and energy, because the trailer painted the
film as two hours of Vanessa Williams shaking her tushie while
Kris Kristofferson stood around, looking confused.  The
trailers for "The Truman Show" and "Ransom" are equally bad...
though the ads for "Pleasantville" aren't far behind in terms of
quality.  (Joe's trivia question for the day: why are movie
ads called "trailers" when they run BEFORE the movie?  Answer
given at the end of this review.)
        As anyone who's seen the trailer can tell you,
"Pleasantville" revolves around two modern teenagers, David
(Tobey Maguire) and Jennifer (Reese Witherspoon), who are
magically transported into the fictional world of David's
favorite television show, a Mayberry-esque community called
Pleasantville.  The year is 1958, the weather is always
perfect, the universe (including David and Jennifer) is in
black and white, Perry Como rules the airwaves, and dinner
is always on the table when "Dad" (William H. Macy) gets home
from work.  David is delighted to be living in a simpler
time, but wild-child Jennifer is aghast at the lack of sex,
cigarettes and MTV... and decides to impart some of her
worldly knowledge to the citizens of the town.
        Jennifer's actions have unforeseen ramifications,
however: as she (and David, to a lesser extent) encourage the
other citizens of the town to change and evolve, the former
idyllic paradise of Pleasantville is rocked to its foundation.
The basketball team no longer wins every game.  "Mom" suddenly
doesn't feel like making dinner for "Dad" every night.  Teenagers
discover other things to do in the bushes besides hold hands.
Rock and roll (gasp!) becomes the music of choice.  And, for the
first time ever, REAL COLOR begins to appear in the town...
sporadically at first, but with increasing frequency, sending
mayor Bob (the wonderful J.T. Walsh, who died during the making
of the film) into a deep panic.
        The trailer gives the impression that the movie is a
screwball comedy, but make no mistake: "Pleasantville" is a
drama, and a damn fine one at that.  Sure, there are several
funny moments: the Pleasantville Fire Department are experts at
getting cats out of trees, but seem woefully unequipped to deal
with an actual fire.  "Mom" likes to make sure her kids start
the day off with a REALLY BIG breakfast.  And the scene in
which Jennifer explains sex and the concept of masturbation to
her ultra-straight "mother" is worth at least two-thirds of the
ticket price by itself.  But writer/director Gary Ross (the man
who brought you "Big") also devotes a significant amount of the
film's two-hour running time to more serious issues like racism,
the loss of innocence, and finding the courage to follow your
dreams despite what others think.  None of these issues are
particularly original, but the movie handles them so uniquely
that they feel like a breath of fresh air.  There are no guns,
no car chases, no nudity... just a solid, entertaining story
which flawlessly captures the feel of shows like "Andy Griffith"
and "Leave it to Beaver," feeling like fifty-percent homage
and fifty-percent satire (look for an amusing cameo by Andy
Griffith's sidekick, Don "Barney Fife" Knotts).  We also get
plenty of great "fish out of water" comedy; in many ways,
"Pleasantville" reminded me of a slightly more cerebral "Back
to the Future."  But the overall tone of the story is quite
serious, and there's a good deal of both sadness and personal
triumph contained in the movie.
        I had pegged "What Dreams May Come" as a shoo-in for
"Best Special Effects" or "Best Technical Innovation," but now
I'm not so sure.  "Pleasantville" is a visual marvel, seamlessly
integrating color and black and white into the same shots for
much of the film's duration.  You have to see it to believe it,
particularly the scene in which David and his gal-pal take a
drive in the country.  One of the nicest things about the movie's
colors is that they all have a faded, neon-esque quality to them,
akin to what you might find in a 1950s film.  It's a perfect
(and subtle) note of nostalgia.
        This is the second movie this year (after "What Dreams
May Come") to completely astonish me.  Beautifully photographed,
cleverly written, and always fascinating, "Pleasantville" should
not be missed by anyone.  Its ambiguous ending leaves a number
of major questions unanswered (What was Don Knotts's character
REALLY up to?  How does Jennifer cope with the situation she
finds herself in at the conclusion of the story?), but rather
than being a detriment, I actually found that these unresolved
issues gave me a lot of food for thought after the end credits
began to roll... and that's something that all too few films do
these days.
        (Answer to the trivia question: in the '40s and '50s,
advertisements for upcoming movies were typically shown AFTER
the feature film, hence the term "trailer."  The end credits
for movies are much longer now than they were then, and most
people leave before the credits are finished; as such, the
ads are now shown before the main feature, although the term
"trailer" is still used.)

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.  Or,
you can subscribe directly from my web page.  Thanks.

Title
Review for What Dreams May Come (1998)
        In some respects, "What Dreams May Come" reminds me of
Richard Bach's "Johnathan Livingston Seagull," a book which
sparked my imagination with an intensity that few other works
of art have ever equaled.  It was a novel that challenged the
way I approached the very concepts of religion and spirituality.
Although I didn't agree with every aspect of the story (and still
don't, incidentally), the sheer beauty of its presentation was more
than enough to make up for its shortcomings; when I finished
reading it, I found myself deeply moved by both its power and
message.  Walking out of an opening-day screening of "What Dreams
May Come," I felt a similar sense of awe... even though, once again,
I didn't agree with everything that was said.
        A brief collection of scenes, displayed during the film's
opening credits, sets the plot in motion.  Chris Nielsen (Robin
Williams) and his wife Annie (Annabella Sciora) meet while on
vacation in Europe; soon, they fall in love and marry.  They
eventaully have two children, but Fate has a nasty shock in store:
both kids are killed in a car accident while in their teens.  Annie,
who asked the housekeeper to drive the kids to school that day,
blames herself for their deaths, figuring that things may have
turned out differently if she'd been behind the wheel.  Years pass,
and the couple's emotional wounds slowly heal.  Then one day, Chris
offers to run an errand for Annie; while doing so, he is killed in
another car accident.
        Chris's soul, after coming to terms with his death, makes
the journey up to Heaven.  He finds a place of such astonishing
beauty that I will not even attempt to describe it with words;
suffice it to say that the film's visuals are among the most
awe-inspiring ever captured on celluloid.  Heaven, it seems, is
somewhat like the Holodeck from "Star Trek": it can be completely
customized, based on the wishes of its occupant.  Everyone's Heaven
is different: because Chris was such a fan of art in life, he
chooses to live in a world comprised of painted landscapes, like
those Annie used to create.  Albert (Cuba Gooding Jr.), Chris's
spirit guide and friend, teaches him to manipulate his environment,
and in time Chris is even reunited with his children.  The only
thing missing from his world is Annie, who he wistfully watches
from afar.
        But Annie, nearly comatose with grief after losing her entire
family, decides that she no longer has any reason to live; soon
after Chris's death, she takes her own life.  Chris assumes that his
wife will now join him in eternal paradise, but it is not to be:
suicide victims are forever barred from the rewards of the afterlife,
and he can only watch helplessly as Annie is sent to Hell.  Despite
the wonders of Heaven and the reunion with his children, Chris
refuses to spend eternity without his soulmate, and decides to
gamble his own soul in a desperate attempt to save her.
        To say that Robin Williams is excellent in his role would
be redundant, as the man is incapable of being anything less; also,
Cuba Gooding Jr. is the very picture of warmth and patience as the
understanding spirit who helps Chris make the awkward adjustment
from life into death.  Best of all may be Annabella Sciora's
portrayl of Annie: it's she who undergoes the greatest number of
emotional changes over the course of the story, yet she always
remains a fascinating (if occasionally unsympathetic) character.
But Max von Sydow, who plays a helpful "soul mercenary" named The
Tracker, is significantly less interesting: he adds little to
the story except some vaugely philosophical dialogue that doesn't
really go anywhere.
        The truth is, the characters in this film take a back seat
to the experience of just *watching* the thing; in that regard, I
was reminded of "Brazil" and "2001: A Space Odyssey."  The movie is
far from perfect, and the unneccessarily "cute" final scene does much
to undermine the previous fifteen minutes of the story, all so
the filmmakers' can make the audience go "Aww."  The biggest problem,
however, is the simple fact that we don't see enough of our heroes'
"lives" after they die; instead, the film presents us with so many
tedious flashbacks that the story screeches to a halt nearly every
time one appears on the screen.  In addition, the cloying score from
composer Michael Kamen actually crosses that fine line which separates
sentimentality from self-indulgence, and we're forced to listen to him
throttle the audience's emotions with a sweeping arrangement of
strings that never lets you forget that you're supposed to be sobbing
into your popcorn.  It's even worse than the score for "Volcano," a
feat I thought was impossible.
        But none of that really matters.  "What Dreams May Come" is
so strikingly original that it's worthy of respect and serious
analysis, despite the occasional flaw.  There's an undeniable
grandeur to the production, an epic quality that raises the film
from mere cinema into a sensory odyssey.  Director Vincent Ward had
no interest in making a timid film, and indeed he hasn't; for that
reason, I'm willing to give the story some slack.  I highly
recommend that you see this movie with several of your closest
friends.  Afterwards, go get a cup of coffee and discuss what you
just saw.  I promise, it'll keep you talking for the rest of the
evening... and maybe the whole week.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.  Or,
you can subscribe directly from my web page.  Thanks.

Title
Review for Message in a Bottle (1999)
        Robin Wright Penn seems to be pining for Helen of Troy's job
recently.  In "Forrest Gump" she played Jenny, the drug addict that
Forrest names his shrimp boat after.  In her newest film, "Message in
a Bottle," she is the inspiration that prompts a man who thought he'd
never know love again to rediscover his passions for both the ocean
and boat building.  With these two roles, Wright Penn becomes the face
who launched... well, two cinematic ships.
        She also gives a performance that's one of the few genuine
pleasures in the movie, which never really seems sure of its bearings.
It missteps badly and frequently, giving us one interesting set-up
after another then cheerfully relegating them to the background any
time the film threatens to get too interesting.  I can picture the
screenwriter sitting at his desk, ticking off items from his mental
checklist as he worked on the final draft: Have I included a fist-
fight?  Check.  A sex scene?  Got it.  The mandatory conflict, in
which one of our protagonists rejects the other's affections for
no particular reason?  Yep.  A death whose only purpose is to
generate involuntary weeping from the audience?  Most definitely!
        Theresa Osbourne (Wright Penn) is a journalist for the Chicago
Tribune, a hard worker, but longing for love in the wake of an
unpleasant divorce.  While vacationing at the beach, she comes across
a glass bottle partially buried in the sand.  Inside is a love letter
so elegantly written that she burns afire with questions about the
unknown author.  "Dear Catherine," the note begins; as Theresa
continues
to read, she learns of a heartbroken lover who has lost his wife and
can find no purpose in his existence without her.  Theresa is haunted
by the writer's story, and upon her return to Chicago she shares the
letter with her co-workers at the Tribune.
        Charlie (Robbie Coltrane), the editor of the paper, decides to
run the letter as a human-interest story ("This is bigger than the
low-fat muffin scandal!").  Much to everyone's surprise, the Tribune
is soon flooded with reports of other letters seemingly written by the
same author.  Theresa puts the pieces together and eventually
identifies
the heartsick writer as Garret Blake (Kevin Costner), a widower who
resides in North Carolina's Outer Banks.  Deciding she has to meet
this
poetic man, Theresa pays him a visit.  No points for guessing that a
romantic relationship blossoms between them.
        And that, in a nutshell, is the biggest problem with "Message
in a Bottle"; there are no points for guessing *anything*.  This is
strictly formula filmmaking, never deviating from the tried-and-true
methods which have graced romance movies for decades.  Why, for
example, does Theresa not reveal to Garret that she knows about the
letters he wrote to Catherine?  Because otherwise there could be no
scene in which Garret discovers the truth for himself.  We'd miss out
on the requisite teary argument in which Garret tells Theresa how hurt
he feels over being deceived, and we wouldn't get to see him walk out
on her, a crisis that's necessary so the couple can get back together
in the final act.  You all know the drill.
        A bit of advice for the filmmakers: if you are fortunate
enough
to have Paul Newman in your movie, don't waste him.  Newman plays
Dodge Blake, Garret's cantankerous father, who projects a personality
of grit and nails but has a wise heart underneath.  Newman is in fine
form here, imbuing his character with humorous mannerisms and the
fortune-cookie wisdom that all cinematic dads instinctively possess.
He's far more interesting than Garret (a subplot involving Dodge's
possible alcoholism is never developed as fully as it deserves to be),
and that's part of the trouble: Dodge is such a joy to watch that the
movie plods when he's not on the screen.
        The film has a moment about fifteen minutes from the finale
which would be a perfect place to end this tale; it seemed like such
an obvious stopping point that I actually reached for my coat.  But
no,
the story has an unnecessary quarter-hour tacked on after it, which
only serves to capsize the preceding 120 minutes and render them
completely invalid.  It's one of the worst endings I have ever seen,
because it serves no purpose other than to provide a cheap (and
emotionally manipulative) effect.  "Patch Adams" fans will love it.
        "Message in a Bottle" is all over the map.  The film makes
much of the fact that both of the characters are searching for someone
to be their emotional compass; their "true north," so to speak.
Unfortunately, the movie needs its own sense of direction.  As it
stands, we have a classic case of the blind leading the bland.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to: joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Billy's Hollywood Screen Kiss (1998)
        Much of what I liked about "Billy's Hollywood Screen Kiss,"
the new gay romantic comedy from Tommy O'Haver, stems from what the
film DOESN'T do: it doesn't degenerate into trite melodrama, it
doesn't revel in its gayness, and it doesn't adhere to stereotypes.
With the exception of a drag queen or three, the gay characters
aren't flamboyantly over-the-top, the straight characters aren't
homophobic bastards, and everyone basically gets along.  Wishful
thinking on the director's behalf?  Perhaps... but O'Haver knows
that a romantic comedy isn't typically the right place for a Great
Statement, and he doesn't attempt to make one.  I applaud him for
it.
        What he gives us instead is a charming story about a gay
photographer named Billy (the extremely pleasant Sean P. Hayes), who
has a dream project: he wants to reshoot some of Hollywood's classic
movie kisses... but using only men, rather than heterosexual couples.
While looking for models to use in this project, Billy spies an
attractive waiter named Gabriel (Brad Rowe) at a local coffee shop,
and decides that he'd be perfect for the shoot.  The only problem
is, Gabriel's straight.
        This doesn't stop the two of them from becoming friends,
however... and soon Gabriel is giving Billy indications that maybe,
just maybe, his sexual preference is not as concrete as Billy had
originally thought.  That could be very good news for the lovestruck
photographer, who's having a hard time keeping his feelings in check
with his new friend.  Thus do we have "Chasing Amy," but from the
gay point of view.
        "Billy's Hollywood Screen Kiss" tells its story with
sweetness, intelligence, and an almost childlike glee; although it's
hardly the first gay-themed romantic comedy, it skips along at a
happy, lighthearted pace, unencumbered by the Serious Messages
which all too often weigh down films of this kind.  Creative
directorial touches, such as Billy's wistful dreams about Gabriel,
or the narrated Polaroid montages used to depict off-screen events,
keep things interesting even when the narrative becomes unfocused,
which does happen in a few scenes.
        The performances are overall quite strong, with Sean P.
Hayes' depiction of Billy being particularly praiseworthy.  Director
O'Haver couldn't have picked a better actor for the role: Hayes has
that intangible charismatic quality that can make or break a
character, and the utter sweetness he brings to Billy makes the film
an utter joy.  Brad Rowe is also fun as the sexually-confused
Gabriel, although Gabriel's final scene is a bit of a disappointment;
it's one of the few moments which seemed totally unbelievable to me.
Meredith Scott Lynn brings a touch of sass to her role as Billy's
(hetero) female roommate Georgeanna, which helps spice up the
slightly downbeat second half of the film.
        Wisely, "Billy's Hollywood Screen Kiss" does not attempt to
either apologize for or justify the fact that most of its characters
are gay, which is one of the few nitpicks I had with "Chasing Amy."
The protagonists feel like real people, who basically like themselves
and are happy with who they are.  It's a nice touch; like "Smoke
Signals," this film gave me a better understanding of a culture I
had very little knowledge of.  I enjoyed the time I spent with both
movies, and their respective inhabitants.
        One of the nicest discoveries for me was the simple fact that
the story didn't really revolve around the issue of sexual
preference.  There's no reason the film couldn't have worked just as
well if Billy had been a straight guy, trying to charm a female
waitress who was reluctant to model for him; as such, we can all
relate to Billy's plight.  Surely everyone has, at one time or
another, been infatuated with a person and been unsure if their
response indicated a mutual attraction or merely polite indulgence.
That's undoubtedly an issue that spans both genders, and all forms
of sexuality.
        The script is extremely funny; one of my favorite gags
involves a recurring character named Lance who keeps popping up at
odd moments, forcing Billy to wonder if he (Lance) is stalking him.
The dialogue sparkles; I laughed out loud several times, as did the
predominately gay audience with whom I viewed the film.  Although
the screening I attended consisted almost entirely of male couples,
everyone, regardless of sexual preference, came out of the theater
smiling and laughing together.  That may be the greatest praise I can
give this, or any, movie.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.  Or,
you can subscribe directly from my web page.  Thanks.

Title
Review for Antz (1998)
STARRING (the voices of): Woody Allen, Sharon Stone, Dan
Ackroyd, Sylvester Stallone, Gene Hackman, Danny Glover, Anne
Bancroft
DIRECTORS: Eric Darnell, Lawrence Guterman, Tim Johnson
WRITERS: Todd Alcott, Chris Weitz, Paul Weitz
RATED: PG
RELEASED: 1998
   "Handling dirt is not my idea of a rewarding career,"
laments Z, the tiny, unwitting hero of Dreamworks' remarkable
animated odyssey, Antz. His frustration is understandable, for
he lives in a rigid society that eschews individuality.  All
ants are expected to march, walk, think, and even dance in
exactly the same fashion-- not good news for someone like Z,
who longs for fun and love, even if it means reducing
productivity.
   The colony's social pecking order is well established; at
birth, all ants are sorted into one of two groups: "workers,"
who construct tunnels, or "soldiers," who defend the colony
against predators. Although society has deemed him a worker, Z
(voiced by Woody Allen) could more aptly be called a dreamer;
his mind wanders constantly, and his co-workers consider him a
clumsy weakling who can lift a "mere" ten times his body
weight.
   Z's luck changes when he meets a fascinating gal named Bala
(Sharon Stone) at the colony's saloon. They have fun together,
but she's way out of his league: not only isn't she a worker,
she's royalty-- the daughter of the Queen (Anne Bancroft)
herself! But even so, the lovestruck Z can't forget her. He
convinces his best friend, a soldier ant named Weaver
(Sylvester Stallone), to switch places with him for one day,
which will hopefully give Z the chance to speak with her again.
It's a sound plan, but unexpected complications creep in when
the soldiers are suddenly ordered to defend the colony against
a possible termite invasion. Z, woefully unprepared for battle,
suggests alternatives to combat ("Can't we just influence their
political maneuvers via campaign contributions?"), but to his
chagrin the confrontation is unavoidable.
   Antz is a thoroughly involving film, filled to the brim with
lovingly constructed visuals and a number of clever plot
twists; the summary I gave in the preceding paragraphs reveals
only a very small portion of the storyline. If it contained
nothing more than entertaining visuals and humorous characters,
the story would be perfectly acceptable.  But the creators
didn't rest on their laurels; surprisingly, Antz sneaks a fair
amount of social commentary into its frames. It's not hard to
recognize ourselves and modern society in the film, which is
perhaps the reason the tale works so well: we all know people
who act like the various inhabitants of the ant hill.
   The intelligence of the screenplay was one of the biggest
(and nicest) surprises for me; in addition to the predictable
(though admittedly well done) gags involving magnifying glasses
and picnics, Antz depicts a level of religious satire uncommon
in what's ostensibly a kid's movie.  How?
   While watching the film, it occurred to me that Z is
essentially playing the role of a Christ figure: he becomes a
teacher to the masses and is denounced by naysayers ("Does Z
really care about us? Then where is he?"). In the finale, Z's
selflessness saves the other ants, although he "dies" in the
process... only to return from the dead. Hmm. I guess it's
possible the filmmakers didn't intend any of these scenes to
have religious overtones, but they seemed pretty obvious to me.
Social satire also appears: the film's biggest laugh comes when
an insightful worker ant experiences a revelation: "The workers
control the means of production!"
   The final shot of Antz borders on brilliant: the "camera"
lifts up out of the ant hill and pulls further and further
back, until we see that all the grand sights and visuals that
have taken place over the course of the story occurred only a
few yards from each other. The message is clear: perception is
everything, and even big problems don't seem so insurmountable
after you get some distance from them. It's a message we'd all
do well to remember.
Copyright (c)1998 by Joe Barlow. This review may not be
reproduced without the written consent of the author.
E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film: http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to: joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com.
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Title
Review for Rush Hour (1998)
        Let me get this off my chest before we go any further: I hate
Chris Tucker.  I mean it.  I'd love nothing more than to wrap my
hands around his goofy little neck and just SQUEEZE, giggling with
maniacal laughter as his face contorts into an expression even more
spastic than the one he usually wears.  I'm not a violent person by
nature, but there's just something about his "fingernails on a
chalkboard" voice, coupled with his jittery "let me get right in your
face" attitude, that grates on every fiber of my being.
        By contrast, I adore Jackie Chan; his sunny screen
personality and hilarious physical humor can win over even the most
jaded critic.  Rarely seen without his trademark grin, Chan is one of
those rare celebrities (like Leslie Neilsen, during his heyday) whose
mere appearance on the screen can cause you to smile: even if he's
not doing anything funny, your face feels the need to prepare itself
for the laughter it knows is forthcoming.  Chan's secret: he plays UP
to the audience, going so far as to perform all his own stunts because
(as he claimed in a recent interview), "that's what the fans expect."
Now THAT'S dedication to one's craft.
        The pairing of these two vastly different comedians is an
intriguing concept, one that could've succeeded brilliantly or failed
miserably.  Did director Brett Ratner channel Chan and Tucker's
conflicting comedic styles into a coherent film?  Happily, yes.
"Rush Hour" is a wild ride, a pleasant, giddy marriage of mirth and
action, with Chan's physical humor serving as a nice counterpoint to
Tucker's loud, verbal comedy.
        James Carter (Tucker) is a Los Angeles cop with a penchant
for annoying his boss, his co-workers, and pretty much everyone else
he encounters.  After his latest undercover assignment ends in
disaster, Carter's superiors are looking for an excuse to get him out
of their hair for a while.  Their chance arrives when the daughter of
a wealthy Hong Kong politician is abducted.  The politician, Mr. Han
(Tzi Ma), distrusts the American law enforcement agencies and wishes
to bring in one of his own men: Detective Lee (Chan).  The American
authorities instruct Carter and Lee to partner up, intending to keep
the bumbling pair busy with grunt work, and thus out of the way of
the "real" investigation.  Our heroes, naturally, have other plans.
        "Rush Hour" crackles with energy and spirit, and director
Ratner extracts great performances from his two leads.  Tucker is
more restrained here than his hammy appearance in "The Fifth
Element," but nowhere near the level of his fine (borderline serious)
work in Tarantino's "Jackie Brown"; nonetheless, he's entertaining
enough that I tended to find myself laughing rather than wincing.
(Incidentally, Tucker gets the film's funniest line: after his
supervisor angrily announces that Tucker's shenanigans have resulted
in the destruction of police evidence, Tucker meekly retorts: "We
still got a little bit left.")  I think I know why he didn't really
bother me this time around: he's playing a character who's SUPPOSED
to be obnoxious and annoying, and he performs the role with gusto.
I guess I only find him infuriating when he's injecting that kind of
attitude into a part that doesn't really need it, such as his "Fifth
Element" character.
        Chan is also in top form: his stunts are as impressive as
ever, though perhaps less frequent than we've come to expect
(reportedly at his insurance company's insistence); still, what's
here is wonderful.  The two finest moments for me were the pool hall
fight sequence, and the surrealistic art gallery battle.  And yes,
like all of Chan's films, we're treated to a hilarious collection of
outtakes and bloopers at the end of the final reel.
        One of the reasons "Rush Hour" is such marvelous fun is the
fact that the film is steadfastly unconcerned with anything other
than telling its story; therefore, it does so with great flourish.
Granted, the plot is nothing new: we have two mismatched cops who
intensely dislike each other, but must nonetheless work together to
solve a case.  Over the course of their investigation, each will
naturally develop a mutual respect and admiration for the other.
Toss in the standard "guess which of the good guys is really the
villain" plot, as well as the cliched "kidnapped daughter" storyline.
The final cherry on top: the mandatory scene in which someone has to
decide which wire to cut in order to defuse a bomb, a scene we've
witnessed in "Armageddon" and countless other action movies.
        Is "Rush Hour" breathtakingly original?  Hardly.  Is it a
whole lot of fun?  Very much so.  The laughs are frequent, the action
is first-rate... and Jackie Chan's passionnate rendition of the '60s
rock anthem "War" is worth the price of admission by itself.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.  Or,
you can subscribe directly from my web page.  Thanks.

Title
Review for October Sky (1999)
        "October Sky" is a cinematic testament to the power of dreams,
and why they make life worth living.  Based on the true story of four
teenage boys who strove to make their lives extraordinary, the film
is uplifting, involving, and triumphant.  It's a tale rooted in the
tradition of emotional filmmaking; in a some ways, I was reminded
of a teenage "It's a Wonderful Life."
        It's October 1957, and seventeen year-old Homer Hickam (Jake
Gyllenhaal) is, like the rest of the nation, captivated by the launch
of the Soviet Union's Sputnik satellite.  Most of his fellow
townsfolk in the small mining community of Coalwood, West Virginia
see the device as something to fear ("Are they gonna use it to drop
bombs on us?" frets a nervous housewife).  But Homer is not a typical
teen, and his imagination embraces the scientific possibilities now
stretching out before mankind.  So taken with these eye-opening
new ideas, the impetuous youth soon embarks on a quest to build
a rocket.
        Most of his friends think he's crazy, but Homer finds a trio
of allies who share this unusual dream: the cocky Roy Lee (William
Lee Scott), his friend O'Dell (Chad Lindberg), and the brainy Quentin
(Chris Owen), whose knowledge of physics and chemistry far exceeds
their teacher's.  Working with supplies "borrowed" from local
businesses, the boys soon turn an abandoned lot into their own
personal Cape Canavrel as they construct their model rocket, which
they christen AUK1 (a tounge-in-cheek gesture: an auk is a small,
flightless bird).
        The name is an unfortunately apt one, and the boys suffer
numerous hardships while attempting to get the device ready in
time for the county (and hopefully national) Science Fair.  They
have the drive to keep trying, however: Homer in particular sees
the AUK project as not just a hobby but a possible means of
escape from the trap of Coalwood.  He desperately wishes to
attend college, but the only way he could afford it would be to
win a football scholarship, as his brother Jim did.  Homer is not
the athletic type, however, and so AUK becomes his driving force
and a powerful symbol: not only does he hope the rocket will soar,
he hopes it will take him with it, right out of Coalwood, with an
academic scholarship attatched.
        Although his mother Elsie (Natalie Canerday from "Sling
Blade") and his teacher Miss Riley (Laura Dern) are both
supportive in this new endeavor, Homer's father John (Chris
Cooper) thinks the boy is wasting his time.  Father and son do
not relate well, and on a certain level that's the main story
of "October Sky": how two vastly different people learn to
respect each other and set aside their differences.  The film
handles their relationship smartly, as we watch the two men try
to comprehend each other's motives.  John expects Homer to follow
in his footsteps and work in the town's coal mine; Homer dreams
only of the stars and his precious rockets.  John doesn't realize
that his own driving passion for mining is just as strong as
his son's love of rocketry, and one of the best scenes occurs when
Homer accuses his father of loving the mine more than he does
his family.
        The relationship between father and son becomes the story's
emotional cornerstone.  Their lives are an interesting juxtaposition:
the scenes with Homer and his friends testing their prototypes in
the great outdoors contrast sharply with the dark, claustrophobic
shots of John working in the mine.  It's no surprise that they have
trouble relating to each other: their worlds don't overlap in the
slightest.  If the final reconciliation between Homer and John
reeks a bit heavily of saccharine, it's still effective when seen
in context with the film as a whole.
        "October Sky" contains a wealth of characters, most of whom
are well developed-- not surprising, since the film is based on a true
story.  (A nice touch: the closing credits contain Super 8 footage of
the real people the story is based on.)  But sadly, Roy Lee and O'Dell
are given only token attention here, and seem to be included only to
be
historically accurate.  Neither boy does anything of consequence.  I
would've liked to learn more about them, but alas, they're both too
shadowy and insubstantial to get a handle on.
        If we remove the inconsequential characters, the film is
basically the tale of Homer and Quentin's quest to build a rocket.
On a larger level, it's also the story of one boy's coming of age,
and how he found the courage to struggle ahead in the face of
adversity.  In that sense, "October Sky" is as big and glorious
as its title.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to: joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Rounders (1998)
        "Rounders," the new film from John Dahl, tells the complex story
of two young men enslaved by the lure of professional gambling.  Mike
McDermott (Matt Damon) is an ambitious young law student who swears off
high-stakes wagering after he loses a semester's tuition on a single hand
of poker.  But when his aptly-named friend Worm (Edward Norton), a
recently paroled convict, finds himself in serious financial trouble, the
loyal Mike agrees to come out of retirement and help him earn the $15,000
he desperately needs to pay off his bad debts.  With Mike acting as the
yin to Worm's slimy yang, the two card wizards set off to conquer the
poker tables of Atlantic City.  They know all the tricks, and though Mike
prefers to play "straight" poker (ie, no cheating), Worm is not above
stacking the deck or dealing from the bottom.  That's one of their major
differences: Mike approaches poker as an art form, while Worm's point of
view is much less noble.
        Matt Damon's performance radiates warmth and sunshine, loyalty
and charismatic charm.  His character is obviously intelligent and kind-
hearted: the only reason he returns to gambling is to assist a friend in
need.  He seems genuinely interested in his law studies when we meet him,
and positively worships his girlfriend Jo (Gretchen Mol).  What most
astounded me was how a sweet guy like this could surround himself with
such monsters.  It's so painfully obvious that Worm is a user, with no
interest in anything but Mike's card-playing abilities, that we wonder
why such a smart young man can't see this for himself.  The smarmy Jo,
meanwhile, is constantly whining or striding away from Mike with her nose
upturned, as though she believes she's far too good for him; never once
does she demonstrate any degree of kindness or affection.  When she
leaves midway through the movie, I rejoiced... and was quite surprised to
learn that Mike (and the film) considered her departure a bad thing.
        "Rounders" is a disappointing tale, more concerned with creating
individual moments rather than a consistent tone.  The story's pulse is
only discernible during the card-playing scenes, which are fascinating and
masterfully constructed; the rest of the film tries to involve us in plot
details which are not only irrevelant but actually boring.  These include
Mike and Jo's tepid romance, Mike's steadily declining interest in his
school work, Worm repeatedly getting himself in trouble and asking Mike
for help, etc.
        The movie also makes poor use of its first-rate cast, apart from
Damon.  What's Martin Landau, one of America's greatest living actors,
doing in this film?  The answer: not much.  Landau, who won as Oscar for
his portrayl of Bela Lugosi in Tim Burton's "Ed Wood," plays a kindly old
mentor, the type always present in movies like this.  Although his
performance is fine, he doesn't really do anything except give Damon some
money.  John Malkovich, another fine actor, portrays a Russian cardshark
named KGB in the film's opening and closing scenes; unfortunately, the
performance is so paper-thin and insubstantial that Damon could've
defeated him merely by blowing hard.  In addition, Malkovich's Russian
accent is laughable: I kept expecting him to announce, "Time to look for
Moose and Squirrel, Natasha!"
        The end of the film is supposed to leave us feeling cheerful and
uplifted, but a true happy ending would depict Mike and Worm checking
themselves into "Gamblers Anonymous."  The film's glorification of its
subject matter, coupled with the fact that Jo and Mike appear to reconcile
at the end of the story, caused me to bury my head in my hands and weep
silently until the end credits began to roll.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.  Or,
you can subscribe directly from my web page.  Thanks.

Title
Review for Other Sister, The (1999)
        There is a scene early in "The Other Sister" which
demonstrates the kind of film it could have been.  Carla Tate
(Juliette Lewis), a slightly retarted young woman in her late
teens, has just come home from an institution.  Sitting at
the dinner table with her family for the first time in a decade,
Carla proudly eats her meal with a fork, something she was
unable to do the last time they saw her.  No one at the table
notices, or offers any sort of positive reinforcement.
Undeterred, Carla continues to eat her food, though her eyes
register a subtle look of hurt and disappointment.
        It's a thoughtful scene, indicative of a movie that
plans to take an honest, unabashed look at the world of the
mentally handicapped and the challenges and triumphs
contained therein.  Unfortunately, it's the only such moment
in the film.  "The Other Sister" rapidly plummets to the
level of crowd-pleasing formula, cheerfully abandoning the
opportunity to say anything worthwhile.  Worse, director
Garry Marshall and his screenwriters seem to be laughing
at the concept of retardation, and encouraging, no,
*begging*, the audience to do the same.
        Carla has a difficult time adjusting to home life,
thanks to her mother, Elizabeth (Diane Keaton), a stuffy,
overbearing woman who seems determined to shape her
daughter into something she has no interest in being.
Although her father Bradley (Tom Skerrit) is loving
and supportive, Carla's mother seems determined to
prevent her from doing anything that might indicate
normality, such as going to college or moving out on
her own.  Eventually, however, our heroine meets
Daniel McMann (Giovanni Ribisi), a retarded student
at a nearby technical school.  His sense of adventure
and independence impress Carla; soon the pair are
romantically linked, allowing the film to set up scene
after scene of standard romantic fare.
        There is barely a moment in "The Other Sister"
that deviates from convention or shows any independent
thought whatsoever.  Some examples: we have a "falling
in love" montage.  We have the required "couple has a
big fight and split up, only to get back together again"
scene.  We have an overbearing parent, which is standard
issue for any film that centers around a teenager.  And
when Carla's mother angrily announces that she doesn't
want Carla to have anything to do with Daniel, I was able
to predict the moment of reconciliation within three
seconds of when it actually appeared on the screen.
        An adherence to cliche is to be expected in films
of this nature, though, and it's not why I disliked the
movie.  I was offended and annoyed by the fact that "The
Other Sister" exists in a perpetual state of contradiction
with itself.  Carla understandably gets furious any time she
thinks people are laughing at her; indeed, one such scene
which occurs near the story's climax is heart-wrenching.
But despite this, the film continuiously gives Carla and
Daniel ridiculous dialogue that's clearly intended to be
funny:
        Why does Marshall want us to laugh at the
ignorance of the same people the film is supposedly
championing?  Why does the movie abandon the more
thoughtful issues it raises without so much as a
backwards glance (such as the scene in which a young
Carla pushes a little boy down the steps and severely
injures him, and another in which Daniel is being
evicted by his father for flunking out of school)?  Why
can't it devote more thought to a subplot involving
Carla's gay sister Heather (Sarah Paulson)?  As it
stands, the Heather character seems to included for no
other reason than lesbianism is "in" at the moment.
        The acting is acceptable, although neither Lewis
or Ribisi are completely convincing in these challenging
roles.  Again, I blame the script more than the actors:
their lines make them come off not as mentally retarded,
but as stand-up comedians with funny voices, rather like
Adam Sandler in "The Waterboy."
        From beginning to end, I despised "The Other
Sister," a movie which tells us not to laugh at the
disadvantaged... then conveys them as loveable goofballs
continuously spouting sitcom-tinged dialogue.  It tries
to convince us that the mentally handicapped are valiant
people, struggling in the face of adversity and deserving
our respect (a sentiment I agree with), then makes them
appear so "cutesy" that one is reminded of trained
animals performing tricks at the circus.  This is a film
that didn't need to be made, and doesn't need to be seen.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to: joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for She's All That (1999)
        I'll preface my comments on Robert Iscove's new
teen comedy "She's All That" with a disclaimer: I am
definitely not the film's target audience, and my review
will probably reflect that.  It's been nearly a decade since
I graduated from high school, and in the intervening years
I've been forced to learn about finances, insurance and
responsibility.  Wondering how the rent is going to be
paid and when I'll have the money to get the car fixed,
the once burning issue of "Who am I going to the prom
with?" no longer seems quite so important.  I, along with
the rest of the people in my age group, have moved on to
other things; as such, the characters in most high-school
comedies seem alien to me.  Anxiety over the prom?  I
simply can't relate.  Afraid of not getting into the college
of your choice?  Sorry, that's too far in my past for me
to empathize with you.
        With that in mind, I was pleasantly surprised to
find myself enjoying much of "She's All That."  Slick and
humorous, the film has a lot of fun with its well-worn
plot; watching it, we get the sense that everyone involved
with the movie is having a good time.  Their enthusiasm
is contagious, and it's a good thing: this agreeable tone
of goofiness is largely responsible for the film's charm.
        As is required by the plot of all teenager-themed
movies, our hero, Zack Siler (Freddie Prinze Jr.) has it
all: a handsome face, a beautiful girlfriend, the adoration
of his classmates, and so many universities banging on
his door that he can't decide which one to attend.  But
things soon begin to unravel when his girlfriend Taylor
(Jodi Lyn O'Keefe) breaks up with him to date TV star
Brock Hudson (played with pleasantly obnoxious gusto by
SCREAM's Matthew Lillard), who she met at a beach
party.  (The program that the Brock character stars on
is none other than MTV's "The Real World," a great
satirical wink to modern teen culture.  The phony clips
of Brock appearing on the show generated some of the
film's biggest laughs.)
        Zack's friends offer their condolences over the
breakup, but he shrugs it off.  His ego is such that he
believes all the girls in the school will be lining up to
go out with him; after all, being Zack's girlfriend is a
free ticket to popularity.  His friend Dean (Paul Walker)
expresses doubt about Zack's claim, which leads to a
bet: Dean will select one of the girls in the school, and
Zack will try to turn her into the next Prom Queen.
Dean eventually selects the shy, introspective Laney
Boggs (Rachael Leigh Cook), a timid artist who seems
to have little interest in anything other than painting
and spending time alone.
        Zack wastes no time in trying to get to know
Laney; although she's wary of his intentions at first ("What
is this, some kind of dork outreach program?" she accuses),
she gradually begins to warm to him.  Their relationship
begins, although Laney doesn't know that Zack is merely
trying to win a bet.  Will Zack fall in love with her by the
end of the story?  Does the Pope wear a goofy hat?
        As I said, nothing about the plot is the least bit
original; it's the spiritual descendent of "My Fair Lady,"
but without the music.  The charm of the story stems
not from the subject matter, but from the playful nature
of the performances and writing.  The film's wit is
surprisingly sharp, allowing the characters to throw
zingers at each others like refugees from a Kevin Smith
film.  (Taylor, determined to beat Laney in the race for
Prom Queen, gets the funniest quip: "I could win this
contest in fluroscent lighting, on the first day of my
period, clothed in T.J. Max.")  And another scene features
an art show, where astoundingly deep poetry is recited:
"My soul is an island.  My car is a Ford."  That's the
sort of ridiculous dialogue that we're dealing with.
Smile.  Go ahead.  You know you want to.
        The characterization isn't bad either, even for
those with limited screen time.  Laney's father, played
with warmth by Kevin Pollack, is fascinating in his
own right; I liked his clever "warm-fuzzy" speech about
living one's life to the fullest.  And Laney, as played by
Rachael Leigh Cook, has a wide range of conflicting
thoughts and emotions over the events which unfurl in her
life during the course of the film.  Only Taylor and Brock
feel like one-note characters/villains (though I'm sure it
was intended with Brock; Matthew Lillard's performance
is too much fun for me to call it "shallow.")
        One scene does much to counteract the pseudo-
intellectual tone of the film, however: a gratuitous scene
which involves a pizza topping you won't find on any
menu.  I'll say no more, except to lament the sudden shift
in both the tone and IQ of the story.  It's a shame that
a movie which is surprisingly smart for so much of its
duration felt the sudden urge to cater to the lowest
common denominator, a criticism I also leveled at "There's
Something About Mary."  Other scenes are nearly as
painful, including a gag in which an elderly man invites
Laney, who works at a fast-food restaurant, to "supersize
his balls."  (They're meatballs, see.  Har har.)
        The movie also hits one of my personal pet peeves,
as those of you who've been reading my reviews for awhile
can attest: beautiful actresses playing characters who are
supposed to be ugly.  The lovely Janeane Girafalo began
this unfortunate trend in "The Truth About Cats and Dogs";
Rachael Leigh Cook continues it here.  Are we really
supposed to believe that someone this attractive has been
oblivious to her beauty for so long?  And that the instant
she takes her glasses off, she, a social outcast, is
immediately loved by everyone?
        Never mind.  "She's All That" is pleasant enough
entertainment, if hardly a masterpiece.  I'm not sure that I
can go so far as to actually recommend it to anyone over the
age of eighteen, but I do commend director Iscove and
screenwriter Fleming for coming so close to the mark.  I
admit, I had a good time.  It seems there may still be
some life in the teen comedy, a genre I had long since
dismissed.  Semper fi, Zack and Laney.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.  Or,
you can subscribe directly from my web page.  Thanks.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Your Friends & Neighbors (1998)
        To call "Your Friends and Neighbors" a dark film is to call
The Beatles a moderately successful band.  This feature, the second
from writer/director Neil LaBute, continues his tradition of placing
despicable characters in unpleasant situations, a motif he introduced
with last year's "In the Company of Men."
        The story revolves around the lives of three couples
(identified in the film's end credits as Jerry, Cheri, Terri, Cary,
Barry and Mary, though their names are never spoken in the film).  All
six of our characters are unhappy with their love life, and several of
them decide to make a change... though none of them realize the others
are also miserable.  They don't know it at the time, but their actions
will actually leave them more unfulfilled than they were before.
        The casting is interesting.  Jason Patric, the villain from
"Speed 2," is the film's most loathesome character: a doctor who
practices "sex talk" when he's alone so he can sound sincere in bed.
He berates his lover for daring to have her period, fondly recalls
raping a high-school classmate, and absently plays "catch" with a
plastic fetus while talking on the phone, eventually drop-kicking it
down the hospital hallway.  (I was reminded of Ike from "South Park":
"Don't kick the baby!")
        Ben Stiller is a college professor whose relationship is on
the rocks because he likes to talk during sex, a quirk that his
girlfriend hates.  Her coldness doesn't bother him, though, since he's
got the hots for Amy Brenneman, a beautiful writer who's working on an
article about the art of lovemaking.  She's obviously attracted to Ben
as well, and all would be well if she didn't happen to be the wife of
his best friend.
        Aaron Eckhart, the most twisted person from "In the Company of
Men," is one of this film's most likeable characters.  He's the only
guy who doesn't really do anything wrong: he loves his wife and would
never dream of being unfaithful, although he is frustrated with her
conservative approach to sex.  He confesses to his friends that
although he adores her, she is unable to provide him with the kind of
pleasure he can achieve with his own hand.
        Stiller's girlfriend, played by Catherine Keener, meets
Nastassja Kinski, an assistant artist employed at a local gallery.
Their friendship quickly grows complicated, progressing from strangers
to buddies to lesbianism over the course of three scenes.  Kinski is
the closest thing to a voice of reason contained in the film: all five
of the other characters wander into the art gallery at some point and
engage in frightfully similar (and hilarious) conversations with her.
Along with Eckhart, Kinski is the only truly likeable character.
Sweet and loyal, she's determined to do everything she can to make her
new lesbian lover happy... to the point of smothering her with
kindness.
        That's our cast and storyline, and in case you missed it, I'll
reiterate: this is a BLEAK film.  It's a train-wreck: the sight is
horrible and appaling, but you can't turn away.  LaBute has crafted a
movie so shocking that it can't really qualify as entertainment;
however, the message is an important one.  If you've ever thought
about cheating on the one you love, I promise, this film will change
your mind.
        LaBute wants the audience to squirm, and he achieves his goal
by grabbing our noses and pulling us into his world.  We have no
distance from any of the characters; the film is shot almost entirely
with close-ups, a little touch that made me fidget uncomfortably in my
seat.  This, coupled with the fact that none of the characters' names
are given in the course of the story, provides an intimate yet
anonymous portrait of six lives on the fast track to disaster.
        I watched the "lesbian" portions of the film with some
amusement.  Since the release of "Chasing Amy," it seems that all
independent movies are required to include a character who suddenly
realizes that he or she is either gay or bisexual midway through the
show.  "Your Friends and Neighbors" does not disappoint in that
regard.  I'd criticize this trend a little more if my own indie
screenplay, "Four Sides of the Triangle," didn't have the exact same
problem.  Oops.
        I've awarded this film three and one-half stars, which is
surely the highest rating I've ever given to a movie that I did not
particularly enjoy.  But this is not a mistake: I don't think LaBute
intends for us to LIKE the film.  He wants to make us miserable,
and thereby warn us of the effects that cheating and dishonesty can
have on a relationship.  He accomplishes his goal: no one who sees
this movie will forget the lesson.  I truly believe that every person
in the world should watch "Your Friends and Neighbors" at least
once.  It would do much to solve society's marital problems.
        (Oh, one interesting thing I noticed.  In "There's Something
About Mary," Ben Stiller plays a really nice guy obsessed with a woman
named Mary.  In "Your Friends and Neighbors," Ben Stiller plays a
really creepy guy obsessed with a woman named Mary.  I've heard of
typecasting an actor, but this is ridiculous.)

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to: joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com

Title
Review for Shichinin no samurai (1954)
     STARRING: Takashi Shimura, Toshiro Mifune, Yoshio Inaba,
Seiji Miyaguchi, Isao Kimura
     DIRECTOR: Akira Kurosawa
     WRITERS: Shinobu Hashimoto and Akira Kurosawa
     RELEASED: 1954
"Farmers are stingy, foxy, blubbering, mean, stupid and
murderous! God damn! That's what they are! But then, who made
them such beasts? You did! You samurai did it! You burn their
villages!  Destroy their farms! Steal their food! Force them to
labor! Take their women! And kill them if they resist! So what
should farmers do?" --Kikuchiyo, Seven Samurai
Akira Kurosawa's Seven Samurai is perhaps the closest any
director has come to a true cinematic study of social class.
Much of the film's genius revolves around moments of humanity
hidden where we least expect them--in the merry laughter of
peasants, sharing a joke only minutes before the start of the
battle which could destroy them; in the tears shed by a brash
warrior when confronted with reminders of the past; in a young
man's scream of remorse as he is forced to kill for the first
time. More than anything, Seven Samurai is an epic behavioral
study, and it's this attention to detail which elevates the
work from a standard Japanese 'jidai-geki' (samurai picture) to
a masterpiece.
Sure, there's also a great story contained herein, but that
alone can't account for the film's enduring appeal and renown.
Seven Samurai is unequivocally regarded not only as Kurosawa's
greatest film, but as the best cinematic work ever to come out
of Japan--no small praise, especially considering the caliber
of the director's other achievements. There's more going on
here than skillful story construction: the events resonate with
a degree of sincerity rarely found in modern cinema. It's easy
to love these people, because they seem real--they're neither
action heroes nor cardboard stereotypes.
The story: A small village finds itself annually raided by an
army of bandits, who steal the meager crops harvested by the
peasants. Tired of relinquishing their food supply but woefully
inept in combat skills, the villagers decide to hire a band of
samurai to protect them. It won't be easy, however: the
villagers have nothing to offer their would-be saviors except a
few handfuls of stale rice. The advice of the town elder? "Find
hungry samurai."
Eventually six warriors are recruited. The regal Kambei
(Takashi Shimura) accepts their offer because he believes it's
the morally correct thing to do. Katsushiro (Ko Kimura) is a
young, inexperienced 'ronin' (masterless samurai) who comes
along for a taste of adventure. Schichiroji (Daisuke Kato), an
old friend of Kambei, also offers his assistance, as does
master swordsman Kyuzo (Seiji Miyaguchi), and two additional
samurai, Gorobei (Yoshiro Inaba) and Heihachi (Minoru Chiaki).
Trailing after the band of warriors is the brash Kikuchiyo
(legendary Japanese actor Toshiro Mifune), the son of a farmer,
who wishes to be admitted into the warriors' ranks.
The rest of this review can be found free of charge at:
http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm

Title
Review for Pi (1998)
STARRING:   Sean Gullette, Mark Margolis, Ben Shenkman, Pamela Hart
DIRECTOR:   Darren Aronofsky
WRITERS:    Darren Aronofsky, Sean Gullette, Eric Watson
RATED/YEAR: R/1998
        "Pi," the highly-touted debut film from writer/director Darren
Aronofsky, is the second movie in as many months to draw me into its
embrace, dazzle me with flashes of brilliance, then fumble the ball so
badly in the final act that many of my positive vibes were squashed.
("Snake Eyes" was the other, for those of you keeping score.)
        Max Cohen (Sean Gullette) is a mathematician driven almost to the
point of madness by his passion for science.  He firmly believes that the
entire universe is governed by the laws of math, and that these laws
leave traces of their presence in every aspect of reality; as such, if
one can decipher the code, one would then be able to predict anything and
everything: the way creamer will swirl around in your coffee cup, the
shape of snowflakes, the price of stocks, the secrets of creation... even
the true name of God.
        With assistance from his friend and mentor Sol (Mark Margolis),
Max is attempting to find and decipher this code.  One afternoon, while
processing Max's latest mathematical theory, his computer crashes and
blinks a 216-digit number on the screen.  Max is aghast at the loss of
his data, but as he begins to examine the strange numerals generated by
the crash, other possibilities occur to him.  The fact that this number
has exactly 216 digits is especially interesting, since his friend Lenny
(Ben Shenkman), another mathematician, firmly believes that the true name
of God is a 216-character string, numerically embedded in the Torah.
        The first half of the film, dealing with the construction of
the plot, is fascinating.  I'm not a stupid person, but my knowledge of
mathematics does not extend beyond some basic trig; as such, I found the
simple, concise way in which the script explains complex math theory to
be exceptionally well-done.  The details were JUST complicated enough
that I had to concentrate, but never so difficult that I got left behind.
A film that actually made me THINK!  What a pleasant surprise!
        Unfortunately, writer/director Aronofsky is unable to sustain the
sparks of brilliance he shows in the first part of the story.  After
setting up such an intellectual premise, he unfortunately allows the
second half of his film to generate into "Conspiracy Theory."  Max gets
chased a lot (See Max.  Run, Max, run), and a lot of evil people slap
him around for a bit inbetween the sprinting sessions.  Then Max is
confronted by Rabbi Cohen (Stephen Pearlman), who begs Max to give him the
number, explaining that "his people" need it to find the sacred chest
which was initially used to carry around the original Ten Commandments.
Huh?  Is this "Pi" or "Raiders of the Lost Ark?"  Why not throw in the
Holy Grail or Atlantis while we're at it?
        In addition, the final quarter of the film is basically a re-
telling of Arthur C. Clarke's famous short-story "The Nine Billion Names
of God," in which (surprise!) a mathematician helps a religious
organization decipher an ancient text to unearth the true name of the
One Deity.  The last scenes of "Pi" seem like such an obvious rip-off of
Clarke's story that I can't believe (1) there has not been a lawsuit over
it, and (2) no one else has noticed it, considering that the tale is one
of Clarke's most famous short works.
        But the first half of "Pi" is so intelligent and believeable that
I'm willing to cut it some slack.  Aronofsky has injected some excellent
touches into the movie.  First of all, the film is shot in black and
white, which, although done for budgetary reasons, gives a certain
dramatic flair to the production that color could not have generated.  The
acting is consistent and quite strong.  Max is clearly a man obsessed:
apart from a single chair, there are no pieces of furniture in his
apartment.  Every niche is filled with scribbled calculations and computer
equipment; in fact, during one scene I noted that Max's home resembles
nothing so much as the interior of H.A.L., as seen in "2001: A Space
Odyssey" (another Clarke reference, incidentally).  The music (primarily
techno) fits the mood well, and Matthew Libatique's cinematography is
truly groundbreaking.
        The film also teases the entire sci-fi genre; whereas most
directors would've filled Max's apartment with high-tech computer
equipment that would be outdated six months after the film came out,
Aronofsky has chosen a "retro" appearance for the production.  Look
closely: Max's Supercomputer Interface looks suspiciously like a
Commodore PET, with parts from other equally obsolete systems tossed in
for good measure.  It's a nice jab at contemporary sci-fi.
        Aronofsky has crafted a remarkable film for cinematic pocket
change (the entire movie cost around $100,000... or 1/2000th the budget
for "Titanic").  Had the tone remained cerebral, we may well have had
one of the year's best films; as it stands, this slice of "Pi" is
occasionally tasty, but not particularly filling.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.

Title
Review for Edtv (1999)
        What turns regular people into celebrities?  I suspect
it's the public's need to adore, to project their own dreams
of glamor and stardom onto others.  People often become famous
not because of any spectacular talent or achievement, but simply
because we see them on television every day.  In an era when
committing adultery with the President of the United States is
not punished but rewarded with book deals and invitations to
Hollywood Oscar parties, it's clear that John Q. Public is
willing to elevate anything that walks across the TV screen
into a cultural icon.
        Ron Howard's "EDtv" is an intriguing satire about this
disturbing trend.  Smart, involving, and howlingly funny, the
movie has the courage to (subtlely) scold its audience for
engaging in hero worship.  A cross between "The Truman
Show" and a pack of slobbering paparazzi, "EDtv" takes an
unflinching look at society's preoccupation with fame, and
doesn't like what it sees.
        The story: a small cable network called True TV finds
itself unable to break free of dismal ratings.  "We're getting
our butts kicked by the Gardening Channel!" frets a nervous
executive.  "People would rather watch soil!"  But network
programmer Cynthia Topping (Ellen DeGeneres) has an idea: why
not take an average guy, specifically chosen to appeal to the
masses, and put him on television 24 hours a day?  Observing
how the public tends to bond with people on television, Cynthia
hypothesizes that such a person would end up as a sort of
'virtual friend' to the viewing audience... and who doesn't like
to spend time with their friends?
        Many people are auditioned before the network finally
decides on the personable Ed Pekurny (Matthew McConaughey).
Ed, an amiable loser in his thirties, agrees to have every
moment of his life broadcast on television for one month.  As
compensation, Ed will be paid a princely sum, which he hopes
will help his financially-strapped family.
        The idea seems like a win-win situation, and Ed has fun
with the role for a while.  But when his life becomes a national
phoenomenum, our hero is unsure how to handle his sudden fame.
People become so addicted to watching Ed's every move that they
forget to live their own lives.  Everyone he knows suddenly
treats him differently: his mom dresses in her finest clothes
any time Ed (and the camera crew) comes to visit, while his
brother Ray (Woody Harrelson) never passes up an opportunity to
tell his brother about his new gym, effectively obtaining free
advertising by doing so.  Indeed, Ed learns that his endorsement
can be a valuable commodity: when he casually orders a Pepsi on
TV one day, the Pepsi Corporation makes sure Ed's apartment is
filled with their products from that moment on.  As in "The
Truman Show," much of the humor here comes from the various
attempts by people and businesses to use the camera as a way to
obtain free product placement.  Ed learns to use this to his
advantage: when his father Hank (Dennis Hopper) finds himself
unemployed, Ed offers to promote any company's product on the air
if said company will give his dad a job.
        But fame has its downside: everywhere he goes, poor Ed
is hounded by rabid fans, and the novelty soon wears off.  But as
the program nears the end of its month-long run, Ed makes an
unpleasant discovery: his ratings are so high that the network
has decided to renew the program; due to a clause buried deep in
his contract, Ed is powerless to prevent them for doing so.  The
feeling of claustrophobia is contagious, as director Ron Howard
("Apollo 13") has wisely chosen to shoot much of the film with
oppressive close-ups, which make the audience feel as though
we too are sharing Ed's nightmare.
        The constant presence of the camera crew is enough to
strain the budding romance between Ed and Shari (Jenna Elfman),
his brother's ex-girlfriend.  (How does Ray find out that Ed is
dating his ex?  By watching their first kiss on TV, along with
the rest of the nation.)  This displeases the viewing audience,
who generally don't like Shari: she's too "real," and not
glamorous enough for a big star like Ed.  (A poll in USA TODAY
reveals that most viewers think Ed should hold out for a more
Hollywood-esque lover.)  The network executives pay attention
to the survey, and bring an actress named Jill (Elizabeth Hurley)
into Ed's life.  Ed doesn't realize that Jill is merely a network
ploy designed to further improve the show's ratings; the poor lug
thinks the beauty queen is actually interested in him.  This is
perhaps the scariest aspect of "EDtv": the thought that
someone's life could be so heartlessly manipulated in order to
garner ratings' dollars.  If the market research doesn't approve
of Ed's relationship with Shari, then sorry, she's gotta go.
        Matthew McConaughey does wonderful things with this
role, making Ed Pekurny likable and empathetic.  He's a genuinely
nice guy, just going with the flow as best he can.  He does not
ask for the flood of attention and adulation he receives; because
of this, he remains human right through to the end.  Nor is
McConaughey the only actor doing fine work here: Rob Reiner
has a terrific time as the cartoonish Whitaker, the villainous
network president who refuses to release Ed from his contract
after the show becomes a hit.  But the film is stolen by Martin
Landau's warm portrayal of Al, Ed's elderly stepfather.  I was
reminded of his fine performance as Bela Lugosi in Tim
Burton's "Ed Wood" (for which Landau deservedly won a "Best
Supporting Actor" Oscar), because, just like his performance
as Lugosi, Landau here is sensitive yet irreverent, serious yet
zany, crass yet loveable.  ("I've gotta go to the bathroom," he
cheerfully informs his family at one point.  "Wish me luck!")
        There are a couple of minor problems.  Although we're
cheering for Ed to win back his independence and elude the
cameras, even if temporarily, the least satisfying moments of
the film are those in which our hero does just that.  Without
the camera crew to play against, the movie's storyline and
romance feel a bit mundane.  Seeing Ed and Shari share a
romantic moment alone is not nearly as fun as seeing them
share the same moment with millions of people.  Although we
want Ed to succeed, we have to admit that his story is more
interesting when he doesn't.
        Nor is the film's final solution to Ed's problem
particularly satisfying.  It's an unwarranted and inappropriate
descent into potty humor, feeling like something tacked on at
the last minute specifically to appeal to the same audience
the film so brilliantly satirizes for the rest of its running
time.
        These are minor problems, however.  "EDtv" is rich in
pointed satire, centering around our tendency to make people into
celebrities.  Why do people become famous?  Because they're on
TV.  Why are they on TV?  Because they're famous.  "EDtv"
serves as a reminder of something we often forget: people on TV
are just that: people.  They needn't be placed on pedestals,
worshipped, or forced to life their lives under the unwelcome eye
of public scrutiny.
  ("EDtv" invades your local movie theater's privacy on
    Friday, March 26.)

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to: joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Batman & Robin (1997)
It's always painful to witness the degradation of someone you dearly
love... to watch, helpless, as a once strong family member succumbs to
illness or the ravages of old age. Gradually the strength and
personality traits that you remember so fondly seep away, leaving only
a shell of the person's former self. They may still breathe, and
perhaps even move around from time to time, but it's obvious that
their spark is gone. Watching it happen to my grandfather was
difficult enough; now we get to see the same thing happen to the
Batman series. 
I was a big fan of the dark vision Tim Burton brought to the first two
Caped Crusader outings. Gotham actually breathed on the silver screen;
it was sinister and full of secrets. Michael Keaton didn't so much
PLAY Batman as become him. The cherry on top was the great
characterization, far more in keeping with Bob Kane's original comic
books than the campy sixties television show. Gone were the WHAPS! and
POWS! of Adam West, replaced with great action sequences and an
intense score from composer extrordinaire Danny Elfman. I even went so
far as to buy one of those goofy T-shirts with the bat logo emblazoned
on it. (Yes, that's right... I was one of THOSE guys.) 
Situations beyond my control prevented me from seeing the third film
(Batman Forever), helmed by director Joel Schumacher and starring Val
Kilmer in the title role, but when the fourth installment appeared in
theaters I was more than game. Another trip to Gotham, with the lovely
and talented Uma Thurman to boot? How could I possibly resist? Ho boy.
How our naivete' mocks us. 
Batman and Robin starts off with an obligatory action sequence, in
which Batman (George Clooney) and his increasingly annoying sidekick
Robin (Chris O'Donnell) attempt to foil Mr. Freeze (Arnold
Schwarzenegger) in a diamond robbery. In an interesting interpretation
of physics, Freeze launches our heroes high into the atmosphere in
some sort of rocket-thingy whose purpose is never explained. Batman
urgently tells Robin that they must stop the rocket, because it will
soon explode and turn Gotham into a huge crater. Then, in an amazingly
bold feat of self-contradiction, B&R set the rocket to self-destruct.
How do they escape? Simple. They skateboard back down through the
atmosphere to Gotham. Yes, you read that right. Skateboard. Through
the air. Back down to Gotham. Read it again so your brain absorbs the
absurdity of the situation. Then witness how B&R boldly blow up the
rocket mere moments after explaining the importance of not letting it
explode. 
Next we're off to the Amazon jungle to enjoy the cliched ramblings of
a Dr. Clayton Forrester look-alike as he attempts to turn a 98-pound
weakling into a sumo wrestler via some sort of venom-juice. He is of
course successful, and all goes well until Dr. Unattractive (Uma
Thurman) uncovers the secret plot. The mad scientist isn't happy, and
murders her to emphasize this fact. She rewards him by coming back to
life as a sexy supervillain and killing him with a poison kiss. Lucky
guy: not only does he get to smooch one of the most beautiful women
currently working in the movie industry, but he gets to exit the film
very early to boot. 
Back at Wayne Manor, Bruce Wayne's aged butler Alfred gets a lovely
surprise on the doorstep: Alicia Silverstone, who plays his British
niece, has come for an unannounced visit and apparently left her
accent at home. They fondle each other for a bit in one of the most
disturbing, yet not actually dirty, displays of affection ever
captured on film. Robin becomes infatuated with her, and follows her
one night when she steals a motorcycle to go racing. She of course
gets in trouble and he saves her, because, after all, she's only a
woman. 
In one of my favorite scenes, Robin and the future Batgirl find
themselves dangling off a bridge. Robin has somehow managed to wrap
his foot around a metal bar, which assumedly prevents him from falling
off the bridge into the rushing water below. Visualize with me now: we
have our wormy hero, hanging off the bridge by one foot. He is holding
on to Alicia Silverstone. That's two people, dangling precariously by
one foot. Then, we cut to... the two of them safely back at Wayne
Manor. No explanation whatsoever. To quote Lenny from The Simpsons:
"We won't bore you with the details of our miraculous escape." 
It gets worse. In an attempt to assumedly add a comic-book feel to the
film, the director has inserted cartoon sound effects into the fight
scenes. For example, when one of the evil henchmen falls down a
staircase, we hear a sound similar to Wile E. Coyote plummeting off a
cliff. Whether this was supposed to inspire laughter is unknown. It
did get a reaction from me, though I doubt very much it was the one
the director wanted. 
In the most vomitous feel-good ending of the summer, Mr. Freeze helps
Batman cure Alfred of a crippling disease. It just so happens that
Freeze is the world's leading expert on this particular illness.
That's pushing believability as it is... but would you believe Freeze
just happens to carry the cure around with him at all times? My, isn't
that convenient. 
Next, stir in a lousy soundtrack and lots of people flying around on
wires that are almost invisible during the fight scenes. Add a dash of
some of the most poorly-handled special effects of the summer,
sprinkled in with some gratingly bad puns courtesy of screenwriter
Akiva Goldsman. Is the bile rising yet? 
Arnold's acting has all the depth and range I've come to expect from
his post-Conan movies, which is to say, none at all. His films,
however, are more about attitude than acting, and I can't really hold
his performance against him. In a movie like The Running Man, where
the story is strong enough to let me ignore his terrible line-reads,
it's not a problem... but in Batman and Robin, it's simply one more
thing to bristle at. It doesn't help that most of his dialogue
consists of groanably bad puns, either. And not bad in a fun kind of
way; just really awful. 
Alicia Silverstone is fine in her role, but the part is so poorly
written that it could do her professional reputation more harm than
good. Her character alternates between strong and fragile, determined
and waffling. Poor Alicia; I know she tried hard, and I don't fault
her. Same with Uma and Chris O'Donnell; no problems with them
personally, except they should've had the will-power to turn down a
script this bad. 
This movie also attempts to set the Women's Rights movement back
thirty years. Every woman is portrayed very badly, from the aforemen-
tioned Alicia Silverstone to Bruce Wayne's marriage-hungry girlfriend
(Elle MacPherson). And Uma? Well, Batgirl comments on Uma's character:
"People like you give women a bad name!" True enough. 
If the movie has one good thing, it's George Clooney. Many folks are
in strong disagreement with me, but I thought his performance as
Batman was at least as strong as Keaton's. I don't watch TV, so I've
never seen whatever show he's on (E.R., maybe?), but I liked him here.
Unfortunately, no matter how talented Clooney may be as an actor, he
can't carry a film when the script has him doing nothing more than
standing around, staring, and occasionally barking such helpful lines
as "Let's go!" and "That was close!" But despite all that, Clooney was
surprisingly likeable... which says quite a bit about his screen
presence. 
One of the few things the film gets right is the depiction of Gotham
itself. Like Burton, Schumacher knows how to create memorable images
of a city caught in the struggle of good and evil. Some of the scenes
of frozen city streets (courtesy of Mr. Freeze) are particularly
well-done. Indeed, the lighting, costumes and sets are all lovely...
but a few pretty pictures aren't enough to save this clunker. 
In conclusion: There are worse movies in existence, but it still hurts
to encounter a film this far off the mark. With a better script, this
could've been the ultimate Batman extravaganza; instead, one is left
with what could generously be called a mediocre film. Better luck next
time, Mr. Schumacher. We'll be waiting... same bat time, same bat
channel. 

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film: http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write to:
joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com
----
"Average Joe" Barlow  (jbarlow@earthling.net)  MiSTie #73097
Joe Barlow on Film: http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
"The one good thing about the [life-size sticker of
 Jar Jar Binks on the door of Taco Bell] is you can
 pretty convincingly throw the SOB a roundhouse punch.
 I found it satisfying."   --Renard A. Dellafave

Title
Review for 3000 Miles to Graceland (2001)
Elvis is dead, and it would be damned kind of us to leave him that
way--especially when the vehicle for his return to the public eye is an
uninspired faade of a narrative like this.  Demian Lichtenstein's 3000
MILES TO GRACELAND is the latest cinematic offering to rape our collective
past, cheerfully exploiting American nostalgia and pillaging the icons of
an earlier, less jaded generation.  There's nothing wrong with satirizing
our heritage when it's done well--just take a look at the brilliant
PLEASANTVILLE, for instance--but this film feels less like homage than a
cheap attempt to whore our cultural icons for a quick buck.  May that be
all this film earns at the box office.
The story centers around a group of hard-nosed thieves who rob a
casino while dressed as Elvis impersonators.  All the film's main
characters are lifted wholesale from the Hollywood Book of Requisite
Action-Movie Stereotypes, including the gang's two ringleaders (Kurt
Russell and Kevin Costner), whose inability to agree on the best way to
divvy up the loot results in one stale argument scene after another; a
shallow single mother (played with no stretch whatsoever by Courtney Cox,
whose performance here equals the dramatic range she displayed in Bruce
Springsteen's "Dancing in the Dark" music video); and an army of
ever-expendable secondary characters, who exist here only to bring some
name recognition to the project.  (Ice T?  In an Elvis movie?  Well, thank
yuh.  Thank yuh very much.)
The film's trailer would have you believe that the majority of the tale
revolves around the planning and execution of the robbery, but don't be
fooled--the meat of the story centers more on the aftermath of the heist
than the crime itself, which is over and done with in the opening five
minutes.  Unfortunately, the first warning signs of the movie's dearth of
quality are apparent before this bullet ballet is over.  Lichtenstein,
attempting to disguise the film's disastrously uneven editing, takes every
opportunity to flaunt his music video roots at us--the two gunfights which
bookend the movie are constructed with quick jump cuts and needlessly
"flashy" camera shots that would be far more at home on MTV than in a film
aspiring to tell a coherent story.  The poor filmmaker, helming his second
feature film with 3000 MILES, doesn't yet seem to have a grasp on good
narrative storytelling technique, choosing instead to obfuscate the plot
behind stylistic editing and underwhelming camera moves that add nothing
but length to the final film.
But as tedious as the opening bloodbath is, things only get worse after
our merry band of nitwits hits the highway.  As you might expect, 3000
MILES TO GRACELAND is, in fact, a road movie about a trip to... Canada?
Yes, you read that correctly.  Canada.  But despite the fact that
Graceland plays no part in the film itself, its spirit does sort of hover
over the movie--a sad, disheveled icon that once had meaning, but now rots
away like so many peanut butter and 'nana sandwiches left out in the rain.
(Rather like Presley himself, at the hands of this movie.  It's sad that
Elvis, arguably the first true Sugar Daddy of rock and roll--and I'm
talking *lots* of sugar, sweet'pea--has been forced to "pseudo-star"
posthumously in this banal tale of crime, guns, and Elvis impersonators,
which serves less as a cohesive narrative than a barometer of pain.  This
is not the first film to ever feature Elvis impersonators as an integral
part of the plot, but it's unquestionably the worst.)
The cast is populated by a group of Hollywood A-list actors, all of whom
should have known better.  Kurt Russell and Kevin Costner get the king's
share (no pun intended) of screen time, and therefore deserve the complete
career derailments that are likely to occur after John P. Consumer gets an
eyeful of this garbage.  This is particularly disappointing--and
surprising--since Russell drew critical accolades for his performance of
Elvis in John Carpenter's 1979 TV miniseries; as such, it's lamentable
that he comes across so ham-fisted this time around--not so much
incompetent as begging for attention.
And sadly, Kevin Costner proves that the dramatic rebound I thought I'd
glimpsed in the recent THIRTEEN DAYS is nothing more than a passing fluke.
In 3000 MILES, Costner's performance as Dances with Whoppers (his
character is actually named Murphy, but admit it, you like my idea better)
comes across not so much as an effective villain but a reluctant actor;
I've heard of phoning in a role before, but Costner here doesn't even seem
to have the coins needed to place the call.  With starring roles in such
recent cinematic disasters as WATERWORLD and THE POSTMAN under his belt,
Kevin Costner proves one thing in 3000 MILES: he has the worst agent in
the known universe.
So, is there *anything* positive I can say about this film?    Well, I guess the cars were kinda cool.  And I suppose
that there are moments in 3000 MILES TO GRACELAND that manage to capture
the gritty excitement of being out on the road, with the dust flying up
around your car while the approved soundtrack of rebellion--rock and
roll--explodes from your speakers.  But with this material's painfully
inept handling, it might have been better if the film had choked on that
dust instead of cruising into theaters.
This review is (c)Copyright 2001 by Joe Barlow.  It may be freely
distributed, as long as nothing is changed and this paragraph remains
intact.  If you'd like to join Joe's mailing list to receive new reviews
free of charge, please send a blank e-mail to:
joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com .  Joe's first book of film criticism, 100
NIGHTS IN THE DARK, is now available at bookstores everywhere (ISBN:
0-595-16391-2).  Please see  http://www.joebarlow.com  for more
information.
No portion of this review may be reprinted for profit without
authorization from the author.
=====
Joe Barlow
Author of "100 Nights in the Dark: A Collection of
Contemporary Film Reviews and Essays," available at:
http://www.joebarlow.com  and at bookstores everywhere (ISBN: 0-595-16391-2).
Joe Barlow on Film: http://www.joebarlow.com


Title
Review for South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut (1999)
        Since debuting on Comedy Central in 1997, "South Park"
has
continually pushed the envelope of good taste and challenged
the
conventional idea of what is and is not appropriate for
television.
The battle has not been an easy one: since the very first
episode
was aired, the network has been besieged by letters from angry
parents, religious organizations, and nearly every political
group in the country, all demanding the immediate cancellation
of
the series.  But the proof is in the Snacky Cakes: Trey Parker
and
Matt Stone, the show's creators, have demonstrated that
poo-poos and
profanity can not only entertain the masses, they can also mean
big
merchandising dollars.  Now they're gambling that they can take
the
premise (and its profits) to the next level.
        In the small "redneck mountain town" (according to the
opening song) of South Park, Colorado, life is quiet and
peaceful--
idyllic, even.  But the town's solitude is challenged when a
new
film opens at the local theater: "Asses of Fire," starring
Canada's
Terrence and Phillip (a comedy duo whose schtick revolves
entirely
around their ability to fart on cue).  Four of the local
children
(Eric Cartman, Stan Marsh, Kyle Broflovski and Kenny McCormick)
sneak in to see the R-rated movie, and are quite taken with the
new vocabulary words contained therein.  As is the way with
children,
they promptly begin showing off their new arsenal of colorful
phrases
at every possible opportunity.
        The community is outraged that four pure, innocent
children have been corrupted by the film (apparently they don't
watch the "South Park" TV show), and soon the president
declares
all-out war on Canada, the bastion of evil responsible for the
offending movie.  Terrence and Philip are sentenced to die, and
the boys hatch a plan to save their idols.  Even more is at
stake,
however: Kenny discovers that if Terrence and Phillip are
killed,
Satan and his lover, Saddam Hussein, will gain dominance over
the
world.
        Yes, that's right, the film is an all-out musical
affair,
with lots of singing and dancing.  Fear not, however: unlike
those
in recent Disney features, these tunes are actually memorable,
managing to stay imbedded in your head for days afterwards.
There's
"Mountain Town," the bouncy opening number which extols the
virtues
of small-town life; the inspirational "What Would Brian Boytano
do?";
the villainous "Blame Canada" (which recalls the positively
evil "Be
Prepared," from "The Lion King"); and a frantic rendition of
the toe-
tappin' "Kyle's Mom's a Bitch" (an "It's a Small World"-type
sing-
along), which is guaranteed to offend absolutely everyone.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to: joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Title
Review for Muppet Movie, The (1979)
STARRING: Charles Durning, Austin Pendleton, Scott Walker, and the
voices of Jim Henson, Frank Oz, Jerry Nelson, Richard Hunt and Dave
Goelz
DIRECTOR: James Frawley
WRITERS: Jack Burns and Jerry Juhl
RELEASED: 1979
"A bear in his natural habitat... a Studebaker." --Fozzie Bear, The
Muppet Movie 
What do you get if you cross a bug-eyed, banjo-strummin' frog, a
wisecracking bear, a love-struck pig with delusions of grandeur, a
brilliant script, astonishingly catchy music, and cinematography that
occasionally borders on magic? Well, in this state you'd probably get
arrested... but that's okay, because you'd also get one of the most
charming and endearing films to claw its way out of the 1970s. 
The continuing appeal of The Muppet Movie is easy to understand after
a viewing or two. It's a fun film, featuring some of cinema's
loveliest melodies (both the musical score and its mesmerizing
signature tune, "Rainbow Connection," were nominated for Oscars). But
"fun" doesn't necessarily equate with "greatness," and it's not the
only justification for the film's continued popularity. It touches a
nerve with viewers. Its simple message ('Believe in yourself, and
nothing is beyond your reach') is one we all want to believe... and in
the hectic '90s, with weekly political scandals and perpetual conflict
in the Middle East, we can all use some quality time with the Muppets
and their values. 
Kermit the Frog (voiced by the late Jim Henson) is a simple fellow. He
lives in a swamp, and passes the time by singing songs and catching
flies, yet somehow he feels unfulfilled. A passing fisherman (Dom
DeLuise), who moonlights as a Hollywood agent, encourages the talented
frog to consider a career in show business. Kermit is still hesitant,
until the agent mentions that Kermit's talent could entertain millions
of people. Wanting nothing more than to share his gifts with the
world, Kermit sets off for Hollywood (by bicycle, no less! The sight
is a visual marvel!) to seek his fortune. Along the way, he meets a
number of other friends, all of whom have the same dream. The most
significant of these are the amiable Fozzie Bear (voiced by Frank Oz),
whose dream of being a stand-up comic is not at all hindered by the
fact that his act isn't the least bit funny; the lovely Miss Piggy (Oz
again), who falls hard for the dapper Kermit; and the strange
turkey-like Gonzo (Dave Goelz) a plumber who dreams of being... well,
a plumber. But having nothing better to do, he tags along for the
ride. 
And what a ride it is! The Muppet Movie is not just another 90-minute
kiddie flick, like so many of today's so-called family films. No, this
one is the real thing: a warm comedy, with a message that actually
says something significant to its audience; as such, it can be enjoyed
by parents and kids alike. As with their spiritual ancestors, Rocky
and Bullwinkle, the Muppets' humor is sophisticated enough to offer
smiles and laughs to all ages. Kids will laugh at Gonzo's physical
stunts, while Mom and Dad will smile at the clever verbal jokes and
visual gags that sail right over Junior's head (the piano player who
looks just like Elton John, the recurring "hare krishna" motif, etc). 
(The complete review can be found at:
 http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/muppet1.htm )

Title
Review for Halloween H20: Twenty Years Later (1998)
STARRING:   Jamie Lee Curtis, LL Cool J, Janet Leigh
DIRECTOR:   Steve Miner
WRITERS:    Robert Zappia, Matt Greenberg, Kevin Williamson (uncredited)
RATED/YEAR: R/1998
        For better or for worse, I am a child of the '80s.  Yes, I cried
at "E.T." when I was ten.  I get nostalgic when I hear the "Miami Vice"
theme song.  I spent most of my lunch money on games of "Donkey Kong."
And yeah, if you must know, I've still got a copy of "Thriller" buried
deep in my album collection.
        Because of this, it's almost unfair for me to review horror
movies.  You may as well ask me to critique the time period during
which my entire personality was defined.  Horror movies weren't just a
once-in-a-while thing for my friends and I; we were obsessed by the silly
things.  Yes, that's right: I, your friendly neighborhood self-appointed
film critic, who loves to watch boring, subtitled French dramas, still
gets giggly with glee at the thought of a slasher flick.  I'm not proud
of this, but I can't help it.  It's in my blood, thanks to the many
Saturday afternoons I spent over at the homes of various friends during
my junior high-school years, catching up on the latest adventures of
Jason, Freddy, and all their ilk.
        The '80s were the closest thing to a Renaissance that the horror
genre has ever had.  New films appeared every few weeks in the already
saturated marketplace, and my friends and I saw most of them.  As America
moved into the politically-correct '90s, however, a decline in both the
quantity and quality of these films became apparent.  Gone were the
suspense and excitement that made the movies so much fun to watch, replaced
instead with lingering shots of gore and brutality.  Attendance plummeted.
Hollywood, following their usual logic, figured this must mean that people
were tired of scary movies.  No, Hollywood, we weren't.  We quit watching
horror flicks because, while we want to be scared, we don't neccessarily
need to see a step-by-step disembowelment of each victim.  The glory days
of suspensful thrillers were gone forever, or so it seemed.
        But in 1996, a little film called "Scream" came along and single-
handedly revitalised the horror industry.  Here, for the first time in
over a decade, was a horror movie with memorable characters and a
fiendishly clever plot, featuring witty (and often hilarious) dialogue.
So profound was "Scream" that, for the first time ever, a screenwriter
(first-time scripter Kevin Williamson), got as much attention as the
director (horror veteran Wes Craven).  The duo teamed up again on the
equally entertaining and successful "Scream 2"; since then, Williamson has
found his services much in demand: he penned the screenplay for "I Know
What You Did Last Summer," in addition to creating the hit TV series
"Dawson's Creek."
        In an interview with a popular screenwriting magazine, Williamson
was asked to name his favorite movie.  "Halloween," he replied without a
moment's hesitation.  He then went on to cite the profound effect that
the movie had on both his life and the horror genre in general.  He did
not exaggerate: "Halloween" is a certified classic, single-handedly
creating (for better or for worse) the slasher movie.
        The story, for those of you not in the know, involves an eight-
year-old boy named Michael Myers, who brutally murdered his sister on
Halloween night, 1963.  Committed to a mental hospital, Myers underwent
years of psycho-analysis before his doctor, Sam Loomis, pronounced him
incurable.  In 1978, Michael, now 23, escaped from the institution and
made his way back to his family's home in Haddonfield Illinois, with Dr.
Loomis in hot pursuit.  The climax of the film, in which Michael stalks the
residents of the neighborhood while Dr. Loomis attempts to stop him, is one
of the genre's finest moments.
        "Halloween" starred a then-unknown actress named Jamie Lee Curtis,
playing the role of all-American girl Laurie Strode, tormented by Myers
for reasons she doesn't understand.  She did an admirable job; her
performance still stands up, twenty years later.  Curtis brought a depth
to the character that reached far beyond the typical caricature roles that
women were usually assigned in such movies; it's easy to believe that
Laurie Strode is a "real" person, not the typical cardboard cutout that
is usually preferred in such parts.  That's why we rooted for her.
        "Halloween" was a huge success, both critically and financially.
Roger Ebert's famous review, in which he gave the film four stars (his
highest rating) and compared it favorably to "Psycho," was typical of the
adulation and praise that it received.  And movie-goers took note: until
recently, "Halloween" was the highest-grossing independent movie *ever*.
(If I remember correctly, "The English Patient" was the film which finally
stole away the title.)
        A sequel quickly followed, and "Halloween II," while flawed,
managed to thrill and delight audiences all over again.  Picking up mere
moments after the original movie ended, we watched as Dr. Loomis continued
his search for Michael Myers, who'd managed to slither from his grasp.
Curtis's character is sent to a nearby hospital to have her wounds treated.
Michael, wanting desperately to finish the job he'd begun earlier that
night, follows her, giving us the opportunity for a suspensful game of cat
and mouse.  In an "Empire Strikes Back"-type twist we learn that Michael is
actally Laurie's brother, which is the reason he's so gung-ho on killing
her: he wants to dispose of his entire family.  Dr. Loomis comes to the
rescue, however, and Michael is apparently destroyed.
        He wasn't, though, and other "Halloween" films followed.  None of
them were anywhere near as successful as these first two outings.  Jamie
Lee Curtis declined to return to the series; therefore, silly new plot
twists were invented, including the introduction of other relatives that
Michael feels the need to dispose of.  John Carpenter, the auteur who
created the series and composed its famous theme song, also called it quits
after two films.  The death of the series was imminent: in subsequent
outings, Dr. Loomis became more and more uninteresting, while the suspense
and tension the first film is so famous for were exchanged for gore.
Sadly, the franchise degenerated into just another bunch of slasher
pictures, no better than the other "copycat" movies which quickly flooded
the market after the success of the first installment.
        I've always thought the series should've given up when Curtis left;
happily, director Steve Miner agrees with me.  The latest installment in the
series, "Halloween: 20 Years Later" is a direct sequel to the first two
films, bringing Jamie Lee Curtis back to the role that began her career
and cheerfully ignoring the other dreadful movies that came out in the
interim.  Kudos, I say!
        The story: Laurie Strode, unable to come to terms with the tragedy
that Michael Myers inflicted upon her, devises a plan to free herself and
reclaim her life.  She fakes her death, changes her name, and moves to
California.  Over the next two decades she gets married, has a son, gets
divorced, and becomes the principal of a fancy private school.  She's a
well-respected community leader, but she still can't shake the demons from
her past.  She sees Michael Myers in every reflection, and has developed a
drug and alcohol problem as her way of dealing with the pressure and her
own questionable sanity.
        Dr. Loomis, her ally from the first two films, has passed away.
In the opening sequence, an intruder breaks into Loomis's empty home and
steals a file containing confidential data on Laurie Strode.  Yes, boys
and girls: it's Michael Myers, determined to find his little sister once
again.
        Offering assistance to Laurie are her son and his friends, plus
Ronnie Jones (LL Cool J), a local security guard/aspiring writer, all of
whom turn in acceptable performances.  (One of the most entertaining comes
from Ronnie's unseen wife, who chats with him constantly on the phone while
he reads her the latest pages of his novel-in-progress.)
        Mr. Miner throws in lots of subtle little touches which suit the
film nicely.  In the original "Halloween," Michael's victims watch "The
Thing" on TV, unaware that a more immediate terror lurks right outside the
living room window.  In "H20," teens watch Ed Wood's "Plan Nine From
Outer Space" ("Your stupid minds!  Stupid, stupid minds!" shouts the
television) and the aforementioned "Scream."  It's a nice tip of the hat
to Kevin Williamson, who also worked on the script (uncredited), no doubt
fulfilling a lifelong dream by doing so.
        Williamson's touch is present throughout, which may be one of the
reasons the film works.  This movie actually feels more like "Scream" than
the later "Halloween" sequels: we have many humorous lines (uncommon even
in the earlier movies), lots of "fake scares" (something Williamson's
earlier movies have thrived on), and of course, the patented "the killer
comes back to life after he's supposed to be dead" trick.  The cliches
occasionally get a bit tedious (do we really need to see the old "the car
won't start when we need to make a quick get-away" gag again?), but by
and large the film knows what to do.  It's not particularly innovative,
but it *is* rock solid.
        Is it perfect?  Hardly.  There are at least two instances in which
the viewer simply must roll his or her eyes good-naturedly at the screen.
One character, who gets all six chambers of a revolver emptied into his
chest, pops up again at the end of the film.  "I'm fine!  The bullets just
grazed me!" he explains.  Uh-huh.  Then why'd you'd bleed all over the
place?  Also, one skeptic who doesn't believe that Myers has really
returned asks: "Why would Michael wait twenty years before seeking revenge
on Laurie?"  An excellent question!  Too bad we never find out the answer.
Both are nitpicks, but they kinda bothered me.
         I loved the photography in this movie.  I'm a sucker for unusual
angles and lighting, and this film does not disappoint.  Like the original
"Halloween," Michael is mainly seen in shadowy profile, giving him an
ethereal quality which suits the film's mood.  The guy's still scary,
you gotta admit.
        The film flies by, thanks to its "to-the-bone" editing.  It runs
a scant 85 minutes (about half as long as "Saving Private Ryan"), making
it one of the shortest non-animated films I've ever seen.  Still,
additional footage would've only slowed its breakneck pace.  I, for one,
approved of its brevity.
        In fact, I have to confess something, and I hope my film-critic
license isn't revoked because of it: I absolutely loved this film.  Jamie
Lee is in top form (and still looks great), the direction is creative, and
the final scene is haunting and satisfying.  (It actually got a hearty
round of applause at the screening I attended.)  Horror films may be a
guilty pleasure for me, but when they're this much fun, who cares?  I felt
like I was 14 again while I was watching.  If I'd only been able to catch
a Mr. Mister tune on the radio after the show, the experience would've
been complete.
        (Oh, and check out the older lady who plays Laurie's receptionist:
yes, it's Janet Leigh!  Not only is she Jamie Lee Curtis's real-life mother,
but she played the shower scene victim in the original "Psycho," too.  How
can any horror fan resist two generations of Scream Queens in the same
movie?)
This review was written: August 6, 1998
Copyright (c) 1998 by Joe Barlow.  This review may be freely distributed as
long as ABSOLUTELY NO CHANGES are made and this disclaimer remains attached.
It may not be reproduced for profit without the written consent of the
author.  If you have comments or questions, please send them to: jbarlow
at earthling dot net (substituting the appropriate symbols, to discourage
spam).
-----
  "Average Joe" Barlow * MiSTie #73097 * Writer/musician/aspiring filmmaker
       jbarlow@YOURearthling.PANTSnet http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow
              {Remove YOUR PANTS to e-mail me.}        

Title
Review for End of Days (1999)
There's no way I can review Peter Hyams' End of Days without sounding
like a bully, so it may as well hand over its lunch money now. While
there's a certain amount of glee involved in watching a movie composed
almost entirely of cliches, explosions, and howlingly bad dialogue,
there isn't a whole lot of entertainment value. Well, that may not be
entirely true: there are plenty of laugh-out-loud moments in End of
Days... which would be good news indeed, if the film was a comedy. 
It's the end of the millenium, and Satan (Gabriel Byrne) has come to
Earth to claim a bride. The lucky gal is Christine York (Robin
Tunney), a twenty year-old New Yorker who doesn't seem particularly
interested in being a concubine to the Lord of Darkness, so she runs
around and screams a lot. But if the devil can work his
hootchy-cootchy on Ms. York between 11pm and midnight on New Year's
Eve, he will, for reasons I'm still not sure I understand, gain
dominance over Earth. It's up to Jericho (Arnold Schwarzenegger) and
his partner Chicago (Kevin Pollak) to save the world, a feat which
will naturally involve blowing up lots of stuff. 
End of Days is so stupifyingly silly that I don't even know where to
begin. The stream of killer urine, perhaps? Or the "fake scares" which
pop up roughly every five minutes or so (you know the drill: someone
walks into a dark room, a jarringly loud chord plays on the
soundtrack, and BOOM!--the cat appears)? Or maybe I should tell you
about Jericho's idea of a nutritious breakfast? It doesn't matter;
suffice it to say there's no shortage of pointlessness to be found
here, with the silliness culminating in a lovely scene in which Arnold
gets his buff ass kicked by a fretful middle-age Jewish housewife. 
One of the things I've come to realize as a critic is that I'm often
harshest to films which personally disappoint me in some way, rather
than those which are completely wretched from start to finish. End of
Days annoys me in a very specific manner: it had potential. Indeed,
there is one scene roughly two-thirds of the way through the film
which actually borders on wonderful: the face-to-face confrontation
between Jericho and Satan. Everything clicks: the dialogue sparkles,
the performances catch fire, the screenplay resonates with wit. For
these five minutes, the script rivals Kevin Smith's Dogma for
intelligent religious satire.
Alas, this scene is so fascinating that it only serves to underline
the rest of the film's banality. It dangles the lost potential of the
story in front of the audience's eyes like a carrot before a mule.
Paradoxically, this scene is partly responsible for my low rating of
the movie: by revealing the heights which the script and performances
are capable of achieving, I'm all the more disappointed with the
tale's inability to reach its demonstrated potential. Had the movie
been consistently wretched, I may actually have rated it a bit higher:
my expectations wouldn't have been raised, and I wouldn't have thought
the story capable of anything better than mindless entertainment. 
I'm sure I'll get a lot of angry letters over this review, as most of
the audience at the preview screening I attended seemed to be having a
far better time than I was. But unfortunately, I have to call it as I
see it, and I think time will prove me correct--too much of the film
revolves around topical dialogue (the end of the millenium, numerous
jokes about the Y2K bug, etc.) Even the people who like End of Days
right now will surely find it hokey and dated in the near future.
Maybe if we're lucky, it'll disappear for another 1,000 years. 

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film: http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write to:
joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com. 

Title
Review for Waking Ned Devine (1998)
        I doubt there's a person alive who hasn't fantasized of
one day winning the lottery and retiring to their personal vision
of paradise, possessing the incredible power that only huge
stacks of cash can provide.  It's been said that winning large
amounts of money can change a person.  Ned Devine (Jimmy
Keogh), a resident of the tiny but beautiful village of Tullymore,
Ireland (population: 52), has just discovered the truth in that
statement: money can not only change you, it can actually kill you.
        It's difficult to construct a review of "Waking Ned Devine,"
the new comedy from writer/director Kirk Jones, without resorting to
phrases like "utterly charming," "quaint" and "crowd-pleasing," three
sentiments which have been used so often in film criticism that their
meanings have become basically non-existent.  And yet, "Waking Ned
Devine" *is* charming, unabashedly so, in the way it draws you into
its spell.  With its colorful (read: quaint) characters, idyllic
scenery and wonderful (read: crowd-pleasing) performances, this film
not only reveals its low-budget roots, it flaunts them proudly.
Budgetwise, Jones delivers a lot of visual punch for pennies, making
excellent use of his movie's biggest star: the village of Tullymore
itself.  This is the sort of film that Hollywood has proven itself
incapable of making: it gives us a portrait of small-town
eccentricity, without once resorting to stereotypes, or (even worse)
the typical one-dimensional characters who populate cinematic towns in
movies like "Hope Floats."
        Jackie O'Shea (Ian Bannen) and Michael O'Sullivan (David
Kelly), two of Tullymore's quirkiest yet amiable inhabitants,
discover that a winning lottery ticket has been sold to someone in
their fair hamlet.  Realizing that one of their neighbors is now an
extraordinarily wealthy person, our two elderly friends practice their
charm on everyone in town, hoping to butter up the new lottery
winner, whoever he or she might be.  Through a series of
uproariously funny events which I will not spoil for you, they
eventually discover the winner: the aforementioned Ned Devine.
Unfortunately, poor Ned dropped dead of a heart attack mere
moments after discovering that he was the lottery winner.  This
leaves our friends with a classic moral dillema: if they report Ned's
death to the officials, the winnings will be recycled back into the
lotto for next week's drawing.  But maybe, just maybe, Michael
could pass himself off as Ned (with Jackie's help) when the lottery
man comes to verify "Ned's" claim-- then they can collect the money
themselves!  No prizes for guessing which option the pair chooses.
        The characters in this film are among the most memorable
to hit the screen in years.  Jackie and Michael are an Irish Abbot
and Costello, generating smiles and laughter with their simple
naiveity and the unexpected hardships their scheme forces them
to endure (witness Michael's hilarious nude motorcycle ride,
which I am convinced will eventually find its way into any complete
list of wonderful cinematic moments).  By far, Jackie and Michael
are the sweetest "villains" I've ever seen, partly because the film
makes it absolutely clear that this type of crazy scheme is so very
alien to them.  James Nesbitt is also wonderful as Pig Finn, the
town's sensitive pig farmer, who loves the beautiful Maggie (Susan
Lynch) with an intensity so "real" and honest that I was actually
touched.  Unfortunately, although she does love the handsome
farmer, Maggie can't abide the permanent odor that years of
working on a pig farm have given him... despite the numerous
"fruity soaps" Pig scrubs himself vigorously with each day.  Many
other equally fascinating people dot the landscape of the village,
and I will leave it up to you to discover them.  Suffice it to say,
they're the kind of people you'd love to invite over for a night of
beer drinking and rousing Irish sing-a-longs.
        In fact, "Waking Ned Devine" is so thoroughly based in its
overwhelming sense of sweetness that when that tone vanishes
(in the final ten minutes of the movie), the film nearly derails
itself.  After having spent ninety minutes with a fun, light-hearted
story and its inhabitants, we are suddenly whirled, for absolutely
no reason, into a sadistic black comedy.  It's a jarring switch,
and more than a little uncomfortable... but it passes quickly, and
we're left to end the film on another note of innocence; somehow,
though, after the "black comedy" scene, the transition back to
innocence seems unconvincing and empty.  It's rather like
spending 90 minutes with an adorable, friendly child... then
witnessing a two-minute temper tantrum right before going home.
The mood is tainted, and you tend to dwell on the few miserable
minutes rather than the good parts.
        Other than this one inappropriate tone change near the end
of the story, "Waking Ned Devine" is a spectacular blend of
comedy and characterization.  Kirk Jones and his cast have created
a special film that far exceeds the intelligence of most of the tripe
coming out of Hollywood these days.  Rest assured that if I won the
lottery tomorrow, neither Hawaii or Paris would be my destination;
instead, I'd take you all to Tullymore with me.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.  Or,
you can subscribe directly from my web page.  Thanks.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Jaws (1975)
STARRING: Roy Scheider, Richard Dreyfess, Robert Shaw, Lorraine Gray
DIRECTOR: Steven Spielberg
WRITERS: Peter Benchley and Carl Gottlieb
RELEASED: 1975
"You yell 'Barracuda!' and everyone says, 'Huh? What?'; You yell
'Shark!' and we've got a panic on our hands on the Fourth of July."
--Larry Vaughn, Mayor of Amity, Jaws 
In 1975, a young director named Steven Spielberg single-handedly
created a new movie genre--the summer blockbuster. The twenty-five
year-old moviemaker's third film, Jaws, shook the industry with such
force that its effects are still being felt today. It forever
shattered Hollywood's belief that people don't watch movies during the
summer; for this reason alone, every action extravaganza that followed
it, from Star Wars to Independence Day to Spielberg's own Jurassic
Park and The Lost World, owes a debt of gratitude to this tale of
terror. Jaws continues to serve as a benchmark of suspense cinema, and
still retains its visceral power nearly a quarter-century after its
initial release. 
Moonlight sparkles on the ocean. A nude swimmer plunges into the cool
water, splitting the waves with a splash. She swims. She floats. She
laughs.  She dies. 
Martin Brody (Roy Schieder), the chief of police in the idyllic
seaside town of Amity, is quick to react to the news of the shark
attack. He sensibly believes the beaches should be closed until the
leviathan can be vanquished. The townsfolk, however, are less certain:
Amity is a summer town which depends on tourist dollars for its
survival. Every day the beaches are closed, the town grows poorer;
although Brody believes that safety is the more important concern, he
is overruled by Mayor Vaughn (Murray Hamilton). Soon the beaches are
open once again... with disastrous results. 
Brody calls for help from the Oceanographic Institute, and a young
shark expert named Matt Hooper (Richard Dreyfuss) is sent to assist.
The duo teams up with a crusty local salt named Quint (Robert Shaw),
who offers to kill the shark--for a fee, of course. 
The story at the heart of Steven Spielberg's Jaws revolves not so much
around the creature which has taken up residence in the waters of
Amity, but around the townsfolk who are forced to deal with the
consequences of its presence. It's a subtle distinction, but it makes
all the difference. Jaws is not a monster flick; it's the story of
three men facing a seemingly insurmountable force of nature. In
keeping the emphasis on the characters rather than the shark, as the
film's three wretched sequels did, Spielberg crafted a cinematic work
that still fascinates and mesmerizes. Human moments dominate the
tale--take a look at the oft-parodied "injury comparison" scene aboard
Quint's boat, the Ocra, and tell me whether you saw anything so clever
or affecting in, say, Independence Day. 
(The rest of this review can be found at:
http://www.ipass.net/~jaws.htm )
(c) Copyright 1999 by Joe Barlow. All rights reserved.

Title
Review for Why Do Fools Fall In Love (1998)
        Give Gregory Nava and Tina Andrews an "A" for effort.  If "Why Do
Fools Fall in Love?" isn't completely successful, it's only because the
creators' vision is too grand for the constraints of a two-hour movie.
The film tries to be everything: a mystery, a comedy, a drama, a love
story, a documentary, a character study, a concert film.  That's a tall
order, but what's remarkable is how close Nava and Andrews come to
actually pulling it off.  The movie is compelling; even if portions of it
are slightly uneven, it remains solid (and touching) entertainment.
        The film is based on the life of Frankie Lymon, the teen
singer who hit the Top Ten with "Why Do Fools Fall in Love?", a catchy
tune he penned with one of his schoolmates.  Rendered obsolete by the
British Invasion after a brief flash of stardom, Frankie descended into
drug abuse, poverty, and obscurity.  Several years later, having never
regained his former fame, he died of a heroin overdose.  He was only 26
at the time.
        We can all agree that this tale is a tragedy, but an additional
factor makes Lymon's story even more fascinating: he left behind three
women, all claiming to be his wife... and none realising they weren't
alone in this claim.  Since Frankie's music publisher owes the Lymon
estate an estimated four million dollars in back payments, it's easy to
understand why each woman wants to be named his heir.
        Contrary to the romantic-comedy impression projected by the
movie's trailer, "Why Do Fools Fall in Love?" is basically a courtroom
drama focusing on the three wives' attempts to prove their cases.  Along
the way, we'll see numerous flashbacks of each woman's memories of
Frankie, which, although contradictory, help to show us different facets
of who he was.  But we know the truth is buried somewhere in their
testimonies, which is exactly why the story is so interesting.
        We learn via flashback of Frankie's early days and success, and
see first-hand how charming he could be... as well as his darker, more
manipulative side.  Perhaps most importantly, we witness just how
valueable music was to him.  Lymon didn't sing for the money; he sang
because his soul demanded it.  In these early concert scenes, Lymon
(flawlessly portrayed by Larenz Tate) is energetic.  He doesn't so much
SING the music as CHANNEL it to the audience.  His happiness is so
apparent, his joy for performing so all-encompassing and contagious, that
even if you don't like his songs, you'll respect the attitude with which
he shares them.
        The film skips nimbly through the thirteen years encompassing
Frankie's first brush of success, his relationship with all three women,
and the circumstances leading up to his death.  Occasionally, important
details are glossed over (Frankie reportedly causes a "national scandal"
by dancing with a white girl on television... but what are the exact
details and repurcussions?), but on the whole, things move along at a
pleasantly brisk clip.  There's no time to get bored while Frankie's on
the screen.
        The flashback footage is effective, and does a great job of
capturing the frantic early days of rock and roll.  The costumes,
hairstyles and scenery are a sight to behold, and seeing them through
Frankie's eyes, we're caught up in the wonder and excitement of a by-gone
era.  Because of this intimate portrait, we're able to sympathize with
him when his career goes sour.  I was impressed and surprised by how much
the filmmakers made me care about him.
        The film's photography is not without artistry, either.  Remember
those incredible transitions in "Titanic," used to simulate the passage
of years?  Well, "Why Do Fools..." employs one such moment that's the
equal of anything in Cameron's epic.  It's the 80s, during the trial.
Little Richard (in a scene-stealing cameo) is on the witness stand,
discussing his friendship with the late Mr. Lymon.  As Richard talks about
the days he spent on the road with Frankie, the camera slowly pans over to
a nearby window... but the sights outside are clearly those of 1955.  We
zoom outside, revealing a large auditorium.  Displayed proudly on the
marquee: "TONIGHT ONLY!  LITTLE RICHARD!  THE PLATTERS!  FRANKIE LYMON AND
THE TEENAGERS!"  Excited teens hurry into the theater, and after a moment,
so do we.  The camera "runs" along, just another excited teen, as we dash
into the auditorium and discover The Platters on stage.  The camera spins
around, giving us a full view of the crowded theater; then, we're swept
onto the stage.  We drift over to the wings where we discover the young
Frankie, waiting to go on.  After a moment, The Platters conclude their
lovely song, and Lymon hits the stage.  We're right there with him as he
and The Teenagers, his backing group, perform a show-stopping rendition
of "Baby Baby."  The camera swoops dramatically around the group in a
grand circle, and there we remain until the song's conclusion.  Frankie
waves to the audience, then he's off the stage... and only then do we
realise that all these events, beginning with Little Richard's appearance
on the witness stand, were depicted via one single unbroken shot.  It's
one of the most memorable camera movements I've ever seen, seamlessly
bridging twenty years of American history without so much as a jump cut.
        So exciting are these scenes that the courtroom story becomes a
bit of a bore.  It doesn't help that the three women are clearly only
after Frankie's money; even in the flashback scenes, with the exception
of his third wife, Emira (Lela Rochon), none of the women truly seem to
love him.  Frankie's first wife, Zola Taylor (Halle Berry), is too hung
up on her career to give him much time (she's a vocalist for The
Platters).  Second wife Elizabeth (Vivica Fox) honestly seems to prefer
her dog.  Frankie and Emira, on the other hand, have a strong chemistry
when they're on-screen together.  She's sweet, unassuming, and cares
deeply for Frankie; in turn, he worships her and uses her presence as an
inspiration to clean up his act... or at least try.  Unfortunately,
Emira's last line in the movie capsizes the whole illusion.  Greed
corrupts everyone in the end, apparently.
        One thing that initially bothered me about the film was the fact
that Frankie's personality is never concretely defined.  Since we get to
know him only through the eyes of three self-serving women, there is an
abundance of confusion, contradictions, and accusations.  Why does Frankie
feel the need to marry three women?  We don't know; even at the time of
his death, the matter is left wide open.  This disappointed me as I left
the theater, but having mulled the matter over at some length, I no
longer think that way.  The story is told through the rememberences of
three women; since THEY don't know the games Frankie was playing, it
occurred to me that the movie CAN'T convey the answer.  Not only is this
not a flaw, as I originally thought, but it actually adds a degree of
realism uncommon in a biographical film.  Director Nava and screenwriter
Andrews were wise not to make Frankie into a saint.  He may be a shadowy,
mysterious person, but through this movie (and their reverence), I feel
that I know him a little better.
        One final note.  The day after seeing this film, I bought the
"Frankie Lymon's Greatest Hits" CD.  As I've grown familiar with these
tunes, I've realised that this movie is probably unneccessary: we don't
need a biography on Lymon to discover who he is, because everything you
need to know about him is in his voice and his music.  The women, the
the drugs, the financial setbacks... none of that matters.  In a hundred
years, Frankie Lymon won't be remembered for anything but his sweet voice,
his incredible showmanship, and a talent which self-destructed all too
quickly beneath the pressures of public life.  Today, for the first time,
I mourn a true rock and roll original.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.

Title
Review for Batman & Robin (1997)
        It's always painful to witness the degredation of someone you
dearly love... to watch, helpless, as a once strong family member succumbs
to illness or the ravages of old age.  Gradually the strength and
personality traits that you remember so fondly vanish as the person dwindles
away, replaced by a shell of their former self.  They may still breathe, and
perhaps even move around from time to time, but it's obvious that their spark
is gone.  Watching it happen to my grandfather was difficult enough... and
now I get to see the same thing occur to the Batman film series.  Oh joy.
        I was a big fan of the dark vision Tim Burton brought to the first
two Batman outings.  Gotham actually breathed on the silver screen; it was
sinister and full of secrets.  Michael Keaton didn't so much play Batman as
BECOME him.  The cherry on top was the great characterization, far more in
keeping with Bob Kane's original comic books than the campy sixties
television show.  Gone were the WHAPS! and POWS! of Adam West, replaced with
great action sequences and an intense score from composer extrordinaire
Danny Elfman.  I even went so far as to buy one of those goofy t-shirts with
the bat logo boldly emblazoned on it.  (Yes, that's right... I was one of
THOSE guys.)
        Situations beyond my control prevented me from seeing the third
film ("Batman Forever"), helmed by director Joel Shumaucher and starring Val
Kilmer as the caped crusader, but when the fourth installment appeared in
theaters, I was more than game.  Another trip to Gotham, and with the lovely
and talented Uma Thurman to boot?  How could I possibly resist?  Ho boy.
How our naievity mocks us.
        "Batman and Robin" starts off with the obligatory action sequence, in
which Batman (George Clooney) and his increasingly annoying sidekick Robin
(Chris O'Donnell) attempt to foil Mr. Freeze (Arnold Schwarzenegger) in a
diamond robbery.  In an interesting interpretation of physics, Freeze
launches our heroes high into the atmosphere in some sort of rocket-thingy
whose purpose is never explained.  Batman urgently tells Robin that they must
stop the rocket, because it will soon explode and turn Gotham into a huge
crater.  Then, in an amazingly bold feat of self-contradiction, B&R set the
rocket to self-destruct.  How do they escape?  Simple.  They skateboard back
down through the atmosphere to Gotham.  Yes, you read that right.  Skateboard.
Through the air.  Back down to Gotham.  Read it again so your brain absorbs
the absurdity of the situation.  Then witness how B&R boldly blow up the
rocket mere moments after explaining the importance of not letting it explode.
        Next we're off to the Amazon jungle to enjoy the cliched ramblings of
a Dr. Clayton Forrester look-alike as he attempts to turn a 98-pound weakling
into a sumu wrestler via some sort of venom-juice.  He is of course
successful, and all goes well until Dr. Unattractive (Uma Thurman) uncovers
the secret plot.  The mad scientist isn't happy, and kills her to demonstrate
this.  She rewards him by coming back to life as a sexy super villain and
killing him with a poison kiss.  Lucky guy: not only does he get to smooch
one of the most beautiful women currently working in the movie industry, but
he gets to exit the film very early to boot.
        Back at Wayne Manor, Bruce Wayne's aged butler Alfred gets a lovely
surprise on the doorstep: Alicia Silverstone, who plays his British niece,
has come for an unannounced visit (and apparently left her accent at home).
They fondle each other for a bit in one of the most disturbing (yet not
actually dirty) displays of affection ever captured on film.  Robin becomes
infatuated with her, and follows her one night when she steals a motorcycle
to go racing.  She of course gets in trouble and he saves her, because,
after all, she's only a woman.
        In one of my favorite scenes, Robin and the future Batgirl find
themselves dangling off a bridge.  Robin has somehow managed to wrap his
foot around a metal bar, which assumedly prevents him from falling off the
bridge into the rushing water below.  Visualize with me, now: we have our
wormy hero, hanging off the bridge by one foot.  He is holding on to Alicia
Silverstone.  That's two of them, dangling precariously by one foot.  Then,
we cut to... the two of them safely back at Wayne Manor.  No explanation
whatsoever.  To quote Lenny from the Simpsons: "We won't bore you with the
details of our miraculous escape."
        It gets worse.  In an attempt to assumedly add a comic-book feel to
the film, the director has inserted cartoon sound effects into the fight
scenes.  For example, when one of the evil henchmen falls down a staircase,
we hear a sound similar to Wile E. Coyote falling off a cliff.  Whether this
was supposed to inspire laughter is unknown.  It did get a reaction from me,
though I doubt very much it was the one the director wanted.
        In the most vomitous feel-good ending of the summer, Mr. Freeze helps
Batman cure Alfred of a crippling disease.  It just so happens that Freeze is
the world's leading expert on this particular disease.  That's pushing
believability as it is... but would you believe Freeze just happens to carry
the cure for the disease in his armband?  My, isn't that convenient.
        Next, stir in a lousy soundtrack and lots of people flying around on
wires that are almost invisible during the fight scenes.  Add a dash of some
of the most poorly-handled special effects of the summer, sprinkled in with
some gratingly bad puns courtesy of screenwriter Akiva Goldsman.  Is the
bile rising yet?
        Arnold's acting has all the depth and range I've come to expect from
his post-Conan movies, which is to say, none at all.  His films, however, are
more about attitude than acting, and I can't really hold his performance
against him.  In a movie like "The Running Man," where the story is strong
enough to let me ignore his terrible line-reads, it's not a problem... but in
"Batman and Robin," it's simply one more thing to bristle at.  It doesn't
help that most of his dialogue consists of groanably bad puns, either.  And
not bad in a fun kind of way; just really *awful*.
        Alicia Silverstone is fine in her role, but it's so poorly written
that it could do her professional reputation more harm than good.  Her
character alternates between strong and fragile, determined and waffling.
Poor Alicia; I know she tried hard, and I don't fault her.  Same with Uma
and Chris O'Donnell; no problems with them personally, except they should've
had the will-power to turn down a script this bad.
        This movie also attempts to set the Women's Rights movement back
thirty years.  Every woman in this film is portrayed very badly, from the
aforementioned Alicia Silverstone to Bruce Wayne's marriage-hungry girlfriend
(Elle MacPherson).  And Uma?  Well, Batgirl comments on Uma's character:
"People like you give women a bad name!"  True enough.
        If the movie has one good thing, it's George Clooney.  Many folks are
in strong disagreement with me, but I thought his performance as Batman was at
least as strong as Keaton's.  I don't watch TV so I've never seen whatever
show he's on ("ER," maybe?), but I liked him here.  Unfortunately, no matter
how talented Clooney may be as an actor, he can't carry a film when the
script has him doing nothing more than standing around, staring, and
occasionally barking such helpful lines as "Let's go!" and "That was close!"
Despite all that, Clooney was surprisingly likeable... which says quite a
bit about his screen presence.
        One thing the film gets right is the depiction of Gotham itself.
Like Burton, Schumacher knows how to create memorable images of a city
caught in the struggle of good and evil.  Some of the scenes of frozen
city streets (courtesy of Mr. Freeze) are particularly well done.  The
lighting, costumes and sets are all lovely... but a few pretty pictures
aren't enough to save this clunker.
        In conclusion: There are worse movies in existence, but it still
hurts to encounter a film this far off the mark.  With a better script,
this could've been the ultimate Batman extravaganza; instead, one is left
with what could only generously be called a mediocre film.  Better luck next
time, Mr. Schumacher.  We'll be waiting... same bat time, same bat channel.
This review was originally rewritten: June 22, 1997
Revised: July 2, 1998
Copyright (c) 1998 by Joe Barlow.  This review may be freely distributed as
long as ABSOLUTELY NO CHANGES are made and this disclaimer remains attached.
It may not reproduced for profit without the written consent of the author.
If you have comments or questions, please send them to: jbarlow at earthling
dot net (substituting the appropriate symbols, to discourage spam).

Title
Review for Patch Adams (1998)
        It's a shame when a film comes so close to getting it right.
"Patch Adams" seems to know what it's doing and where it's
headed for so much of the time that its gradual descent into
cheap, manipulative melodrama is a far greater tragedy than anything
depicted in the story itself.  As a comedy, there are plenty of
wonderful moments... but as a drama, this film needs immediate
medical attention.
        It's been said that laughter is the best medicine, and Hunter
"Patch" Adams (Robin Williams) apparently agrees.  A fun-loving
and mischievious (but big-hearted) scamp, Patch thinks the power
of humor and kindness are traits that can be used to facilitate
healing.  As a medical student, Patch's outlandish antics earn him
the scourn of the medical powers that be... even as this same
behavior endears him to his patients.
        Does that plot summary seem a little familiar?  Of course
it does: it's the same basic formula used in any number of other
Robin Williams vehicles, including "Good Morning Vietnam,"
"Dead Poets' Society," and, to a certain extent, "Good Will
Hunting."  Although the same basic storyline appears in each of
these films (kind-hearted mentor uses unorthodox methods to
reach out to others as supervisors frown), "Patch Adams" does
not reach the dramatic heights attained by its illustrious
predecessers, despite a number of attempts.  The main reason:
a complete lack of subtlety on behalf of its screenplay.  This
film is shameless in the way it assaults the audience with its
manipulative juices.  Let's take inventory: we have (1) an
abundant supply of sick, lonely children; (2) an orchestral score
that beats you over the head with the pure force of its saccharine;
(3) the death of not one but *two* characters important to our
protaganist over the course of the story, which leads us straight
into (4) a heartfelt speech delivered to a tombstone.  All this I
might be willing to overlook, but there is a moment towards the
end of the film that it so blatant and astoundingly ridiculous that
I must make mention of it.  I won't reveal the specific details,
but it involves all those sick, lonely children making an appearance
when  Patch's spirits are at their lowest ebb.  I was so moritifed
at this obvious attempt to give the audience 'warm fuzzies' that I
actually grabbed the arm of my chair to prevent myself from
walking out.
        If the dramatic elements of the story are disappointing,
however, the comedic moments are a lot of fun.  The film is most
successful when it deals with Adams's effervescent personality, for
it's then that Williams is allowed to do what he does better than
any other actor in Hollywood: go completely crazy.  I can't deny
that the character of Patch is a lot of fun to watch, which once
again proves my theory that when Robin Williams is having a good
time, the audience will too.  The gags are fast, frequent, and
laugh-out-loud funny, with the best moments involving Adams's
special preparations for a visiting gynecological convention, and
the hosting of a "balloon safari" in a patient's room.
        The stumbling blocks (and alas, there are many) show up
when the film attemps to convince us that it's a far more important
work than it actually is.  Unquestionably the story deals with
important issues, but the delivery of this material is so heavy-handed
that I felt quite put off by it.  Basking in stereotype, "Patch Adams"
paints everyone in strict black and white terms; they are either
"good," like Patch and his shy friend Truman (Daniel London), or
"bad," like Dean Walcott (Bob Gunton) and most of the other authority
figures we meet.  I don't know a single person in the real world who
is strictly one-dimensional, yet this film is overflowing with them.
        "Patch Adams" has flashes of creative inspiration, a message
that's worth hearing, and a tremendous performance by Robin Williams
in the title role; these three items are enough to make me
hesitatingly recommend it.  It's a shame, however, that these positive
traits are forced to fight for screen time with cardboard-like
supporting characters and countless attempts at audience manipulation.
A good drama can make an audience cry, but "Patch Adams" jams a tube
in its viewers' eyes and attempts to siphon their tears.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.  Or,
you can subscribe directly from my web page.  Thanks.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)
        Film criticism may well be the Art of the Fool, the last refuge
of those who wish to be involved in the movie industry but lack the
talent or drive needed to actually create something.  How does the
expression go?  "Those who can, do; those who can't, criticize."
While this may be a bit harsh (and is certainly not true in every
case), I think it does have some basis in reality.
        I hope to get involved in the film business one day, though I
have not yet produced anything except some experimental footage that
I'd be reluctant to screen for any but my most non-critical friends.
I am still learning what makes a shot work, the effects that different
types of lighting can have, and the many ways in which a storyline can
be revealed to the audience (with "The Truman Show" being one of the
finest examples I've ever seen).  Film criticism, to me, is part of the
learning process.  By subjecting myself to as many films as possible,
then writing my comments while the film is still fresh in my mind, I
have learned a great deal about what makes a particular film "good" or
"bad," at least in my eyes.  I notice the frequency with which certain
cliches (such as "I have a BAD feeling about this" or "I'm sorry, I
was wrong.  Can you ever forgive me?") crop up in different movies.
Sharing these observations with all of you helps my film education,
just as it hopefully offers new insight for you, the reader, as well.
        But it's important to remember that no matter what credentials a
critic has, everything boils down in the end to one person's opinion.
Despite the fact that I personally adore "Star Wars" and consider it one
of this century's most incredible cinematic achievements, I know people
who hate it.  "Citizen Kane," the best movie ever made according to the
recent American Film Institute survey, is not universally adored.  (I
like and respect it, but I still think "Casablanca" is superior.)  My
favorite film critic, Roger Ebert, cited this year's "Dark City" as a
cinematic masterpiece, praising its visuals and sinister feel; I, on the
other hand, found the film mediocre at best and less than that much of
the time.
        The point is, there's no "right" or "wrong" in this field; all a
critic can do is explain why he or she thinks a film is or isn't worth
seeing.  As often as not, you'll disagree with the opinions they provide.
That's fine.  In my short time reviewing films on the Internet, I've
received a mountain of correspondence from people who have seen (or opted
not to see) films based on my recommendation, as well as those who saw a
film before reading my review and later dropped me a line to tell me how
much they did (or did not) agree with me.  It's flattering to know that
people can decide to go to a movie they had no intention of seeing, based
on your recommendation.  I enjoy reading the responses my reviews
generate, even the ones that dispute what I have to say.  Believe me,
there are plenty of them.
        Nothing I've written, however, has generated more feedback than
some offhand comments I made about Steven Spielberg's latest film,
"Saving Private Ryan."  After casually mentioning how disappointed I was
by the movie on both my favorite IRC chat room and a "general talk"
newsgroup, I was flooded by a number of intelligent, well-thought-out
rebuttals.  I debated the film's merits or lack thereof with several of
these filmgoers, and ignored the vulgar messages I received from a
half-dozen or so others which questioned my sanity and insulted my
heritage.  Clearly, people respond to this movie in a way almost without
precedent.   For these reasons, I specifically decided I would not
review the film.  When so many people disagree with me (and indeed,
I've yet to come across a single other person either on the internet or
in "real-life" who shares my opinion on the movie), then maybe it's
just me, you know?
        Ego intervened, however.  I've received three different e-mails
this week from readers asking for my opinion on the film.  "We haven't
seen it, because we want to know what you think about it first,"
explains one particularly kind letter.  So I've decided to compromise.
Rather than write a completely new review of the film, I'm going to
plunder the e-mails and posts I've already written about the movie,
cobbling together a Frankenstein-esque review from these many "parts."
As always, if people have comments or questions, I'm all ears.  If
people have insults and ridicule for my opinion, that's fine too; just
don't expect a response.  It's my greatest desire not to get into
another violent arguments over this movie.  Thanks.  --AJB
        In case you missed the point of "Schindler's List," Steven
Spielberg would like you to know that World War II was a bad thing.
His new movie, "Saving Private Ryan," is a shockingly violent yet
surprisingly boring drama which begins during the D-Day invasion of 1944
(giving the director the chance to throw blood and entrails in our face
for half an hour and call it "art") and ends with... well, pretty much
the same scene, except on a bridge rather than a beach.
        Tom Hanks plays Captain John Miller, the leader of a small troop
of American soldiers in the midst of this hell.  Miller has clearly
seen enough violence and destruction to last him the rest of his days;
his hands shake violently when he tries to do something as simple as
take a drink of water.  Isolation is his defense against his
environment-- so secretive is he about his private life that the troop
has a running bet: will the war end before Miller reveals any personal
details about himself to them?
        After surviving a nightmarish battle, Hanks and his soldiers
are given a new mission: to find a soldier named James Ryan and escort
him to safety.  The reason?  It appears that all three of his brothers
were killed in combat on the same day.  The army, figuring that poor
Mrs. Ryan deserves a consolation prize, decides to send the surviving
son home.  The problem is, no one is quite sure where Ryan is, so it's
up to Hanks and his crew to find the poor boy.  For much of the film,
they "search" for him by dashing up to random people and yelling
"Private James Ryan!  Do you know him?"
        The basic premise of the movie is laughably bad.  Raise your
hand if you think the army would feel sorry for a woman whose sons had
died in combat.  From the army's perspective, that's what they're there
for!  Would the military *really* risk the lives of a whole squadron of
people in an attempt to rescue a wayward son, especially when the movie
takes place in June of 1944?  From my rememberence of history, the war
wasn't going particularly well for the Allies at that time.  They'd
surely be making the best possible use of all their resources, not
assigning them to frivilous projects.
        The excuse used to justify the plot: the army thinks it will
be a great morale boost if Ryan can be found and sent home to his
mother.  Beg pardon?  Let me get this straight: you've got thousands
of American soldiers risking their lives in combat every day,
fighting on foreign soil.  They haven't seen their loved ones in
months, or even *years*.  All of a sudden, they learn that Private
James Ryan is going home.  That's supposed to inspire morale?  I'd
think it would inspire resentment and jealousy.  But no matter.
It's the plot of the movie, and we'll let it be.
        After our opening bloodbath, we watch our "heroes" (and I use
the term loosely, since we learn so little about these guys that it's
hard to feel anything at all for them) hike around the countryside and
shoot things for a couple of hours.  During this time, they talk at
great length about very little, tease the "new guy" mercilessly, and
hedge bets on where their captain is from.  These exchanges reek so
badly of cliche' that we immediately know: (1) the new guy will
eventually do something brave and daring, thereby earning the respect
of his peers, and (2) sooner or later, Miller will unveil his life
story to the troops, probably during a moment of great tension.
        As always, Tom Hanks's performance is spectacular.  He does
such a fine job with his role that it's possible not to noice how
poorly written his character is.  With his convincing facial gestures
and a world-weariness that seems beyond genuine, Hanks *becomes*
Captain Miller; the problem is, Captain Miller's not very interesting.
The tactic of keeping him aloof from the audience and his troops was
probably intended to make him seem mysterious.  It made me not like
him very much.  Why am I expected to bond with a character that I
know absolutely nothing about?
        Indeed, that's the biggest problem with the film: we're given
absolutely no reason to care about anything happening on the screen at
all.  The members of Miller's troop may as well be played by department-
store mannequins for all the emotion and depth they show.  From time
to time, someone dies.  Does it bother us?  Not once.  We've not been
given a reason to be.
        Also, on a semi-related note: have we become so desensitized
as a society that extreme violence is now funny?  You won't find
another movie with violence this realistic, but at the screening I
attended, the audience greeted much of this footage with giggles and
titters.  One soldier loses his arm and bends down to pick it up.
*audience snickers*  A soldier removes his helmet; immediately his
head explodes in a round of mortar fire, drenching his companions
with brains and bloody goo.  *audience giggles*  And the biggest offense:
Hanks and his men eventually find Private Ryan, after slogging their
way through enemy terrain, losing much of their party in the process.
But get this: it's the WRONG Private Ryan!  The audience shrieked with
delighted laughter at this scene.  I sat in stunned silence.  'Yeah,
that's really funny.  These guys have fought hard for their cause,
shed plenty of blood, seen some of their companions killed... and why?
Because the tip they had on Ryan's whereabouts was wrong!  Boy,
that's a knee-slapper.'  But the audience continued to hoot in utter
delight, as though it were the best practical joke they'd ever seen.
Never have I wanted to slap so many people.
        Spielberg opted to shoot much of the film with hand-held
cameras to capture a documentary/in-the-field look; as such, the
picture shakes badly during many scenes (imagine watching a "movie"
shot by a four-year-old with a camcorder).  I got a splitting headache
while trying to follow the action, and that's the honest truth.  Tripod,
Steven.  You know you want one.
        Let's go back to the film's beginning again.  The story opens
with 30 minutes of nonstop carnage.  That in and of itself is not a
problem, but during these scenes nothing that is relevant to the plot
happens, certainly nothing that requires this much screen time.  We
learn nothing about the characters.  Just because I recognize the
wonderful actor Tom Hanks in the lead role does mean that I will
automatically care what happens to the person he is playing if I
haven't been given any kind of emotional hook into his psyche.
Spielberg spent an awful lot of money on these scenes, but it's a lot
of footage that seems to have no point other than conveying the horrors
of warfare.  I already know that war is a bad thing, and the fact that
the film rubs our nose in it for so long detracts from the pace of the
story.  We don't even learn what the movie is about until we're nearly
an hour into it.  Spielberg seems so in love with the grotesqueness of
these shots that he forgets to include a petty item like "story."
        Contrast this with Spielberg's other WW2 film, the equally
long "Schindler's List" (one of my favorite movies, EVER).  All of
the characters, including the villains, had depth to them.  We felt
the turmoil Oskar Schindler went through.  We saw how his attitude
changed and grew over the course of the movie, and we understood the
decisions he made.  I didn't get any of that from the characters in
"Saving Private Ryan."  No one really changes emotionally, and I've
got to believe that warfare, especially warfare THAT graphic, will
have psychological effects on people.  Apart from Miller's shaking
hands, no one seemed the least bit off-balance.  They're made of
sterner stuff than I.
        In a nutshell: I didn't like Spielberg's approach.  It's
almost as if the movie is saying "Look!  I am showing lots and lots
of very realistic warfare.  Therefore, I am a GREAT FILM.  You will
TAKE ME SERIOUSLY.  You will CRY WHEN I TELL YOU TO.  YOU MUST LIKE
ME!"  Many are calling the film "brilliant"; I'm calling it "the
Emporer's new clothes."  So many critics are raving about the movie
that the majority of cinemagoers are being brainwashed into thinking
it's far better than it really is.
        "Saving Private Ryan" tries much too hard; "Schindler's List,"
apart from the final cemetary scene, played upon your emotions very
subtly.  You never realised just how much you cared about Oskar, but
when the ending rolls around you're blinking back tears.  "Saving
Private Ryan," on the other hand, seems like it was conceived from
the outset as a GREAT FILM.  There's no restraint; everything is so
in-your-face that I frequently found myself closing my eyes-- not to
shut out the visuals, but to simply distance myself from the movie,
which seemed to want to climb into my lap.
        Many will say that's the point: Spielberg is trying to thrust
the horrors of war upon us.  I don't know.  I found myself caring about
good ol' Forrest Gump's war buddies a lot more than these guys, partly
because they (especially Bubba and Lt. Dan) were so well-developed.
When a character dies in "Ryan," I simply shrugged-- just another
"nobody."  I never got the feeling that they (apart from Hanks, near
the end) had anyone back home praying for their safe return.
        When I complained about the film's lack of subtlety on a news-
group, one of the film's many admirers chimed back with, "Does anyone
remember any subtlety in World War II?  Neither do I."  Touche'.  But
you know, I don't recall World War II being billed as entertainment.
        Unfortunately, I can't think of a single reason to recommend
this film, and considering the name of the director, whose work I
usually enjoy, that's surprising.  The characters are uninteresting,
the photography is difficult to watch, the music is generic, the pace
is nonexistant.  It's a shame, but I guess Spielberg needs his failures
to make his triumphs that more powerful.  Forget about "Saving Private
Ryan," friends.  Save your money instead.
This review was written in spurts from July 25, 1998 to August 14, 1998.
Copyright (c) 1998 by Joe Barlow.  This review may be freely distributed as
long as ABSOLUTELY NO CHANGES are made and this disclaimer remains attached.
It may not be reproduced for profit without the written consent of the
author.  If you have comments or questions, please send them to: jbarlow
at earthling dot net (substituting the appropriate symbols, to discourage
spam).
-----
  "Average Joe" Barlow * MiSTie #73097 * Writer/musician/aspiring filmmaker
       jbarlow@YOURearthling.PANTSnet http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow
              {Remove YOUR PANTS to e-mail me.}        

Title
Review for Vita  bella, La (1997)
STARRING:  Roberto Benigni, Nicoletta Braschi, Giorgio
                Cantarini, Horst Buchholz, Sergio Bustric
DIRECTOR:  Roberto Benigni
WRITERS:   Roberto Benigni and Vincenzo Cerami
RATED:     PG-13
RELEASED:  1997 (1988 in the USA, subtitled)
        Roberto Benigni's "Life is Beautiful" is the sort of film
which exemplifies the power of cinema: it's art without pretension,
hope without fear, dreams without restrictions.  Although it has been
criticized as a sanitization of the Holocaust, the movie pulls no
emotional punches; by sharing the hardships and joy of the characters,
we are reminded just how precious and remarkable the human spirit is.
        It's 1939 Italy, and Guido Orefice (Benigni) is a pleasant,
amiable waiter who works in a restaurant owned by his uncle.
Clever and impulsive, Guido uses humor as an ally while serving his
customers, making him well-liked, especially by Dr. Lessing (Horst
Buchholz), a German who shares Guido's fondness for puns and riddles.
Their relationship is particularly intriguing, as Guido is Jewish.
        When a chance meeting with the lovely Dora (Nicoletta
Braschi, Benigni's real-life spouse) sets his heart aflutter, Guido
goes to great lengths to win her love, despite her engagement to
a snooty government official.  Their mutual affection gradually
deepens into something more, culminating in a wonderful scene in
which Guido disrupts Dora's engagement party to whisk her away on
horseback.  It's here that a more conventional film would end... but
there's nothing conventional about "Life is Beautiful," and this scene
occurs less than halfway through the story.
        Flash forward six years to 1945: Guido and Dora are happily
married, and are now parents to a five-year old son named Giosue'
(Giorgio Cantarini).  Fortune has been good to them: Guido even owns
the bookstore he's always wanted!  But Guido's Jewish heritage is
discovered by a facist-filled government, and he and his son are sent
to an unidentified concentration camp.  Dora, a Gentile, is not
required to attend the camp, but she demands to go with her family;
her devotion to her husband and child is that selfless.
        Young Giosue' is frightened, but it's here that Guido
gives his greatest performance, convincing his son that they are
embarking on a grand adventure, an epic game that will be exciting
and fun.  (The prize for winning the game?  A full-size tank!)  Guido
knows that the Nazi officers who run the camp are looking for reasons
to dispose of the prisoners, so he tells Giosue' that he (Giosue') can
win extra points for hiding, remaining silent for long periods of
time, etc.  These are poignant scenes, as father and son rekindle each
other's enthusiasm and optimism (Dora is in a different part of the
segregated camp).  Although the other children are gradually
disappearing into the camp's gas chambers, Guido uses humor to keep
his son oblivious to their fate, sparing Giosue' from the emotional
agony and sense of helplessness that he himself is feeling.
        The structure of "Life is Beautiful" is somewhat like Robert
Rodriguez's "From Dusk Til Dawn," in the sense that each half of
the film has a completely different tone, joined together by a
startlingly abrupt transition.  It's ingenious and effective: both
halves of the movie are masterfully constructed, but as different as
night and day.  The warm, sunny first half establishes these wonderful
characters and their relationships; we see Guido's remarkable
personality in full-swing, and witness the passion and joy he derives
from simple, ordinary activities.  These early moments also set up
his fairy-tale love affair with Dora (Guido refers to her as his
"princess" throughout the story), and their devotion to each other is
made clear-- we understand why she is willing to follow Guido to a
concentration camp.  The story's second half, by contrast, uses their
love as a foundation on which to build triumph and tragedy.  The
construction is as elegant as any I've encoutered.
        It's impossible not to like Benigni's warm portrayl of Guido,
the sort of clown who inspires laughter as much by accident as
deliberate effort; his mannerisms are so broad and cartoonish that
comparisons with Chaplin are justified.  Benigni, who not only
starred but directed and co-wrote the screenplay as well, has a
masterful sense of comedic timing.  The material flows effortlessly
through him, lending both spontaneity to the gags and power to the
drama.
        Benigni doesn't skimp on the humor, despite the subject
matter; even during the horrific scenes inside the camp, Guido is
full of life and optimism-- a veritable beacon of hope and sunshine
for his fellow prisoners and, most importantly, his son.  There are
those who have called the film "offensive" because of the way it
handles its Holocaust-related material.  They are mistaken: this movie
isn't *about* the Holocaust; it's about humanity, love, and the
desperate facade one man must invent to spare mental anguish for
his son.  The Holocaust is merely a backdrop.
        There are perhaps ten genuine laugh-out-loud moments in
"Life is Beautiful," sprinkled in among the tragedy; like the
characters in the film, Guido's antics make the despair bearable for
us, right up to the movie's final moments, which involve the triumph
of the human spirit over the unimaginable forces of adversity.  The
film soars, heartens, saddens, uplifts, rejoices... and, like life, is
beautiful indeed.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write to:
joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com
----
"Average Joe" Barlow  (jbarlow@earthling.net)  MiSTie #73097
Joe Barlow on Film: http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
"The one good thing about the [life-size sticker of
 Jar Jar Binks on the door of Taco Bell] is you can
 pretty convincingly throw the SOB a roundhouse punch.
 I found it satisfying."   --Renard A. Dellafave

Title
Review for Muppet Movie, The (1979)
        What do you get if you cross a bug-eyed, banjo-strummin' frog,
a wisecracking bear, a love-struck pig with delusions of grandeur,
Steve Martin (in disturbingly short pants), Orson Welles, a brilliant
script, astonishingly catchy music, and cinematography that
occasionally borders on magic?  Well, in this state you'd probably get
arrested... but that's okay, because you'd also get one of the most
charming and endearing films to claw its way out of the dreck of the
'70s.
        The continuing appeal of "The Muppet Movie" is difficult to
describe, but not hard to understand after you've seen it.  In a
nutshell: it's a fun film, skillfully crafted, featuring some of
cinema's loveliest melodies (both the musical score and its lovely
signature tune, "Rainbow Connection," were nominated for Oscars.
Neither won, but the soundtrack is still in print.)  But simply being
"fun" doesn't necessarily equate with "greatness," and it's not the
only reason for the film's continued popularity.  It touches a nerve
with viewers.  Its simple message ('Believe in yourself, and nothing
is beyond your reach') is one we all want to believe... and in the
hectic '90s, with weekly political scandals and perpetual conflict in
the Middle East, we could all use some quality time with the Muppets.
        Kermit the Frog (voiced by the late Jim Henson) is a simple
fellow.  He lives in a swamp, and passes the time by singing songs
on his trusty banjo, yet somehow he feels unfulfilled.  A passing
fisherman (Dom DeLuise), who moonlights as a Hollywood agent,
encourages the talented frog to consider a career in show business.
Kermit is still hesitant... until the agent mentions that Kermit's
talent could entertain millions of people.  Wanting nothing more than
to share his gifts with the world, Kermit sets off for Hollywood (by
bicycle, no less!  The sight is a visual marvel!) to seek his fortune.
Along the way, he meets a number of other friends, all of whom have
the same dream.  The most significant of these are the amiable Fozzie
Bear (voiced by Frank Oz), whose dream of being a stand-up comic is
not at all hindered by the fact that his act isn't the least bit
funny; the lovely Miss Piggy (also voiced by Oz), who falls hard for
the dapper Kermit; and the strange turkey-like Gonzo (voiced by Dave
Goelz) a plumber who dreams of being... well, a plumber.  But having
nothing better to do, he tags along for the ride.
        And what a ride it is!  "The Muppet Movie" is not just another
90-minute kiddie flick, like so many of today's so-called "family"
films.  No, this one is the real thing: a warm comedy, with a message
that actually says something significant to its audience; as such, it
can be enjoyed by parents and kids alike.  As with their spiritual
ancestors, Rocky and Bullwinkle, the Muppets' humor is sophisticated
enough to offer smiles and laughs to all ages.  Kids will laugh at
Gonzo's physical stunts, while Mom and Dad will smile at the clever
verbal jokes and visual gags that sail right over Junior's head (the
piano player who looks just like Elton John, the recurring "hare
krishna" gag, etc).
        In many ways, "The Muppet Movie" resembles the 1939 Judy
Garland classic, "The Wizard of Oz": a lowly hero is on a quest to
reach a far away place, and joins up with new friends along the way
who share the same goal.  Both films are full of bright colors, music,
and a message that one can never hear too often.  (Wizard's "You've
always had the power to go home" moral is perfectly in-tune with "The
Muppet Movie's" own sermon.)
        One of the reasons that it all works so well is the fact that
director Frawley and screenwriters Burns and Juhl treated the material
with respect.  The fact that our main characters are colorful,
fabric-covered puppets is incidental.  With only minor modifications,
the same script could've worked just as well with real people playing
all the parts.  That's the secret of the movie's success: it's not
just a good children's movie... it's a good MOVIE, period.  The pacing
is as tight as any "adult" feature: each scene takes place in a new
town, with a new adventure on the horizon for our heroes.  (Who knew
it was so difficult to get from Florida to California?)  Granted,
Kermit has more obstacles to face than the distance which separates
him from his goal: the evil Doc Hopper (a fun performance by Charles
Durning) and his assistant Max (Austin Pendleton) are pursuing Kermit
every step of the way, trying to force him into being the spokesfrog
for Hopper's chain of French Fried Frog Leg restaurants.  When Kermit
resists, a professional frog killer (Scott Walker) is brought in to
dispose of our little green friend.  But again, director Frawley has
used these characters as incentive to keep the pace flowing smoothly:
Kermit and his friends have to keep moving; otherwise, they'll be
captured.
        Cameos by nearly every celebrity you can think of are in this
movie, though children of the '90s are unlikely to recognize Bob Hope,
Edgar Bergen, Madeline Kahn and others.  But that's okay: adults will
get the joke, and the guest appearances never feel gratuitous or
intrusive.  My favorites: Richard Pryor's friendly balloon salesman,
and, at the opposite end of the spectrum, Steve Martin's wonderfully
rude, abusive waiter:
        I first saw this film in 1979, at age six.  Watching it now,
twenty years later, I'm astonished by how little of the fairy dust has
faded from that initial viewing experience.  The music is still
haunting ("Moving Right Along" will stay in your head for days), the
characters are still utterly charming, and time hasn't dulled the
sparkle of the dialogue one iota:
        Whether you're five or 50, everyone should see "The Muppet
Movie" at least once.  For 97 minutes, you'll be five years old again,
caught up in the magic of what movies can do.  Four stars, Mr. Henson.
Thank you very much.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Corruptor, The (1999)
        If Jackie Chan is the Beatles of modern action movies, Chow
Yun-Fat is the Rolling Stones: he doesn't want to hold your hand, he
wants
to kick your ass.  Already an action star in Hong Kong, Yun-Fat is
gradually
amassing a cult following in the States on the basis of recent films
like
"The Replacement Killers."  His fan base may soon swell, however: his
latest offering has the potential to make him a household name, just
as
"Rumble in the Bronx" did for Chan.
        James Foley's "The Corruptor" is mean, dark and ugly, but not
in a
bad way.  Drawing inspiration from the kinetic ballets of John Woo,
Foley
and his screenwriter, Robert Pucci, have created a story of intrigue
and
mystery in the streets of Chinatown, drawing as heavily from American
film
noir (there are shades of "Touch of Evil") as from the Hong Kong
gangster
genre.  Whereas most action films are content to throw car chases and
shootouts on the screen ad nasuem, Foley uses these items as building
blocks for an intricate plot involving betrayal, cover-ups, and
morality.
        Lt. Nick Chen (Yun-Fat) is in charge of an all-Asian precinct
in New
York's Chinatown region.  Chronically understaffed, the group has its
hands
so full with minor crimes that they never have time to investigate the
big
ones.  Capitulating to Chen's constant demands for more people, Chen
is
eventually given an additional officer: Daniel Wallace (Mark
Wahlberg), who,
in addition to being caucasian (and therefore unable to work
undercover), is
also inexperienced.  "He's worse than white: he's green!" explodes
Chen.
        Nonetheless, the detective agrees to give Wallace a chance,
and
although the two men dislike each other initially, they (surprise,
surprise)
eventually develop a mutual admiration which blossoms into friendship.
This
is one of the least satisfying aspects of "The Corruptor": its
reliance on the
cliched 'buddy cop' relationship, which seems to occur in every film
of this
kind.  It's been used as recently as last year's "Rush Hour," and is
handled
so tritely in "The Corruptor" that even the film itself seems bored
with it.
        Fortunately, the rest of the story is more daring.  Chen and
Wallace
are soon on the trail of a Chinatown crime lord, and the story becomes
as
much a mystery as an action movie.  Along the way they receive advice
and
information from the mysterious Henry Lee (Ric Young, who played Mao
Tse
Tung in 1995's "Nixon"), a businessman who seens to have his finger in
every pie in town, and who may or may not have the police force on his
payroll.  But loyalties change on the proverbial dime here, and the
villain's
true identity is kept safely hidden from the audience until the final
reel.
Be warned, however: the plot moves fast, and the movie expects you to
keep up.  Leave to go to the bathroom and you'll probably find
yourself
lost when you get back.
        The movie's title, "The Corruptor," is never explained: the
audience
is left to draw its own conclusion.  For me, Chinatown itself was the
corruptor: a society which hides its most devilish secrets in plain
sight, if
one knows merely knows where to look.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to: joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for 54 (1998)
STARRING:   Mike Myers, Neve Campbell, Ryan Phillippe, Salma Hayek
DIRECTOR:   Mark Christopher
WRITER:     Mark Christopher
RATED/YEAR: R/1998
        It's always disappointing to realise, halfway through a movie,
that you have no idea what it's about.  On the surface, "54" seems to be
straightforward enough: it tells the story of a legendary '70s Manhattan
nightclub, a place so trendy that the doorman refused admission to 9 out
of every 10 people who tried to get inside.  For those lucky enough to
gain entrance, drugs and sex were free for the asking.  Simply being seen
at the club could get you invited into an elite social circle, which
included not only royalty, but the biggest celebrities of the day.
        Shane (Ryan Phillippe) is a teenager with a crush on soap-opera
star Julie Black (Neve Campbell).  When a newspaper article reports that
Julie has been spotted at the nightclub several times, the handsome but
dim-witted Shane pays a visit.  Gaining admission via his rugged good
looks, he manages to land a job as a busboy, eventually working his way
up to bartender.
        The club's owner, Steve Rubell ("Wayne's World" creator Mike
Myers, in a highly-touted dramatic role), is a drug-addict who runs
the nightclub his way, with little regard for the consequences of his
actions.  (In a nationally-televised interview, for example, Rubell
cheerfully admits that he lies to the IRS about how much money the club
makes.)  His is a world of pills, music, and regrets, none of which are
easily remembered the next day.
        This had the potential to be an interesting story, but the
execution is, alas, very clumsy.  The script is unfocused; it doesn't
really succeed at conveying either the excitement of the era, or any
indication why the club was so highly regarded.  It's "The Last Days of
Disco" meets "Boogie Nights," with all the high-points somehow lost
along the way.
        But whatever flaws the film may have, they are not the fault of
Myers; indeed, so convincing is his performance that all thoughts of Wayne
Campbell and Austin Powers were forever purged from my mind.  Myers knows
that Rubell is not a hero; he's just a junkie trying to get by the best
way he knows how, and he plays the role accordingly.  I have new respect
for his abilities as an actor.
        In fact, Myers is so good that the film suffers when he's not on
the screen.  Although the character of Rubell is intriguing, he's reduced
to a relatively small part.  Considering that nearly all the events which
happen in the movie (including an IRS audit of the club and the death of
a patron) would significantly affect his character, it's surprising that
he's given so little screen time in comparison to the exceedingly bland
Shane.  Ryan Phillippe seems to be sleep-walking through his role,
mumbling his lines and showing little interest in any of the remarkable
things that happen to him.  Neve Campbell turns in her usual competent
performance, but the script never allows her to become a "real" person.
She remains just another face passing briefly through Shane's life.  This
is one of the most disappointing facets of the movie: getting to know the
"real" person behind the Famous Actress persona that Julie wears should
be fascinating; instead, it comes off as trite.
        The movie succeeds, however, at capturing the claustrophobic feel
of a crowded nightclub.  Nearly every scene is "lit" only by neon signs
or disco strobe lights.  The grainy, underexposed look which results from
this method of shooting is just right.  The music is also well-chosen,
capturing the feel of the late '70s.  Rubell's spoken introductions to
many of the songs are also quite amusing.  An "A+" for atmosphere, but
alas, that alone doesn't make a great film.
        "54" isn't horrible, but it steps all over itself while attempting
to convey a story.  Rather than needing MORE plot, the film needs to drop
its superfluous elements and instead focus on its most interesting
storyline: Steve Rubell's struggle to keep the club open in the face of
adversity.  The film rolls along nicely during Mike Myers' scenes, but
overall it plays out like the disco music featured on its soundtrack:
occasionally pleasant, but ultimately going nowhere.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.

Title
Review for There's Something About Mary (1998)
STARRING:   Cameron Diaz, Matt Dillon, Ben Stiller, Lee Evans,
            W. Earl Brown
DIRECTORS:  Bobby and Peter Farrelly
WRITERS:    Ed Decter, John J. Strauss, and the Farrelly Brothers
RATED/YEAR: R/1998
        Everybody loves Mary (Cameron Diaz), and it's easy to understand
why: not only is she beautiful, intelligent, funny, and financially secure,
she has the proverbial heart of gold as well.  She places other people's
needs well above her own, to the extent of spending all her free time doing
volunteer work with the mentally retarded, a group that includes her
beloved brother Warren (W. Earl Brown).  Men can't resist Mary, and that's
her biggest problem: she's constantly (and unintentionally) attracting
losers when she wants a soulmate.
        Ted Stroehmann (Ben Stiller), Mary's high-school sweetheart, has
never been able to forget her.  After learning that she moved to Miami
after graduation, he hires a private investigator named Pat Healy (Matt
Dillon) to track her down.  If it turns out that she's still single, perhaps
he'll be able to win her back.  Unfortunately, Healy also falls in love with
Mary after he locates and meets her.  The two men suddenly find themselves,
along with numerous other guys, in a fierce battle to win her heart... and
they will stop at nothing, and I mean *nothing*, to end up with Mary in
their arms.
        That's the intriguing premise of "There's Something About Mary,"
the surprisingly funny new film from the Farrelly Brothers, the duo who
brought you "Dumb and Dumber" and "Kingpin."  They've come a long way since
then.  "Mary" is far more mature (on the whole) than either of its
predecessors, which too often relied on potty humor involving wee-wees,
bathroom noises, and uncovered bottoms.  Instead, "Mary" gives us
characters that are actually interesting, rather than merely serving as
transitions from one sight gag to the next.
        That's not to say that "Mary" is lacking in the humor department,
however.  There are lots of laughs to be found, and the scenes featuring
the cute little dog belonging to Mary's next-door neighbor Magda (Lin
Shaye) are almost painfully funny.  Unlike "Dumb and Dumber," "There's
Something About Mary" wisely allows the jokes to serve a story that's
clever and interesting in its own right.  The result is a film that leaves
you laughing even as you wonder what's going to happen next.
        Matt Dillon's performance as Pat Healy, the private investigator,
is tremendously entertaining.  After eavesdropping on a conversation between
Mary and her girlfriends, he discovers that she wants to meet a guy who
loves to travel to "exotic places like Nepal."  Her mystery man must also
be creative (like an architect, for instance), and he must love sports.
This gives Dillon's character the opportunity to introduce himself as a
freelance architect and football nut, who owns a condo in Katmandu.  In
another attempt to impress her, he proudly states that he "loves working
with retards."  Mary is of course aghast at his crassness, but he doesn't
catch on.  He then explains how he keeps his "little retard friend Mongo"
locked up in a cage, but allows him to run around the yard on one of those
"clothesline-leash things."  The scene is brilliantly played by both Diaz
and Dillon: just witness the way Mary is torn between repulsion and
adoration for Healy, and the way he simply doesn't get why his crass
remarks offend her.
        Stiller, as the high-school sweetheart, is fun as the straight
man.  He never tries to be anything he's not: all he wants is another chance
with the girl of his dreams.  Perhaps this is why he's so appealing to us.
Other less important characters drift in and out of the film, including
Mary's British friend Tucker (Lee Evans), who plays a bigger role in her
life than we might originally expect.
        "There's Something About Mary" contains moments of true comic
genius, but alas, it sometimes shows chinks in its armor.  The directors
seem unsure whether its target audience, the "Dumb and Dumber" fans, will
be able to handle a story of this caliber, so they revert to the "potty
humor" standby a little too often.  The opening scene, for example, in
which a high-school-age Ben Stiller gets ready to take Mary to the prom,
features a much-too-long segment in which our hero gets his male anatomy
caught in his zipper.  (Sarcasm: Boy, *that's* funny.)  Another scene,
which coincedentally involves an *adult* Ben Stiller bathroom penis
adventure, is even more tasteless.  The packed audience howled with
laughter at both of these scenes; I scowled and rolled my eyes.  (Sarcasm:
Wow, that's even *funnier*.)  And I guess I'm the only person in the world
who does not find anything amusing about a man getting his crotch bitten
by a dog.  (That's three Ben Stiller penis jokes in the same movie, folks.
I think the directors have some latent issues they need to work through.)
        The mostly clever screenplay only falters once more: early in the
film, we learn that Mary's brother Warren tends to go ballistic when
someone he doesn't trust touches his ears.  After seeing this happen twice,
I predicted that by the end of the film, Warren would allow one of Mary's
suitors to touch his ears, and Mary would use this as a factor in deciding
which one she wanted to date.  I was not wrong.  (And please don't accuse
me of giving away a plot point; if you CAN'T see this coming, you should
have your film-watching license revoked.)
        Overall, though, "There's Something About Mary" is a treat.
Cleverly written, with characters who are an absolute joy to watch, this
is one that should be seen by anyone who's ever pined over "the one who
got away."  With this role, Cameron Diaz finds herself one step closer to
super-stardom.
        Oh, be sure to stay for the end credits, which feature a Jackie
Chan-style montage of outtakes and cut scenes.  Seeing the cast and crew
lip-synching along to the '60s pop classic "Build Me Up, Buttercup" is 
almost worth the price of admission by itself.
This review was written: August 3, 1998
Copyright (c) 1998 by Joe Barlow.  This review may be freely distributed as
long as ABSOLUTELY NO CHANGES are made and this disclaimer remains attached.
It may not be reproduced for profit without the written consent of the
author.  If you have comments or questions, please send them to: jbarlow
at earthling dot net (substituting the appropriate symbols, to discourage
spam).
-----
  "Average Joe" Barlow * MiSTie #73097 * Writer/musician/aspiring filmmaker
       jbarlow@YOURearthling.PANTSnet http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow
              {Remove YOUR PANTS to e-mail me.}        
    "When I bite into a York Peppermint Patty, I imagine I'm...
     spitting it into the trash!" - Joel/Woemcats

Title
Review for 8MM (1999)
        Joel Schumacher's "8mm" is film noir of a grand tradition, a
chilling descent into the seedy underworld of the pornographic
industry.
Filmed almost entirely in shadow, the movie allows us a merciless
glimpse into a culture comprised of darkness, money, violence, and the
unquenchable thirst for sex which drives mankind.  There's
authenticity
to the presentation, and "8mm" makes us squirm uncomfortably in our
seats, simultaneously appalled and intrigued.
        Tom Welles (Nicolas Cage) is a private investigator who
operates discretely, a trait which allows him to work with many
high-profile clients.  ("I've been privilaged to provide services for
people I admire," he allows.)  When the widow of a much loved bank
president asks him to investigate a strange item found in her late
husband's vault, Welles agrees... not knowing that the case will come
to consume his every thought.
        The item in question is a short reel of Super 8 film, which
appears at first glance to be nothing more than a typical home movie.
But upon screening the footage, Welles is aghast at what he sees: a
teenage girl being raped and brutally murdered-- a so-called "snuff
film."  The confused widow wants to know what this hideous item
is doing in her husband's possession, as she knew him as a kind,
sweet man.  Welles, horrified, vows to uncover the origin of the film.
        Welles gets assistance in his investigation from a friendly
porn
dealer named Max (Joaquin Phoenix), who hides Truman Captoe novels
behind phony porn dustjackets, so he can read "real" books at work
without raising his customers' eyebrows.  This tells us a good deal
about Max, a bright young man who hates the way he makes his living,
but doesn't know any other way to survive.  The interplay between
Welles and his sidekick punctuates the landscape of "8mm" with
surprising warmth and humor-- quite a feat considering the subject
matter we're dealing with.
        The photography of "8mm" is flat, drab, and almost completely
devoid of color; it seems to be an intentional attempt to recreate the
underlit feel so common in Super 8 movies, as well as the shadowy
intrigue of past film noirs.  The musical score seems to stalk the
audience, and is as drenched in shadow and mystery as the photo-
graphy itself.  It adds a great deal of atmosphere to a movie already
overflowing with it.
        "8mm" is clever in the way it handles its pornographic
elements,
opting to tease us with the images from the snuff film rather than
shoving them in our faces.  It wisely leaves most of the action and
violence off-screen.  This is the correct approach to take-- as Max
himself points out, this type of imagery gets in one's head.  ("Once
you
see some of this stuff, you can't unsee it.")
        1997's "Batman and Robin," also helmed by Schumacher, proved
that the director knew how to construct pretty pictures of a city in
turmoil, even if the story repeatedly fell flat on its face.  (Earlier
this year, British comic book fans named it the worst movie ever
made about a comic book character.)  But "8mm" proves what I have
long since suspected: "Batman and Robin's" problems stemmed not
from Schumacher's inability to make a compelling film, but from
Akiva Goldsman's insultingly bad script.  Schumacher has a more
talented scribe this time around: Andrew Kevin Walker, the author
of "Seven," one of the finest thrillers of the past decade.  "8mm"
is an impressive rebound for Schumacher, and a fine continuation of
a strong track record for Walker.
        That doesn't mean they've achieved perfection, however.  The
story runs a tad too long, a small flaw which could have been fixed
with a little more attention to editing and pacing.  And Catherine
Keener is basically wasted in her role as Welles's wife, Amy; she
does little but whine, seemingly unconcerned with the case her
husband is working on.  I bristled nearly every time she came on
the screen.
        Much more interesting is the character of Janet
Matthews, the mother of the girl in the movie, who becomes
Welles's unwitting ally in the quest for the snuff film's origin.
In a lesser film, a romantic interest would develop between
these two characters, who have numerous scenes alone together.
"8mm" is smarter than that, however, and keeps their relation-
ship on a professional level, although Welles clearly grows fond
of her.  He is able to draw strength from Janet's love for her
daughter in one chilling climactic scene, the exact details of
which I won't spoil.
        This is a work of remarkable vision.  "8mm," like
"Seven" and "Silence of the Lambs," is eerie, dark, and
disturbing.  If you dislike films of this genre, you probably
won't have a great time.  But for those who enjoy a good
thriller, I recommend this particular walk on the wild side.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to: joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for My Favorite Martian (1999)
        Whoever thought to cast Christopher Lloyd as the alien in
Disney's new remake of "My Favorite Martian" is to be commended, as
he tends to look like he's just visiting this planet to begin with.
Lloyd's unusual face and voice make him perfect for the role of
"Uncle Martin," a friendly extraterrestrial who finds himself
stranded on Earth after a spaceship crash.
        Donald Petrie's remake of the '60s television series is
agreeable enough, I suppose: it's bright, zany, and smart enough to
reinvent the characters for the 1990s, rather than locking them into
a 1960s mentality (as in the recent "Brady Bunch" films).  There's
a lot of action and humor which borders on the surreal (watch as Jeff
Daniels and Daryl Hannah try Martian gum for the first time), but
unfortunately that doesn't stop the movie from following a routine
storyline which culminates in an unnecessary (and distracting)
romance.
        Tim O'Hara (Jeff Daniels) is an unsuccessful TV producer
who works for a local news program.  Although Tim rarely gets to
cover the big stories, he finds one when he observes a crashing
spaceship.  Tim eventually befriends the alien inside, an
excitable but friendly creature he christens Uncle Martin.
        Martin is quite a character.  Able to control gravity and
change his shape, the curious alien enjoys learning about Earth
culture from his new friend.  One of his favorite Earth delicacies
is ice cream, which for Martin has an effect similar to alcohol.
(You'd think the first ice cream hangover would teach him a
lesson, but no.)  Martin and Tim also debate whether Earth or
Martian culture is superior:
        You know you're watching a Disney film when an article
of clothing becomes one of the most memorable characters.  Martin's
spacesuit, Zoot, is animate, loves to talk, and has a personality
more concretely defined than any of the human characters.  This is
a good idea in theory, but Zoot is so unique that everyone else
seems much less interesting by comparison, including Martin
himself.
        Daryl Hannah, for example, is basically wasted in the role
of Lizzie, Tim's friend and co-worker.  She's here only to be the
requisite love interest, and to help Tim and Martin escape from
one particularly nasty situation they later find themselves in (a
trick she accomplishes with the help of the aforementioned
Martian gum).  Although she gets a lot of screen time, Lizzie is
unfortunately never allowed to be anything more than a plot point.
(Why is it that no one is ever in a happy relationship at the
*beginning* of a movie?)
        Ray Walston, who played the original Uncle Martin in the
television series, gets an extended cameo here as a SETI official
hot on the trail of the alien.  The role is thoroughly unnecessary,
and appears to have been inserted for no other reason than to give
Walston a reason to appear in the film.  He plays up to the camera
big time: as we know, Martians get "drunk" on ice cream.  Witness
how Walston turns right to the camera at one point and takes a big
bite of vanilla.  I guess it's supposed to be ironic that the former
Martian is now eating ice cream, but it comes across as nothing more
than camera-hogging.  Yeah, hi Ray.  We see you.
        Perhaps most disappointing is the film's willingness to
follow its characters down irrelevant tangents, even when
urgency is required.  Martin appears frantic when he discovers
that an explosion will result if he doesn't take off within 12
hours, but nonetheless, he and Tim go about their business in a
leisurely manner.  And I was most surprised to discover that an
alternator from an American car will interface with a Martian
spacecraft engine with no rewiring whatsoever.  Neato.
        I know, I know, I'm missing the point.  As a kids' movie,
there's nothing wrong with "My Favorite Martian"; parts of it are
fun, and Lloyd in particular goes above and beyond the call of
duty to keep the audience laughing.  But like most science-fiction
films, the movie relies more on effects than story.  Kids will
probably enjoy it, and so will adults (if they have a love for
wacky physical comedy), but I was hoping for a little less formula
and a little more science.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to: joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com

Title
Review for Your Friends & Neighbors (1998)
        To call "Your Friends and Neighbors" a dark film is to call
The Beatles a moderately successful band.  This feature, the second from
writer/director Neil LaBute, continues his tradition of placing
despicable characters in unpleasant situations, a motif he introduced
with last year's "In the Company of Men."
        The story revolves around the lives of three couples (identified
in the film's end credits as Jerry, Cheri, Terri, Cary, Barry and Mary,
though their names are never spoken in the film).  All six of our
characters are unhappy with their love life, and several of them decide
to make a change... though none of them realize the others are also
miserable.  They don't know it at the time, but their actions will
actually leave them more unfulfilled than they were before.
        The casting is interesting.  Jason Patric, the villain from
"Speed 2," is the film's most loathesome character: a doctor who practices
"sex talk" when he's alone so he can sound sincere in bed.  He berates his
lover for daring to have her period, fondly recalls raping a high-school
classmate, and absently plays "catch" with a plastic fetus while talking
on the phone, eventually drop-kicking it down the hospital hallway.  (I
was reminded of Ike from "South Park": "Don't kick the baby!")
        Ben Stiller is a college professor whose relationship is on the
rocks because he likes to talk during sex, a quirk that his girlfriend
hates.  Her coldness doesn't bother him, though, since he's got the hots
for Amy Brenneman, a beautiful writer who's working on an article about
the art of lovemaking.  She's obviously attracted to Ben as well, and all
would be well if she didn't happen to be the wife of his best friend.
        Aaron Eckhart, the most twisted person from "In the Company of
Men," is one of this film's most likeable characters.  He's the only
guy who doesn't really do anything wrong: he loves his wife and would
never dream of being unfaithful, although he is frustrated with her
conservative approach to sex.  He confesses to his friends that although
he adores her, she is unable to provide him with the kind of pleasure he
can achieve with his own hand.
        Stiller's girlfriend, played by Catherine Keener, meets Nastassja
Kinski, an assistant artist employed at a local gallery.  Their friendship
quickly grows complicated, progressing from strangers to buddies to
lesbianism over the course of three scenes.  Kinski is the closest thing
to a voice of reason contained in the film: all five of the other
characters wander into the art gallery at some point and engage in
frightfully similar (and hilarious) conversations with her.  Along with
Eckhart, Kinski is the only truly likeable character.  Sweet and loyal,
she's determined to do everything she can to make her new lesbian lover
happy... to the point of smothering her with kindness.
        That's our cast and storyline, and in case you missed it, I'll
reiterate: this is a BLEAK film.  It's a train-wreck: the sight is
horrible and appaling, but you can't turn away.  LaBute has crafted a
movie so shocking that it can't really qualify as entertainment; however,
the message is an important one.  If you've ever thought about cheating on
the one you love, I promise, this film will change your mind.
        LaBute wants the audience to squirm, and he achieves his goal by
grabbing our noses and pulling us into his world.  We have no distance
from any of the characters; the film is shot almost entirely with close-
ups, a little touch that made me fidget uncomfortably in my seat.  This,
coupled with the fact that none of the characters' names are given in the
course of the story, provides an intimate yet anonymous portrait of six
lives on the fast track to disaster.
        I watched the "lesbian" portions of the film with some amusement.
Since the release of "Chasing Amy," it seems that all independent movies
are required to include a character who suddenly realizes that he or she
is either gay or bisexual midway through the show.  "Your Friends and
Neighbors" does not disappoint in that regard.  I'd criticize this trend
a little more if my own indie screenplay, "Four Sides of the Triangle,"
didn't have the exact same problem.  Oops.
        I've awarded this film three and one-half stars out of a possible
five, which is surely the highest rating I've ever given to a movie that
I did not particularly enjoy.  But this is not a mistake: I don't think
LaBute intends for us to LIKE the film.  He wants to make us miserable,
and thereby warn us of the effects that cheating and dishonesty can have
on a relationship.  He accomplishes his goal: no one who sees this movie
will forget the lesson.  I truly believe that every person in the world
should watch "Your Friends and Neighbors" at least once.  It would do much
to solve society's marital problems.
        (Oh, one interesting thing I noticed.  In "There's Something About
Mary," Ben Stiller plays a really nice guy obsessed with a woman named
Mary.  In "Your Friends and Neighbors," Ben Stiller plays a really
creepy guy obsessed with a woman named Mary.  I've heard of typecasting
an actor, but this is ridiculous.)

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.

Title
Review for Mod Squad, The (1999)
        Absolutely nothing happens in "The Mod Squad," MGM's new
misguided big-screen remake of the "classic" (in the same way
that the rusted Chevy stacked up on cinder blocks and leaking
oil in your neighbor's front yard is a classic) television show.
        Three juvenile delinquints are offered a choice between going
to prison or assisting the police department in an undercover
investigation.  Although they lack experience, training, or
discernible personalities, they agree to the terms of the deal.
The "kids" in question are Julie Barnes (Claire Danes), Pete
Cochran (Giovanni Ribisi) and Linc Hayes (Omar Epps),
who are deemed a valuable resource by their sponsor, Adam Greer
(Dennis Farina).  "They can get into places we can't," he
solemnly explains to anyone who'll listen.  The outcasts sign
aboard as "unofficial officers," which means they're forbidden
to carry badges, firearms, or the audience's interest.
        When Greer is found dead shortly thereafter, his "mod
squad" are identified as the prime suspects.  Knowing they've
been set up, the trio vows to solve the murder and clear their
name.  Julie apparently thinks the best way to assist in the
investigation is to sit in the bathroom floor and drink, which
leaves Pete free to wander around like a brain-damaged yak in
a china store.  It's up to Linc to save the day, and he does not
disappoint: the way he dramatically sneers at one of the villains
is the closest thing to an action sequence contained here.
        Excuse me, I mispoke: there are no "villains" in "The
Mod Squad."  To be a villain, one must have a discernable goal,
something towards which the character (and movie) is building.
"The Mod Squad" just has "bad guys," with the most evil character
still being at least a thesis away from true villainhood.  The
idenity of film's chief "bad guy" is so astonishingly obvious
that I was surprised the movie even attempted to make it into
a mystery.  I mean, duh.
        Giovanni Ribisi is rapidly proving himself to be one
of the most annoying actors working in movies today: I submit
this movie, "The Other Sister," and "First Love, Last Rites"
as evidence.  He's supposed to be comic relief here, but his
performance is like being cornered at a party by an obnoxious
drunk.  Claire Danes, who is often excellent, is barely
going through the motions, while Omar Epps, bless his heart, is
all the more pityable because he's actually trying to save the
movie.  It's so cute!

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to: joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for First Love, Last Rites (1997)
        One of the reasons I love independent cinema is the fact
that it often breaks the rules of Hollywood, which state that a
film must include an all-star cast, car crashes, lots of special
effects, and stunningly beautiful characters in order to make
money.  With budgets approaching pocket change, many indie
directors are breaking new ground in visual style by sidestepping
these laws.  The downside?  Some filmmakers are a bit too eager to
disregard rules which *shouldn't* be ignored.  "First Love, Last
Rites," for instance, does away with the notion that a movie should
contain a coherent narrative.  It cheerfully tosses aside the thought
that we should care about our characters.  It laughs in the face of
the idea that a movie should hold the audience's attention.  In
short, "First Love, Last Rites" is a film that goes nowhere, and is
in absolutely no hurry to arrive.
        The story, such as it is, revolves around Joey (Giovanni
Ribisi) and Sissel (Natasha Wagner), a young couple living together
in a run-down shack in the swamplands of Louisiana.  What do they see
in each other?  I have no idea.  Apart from the fact that neither of
them are the least bit personable and always appear to be half-
asleep, they seem to have absolutely nothing in common.  Oh, I take
that back: they both love sex.  Approximately a third of the film's
scenes feature the two of them boinking like rabbits.
        Sissel's creepy father soon befriends Joey, and they talk at
great length about nothing very interesting.  Eventually, the two of
them decide to start an eel-trapping business.  A large portion of
the film revolves around these plans, which are then completely
disregarded for no discernable reason.  Sissel's dad also attempts
to reconcile with his estranged wife by racing his car up and down
her driveway.  No, I'm not making this up.
        Towards the end of the film, Sissel actually begins to
display some emotions towards Joey, all of which are negative.  She
becomes moody and begins boiling her collection of 45RPM records.
Why?  Again, I couldn't tell you.  She berates Joey, although he
doesn't do anything except try to give her emotional support and
reassurance of his love.  (Gee, what a bastard.)  My favorite
"stupid" moment: while they're having sex, Sissel begs Joey not to
pull out of her.  A couple of scenes later, she accuses him of
trying to get her pregnant.  "You're trying to put a baby inside
me!" she shrieks.  Yes, this is definitely the woman *I'd* want to
move in with.  Wouldn't you?
        I'd like to describe the film's ending, but it doesn't really
have one.  Sure, there's a moment when celluloid is no longer running
through the projector, but the final scene is purely ambiguous.  Pick
any moment from the movie, and it would be just as sensible a place
to end as the one chosen by the director.  A great film can have an
ambiguous ending: both "The Full Monty" and "Chasing Amy" leave things
up in the air at their conclusion; as I left the theater after each,
I found myself wondering what the characters would do next.  Although
"First Love, Last Rites" leaves a lot of unanswered questions when
the credits begin to roll, I have not devoted one iota of thought to
how they could be answered.  I just don't care, unless it involves
Joey and Sissel both getting a swift kick in the rear.
        "First Love, Last Rites" is a tedious viewing experience,
full of bizarre symbolism (the rat in the wall, for example),
paper-thin characters, and scenes that make no sense whatsoever.
I've seen home movies that had a better storyline.  Though the
images of the Louisiana Bayou are occasionally lovely, most of the
visuals depict the interior of the squalid, rodent-infested house
inhabited by our two main characters.  Only the music shines,
capturing the flavor of the photography in every scene.  Skip the
film and check out the soundtrack instead.  I wish I had.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.  Or,
you can subscribe directly from my web page.  Thanks.

Title
Review for It's a Wonderful Life (1946)
With our first glimpse of Bedford Falls, the idyllic, snow-kissed
setting of Frank Capra's It's a Wonderful Life, we know something is
amiss. It's Christmas Eve, but there's no joy in the air--only a sense
of tension and foreboding. There are voices in the night; from every
home we hear the prayers of townsfolk, requesting salvation for one of
their own--George Bailey, the beloved secretary of the town's Savings
and Loan office. His name is chanted like a mantra, hovering on the
lips of every resident.  "Please, Lord," they plead, "help George
Bailey." 
Bailey (James Stewart) is a man whose life hasn't turned out the way
he envisioned it. He's no longer the wide-eyed boy who dreamed of
travel, exploration, and--most importantly--making a difference in the
world; now in his late twenties, he's deeply entrenched in a job he
despises. George is kind to everyone, a trait responsible for his
current predicament. He simply can't say no. To anyone. For any
reason. He loans money to friends when he can barely afford to buy
clothes for his children. He finds himself deaf in one ear after
risking his life to save his brother from drowning. He abandons his
dream of going to college when his father's business needs him.
Everyone, it seems, owes at least a portion of their well-being to
George's selflessness.
To see the complete review, please visit:
http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/cc101.htm

Title
Review for Armageddon (1998)
STARRING:   Bruce Willis, Liv Tyler, Ben Affleck, Billy Bob Thornton,
            Steve Buscemi, Michael Duncan
DIRECTOR:   Michael Bay
WRITERS:    Tony Gilroy and Shane Salerno
RATED/YEAR: PG-13/1998
        "Armageddon" is the latest in a recent flood of films about big
rocks striking the Earth, a subject Hollywood can't seem to get enough of.
Roger Corman, known primarily for his many low-budget horror films of the
'50s, began the trend with last year's TV mini-series, "Asteroid."  This
summer has already seen the release of "Deep Impact," and while "Armageddon"
is a better film than either of its predecessers, it may nonetheless be
too little too late to satisfy movie-goers.
        The story is straightforward enough.  Several small meteorites
have struck New York City, causing extensive damage to life and property.
NASA discovers that these small rocks are but a prelude: an asteroid the
size of Texas is on a collision course with Earth.  The rock's size means
that it's a "planet killer," with the potential to destroy all life on
Earth, right down to the bacteria.
        Realising that no amount of weapons fired from the Earth's surface
will stop the asteroid, NASA chairman Dan Truman (an excellent Billy Bob
Thornton) sends a team to intercept it.  Their mission: drill 8OO feet into
the surface of the rock, plant a nuclear bomb inside, then detonate it once
they are safely away.  The resulting explosion should split the asteroid in
two, causing it to miss the Earth.
        Bruce Willis (Die Hard) plays oil-driller Harry Stamper, recruited
to head the mission because of his expertise drilling into unusual types of
rock.  Also along for the ride are A.J. (Ben Affleck), Rockhound (Steve
Buscemi), Bear (Michael Duncan) and several other professional drillers.
Although the team doesn't particularly like each other, they are forced to
work together against a common obstacle.  Since this is a Hollywood film,
the act naturally brings them closer together.
        This should be a compelling story in its own right, but director
Michael Bay and screenwriters Gilroy and Salerno don't seem sure of their
ability to make it interesting; as such, they throw tons of ridiculous
subplots into the mix.  This is the sort of film where if there's even the
slightest chance for something to go wrong, it will.  So naturally the
drill gets stuck, the timer on the nuclear bomb doesn't work, levers break
off in our heroes' hands at critical times for no particular reason... well,
you get the idea.  This film turns "suspension of disbelief" into an art
form.  After a while, these misfortunes cease to be suspenseful and become
laughable.
        Like "Deep Impact," "Armageddon" has the obligatory disfunctional
family.  Tea Leoni does not get along with her father in "Deep Impact";
Bruce Willis does not get along with his daughter in "Armageddon."  Leoni
hates her father's new girlfriend in "Impact"; Willis hates his daughter's
boyfriend (played by Affleck's character) in "Armageddon."  Leoni and
father reconcile in "Impact"; Willis and daughter reconcile in "Armageddon."
How sweet.  It might be remotely interesting if I hadn't just seen it.
        "Armageddon" won't go down as a sci-fi classic, but it's probably
worth a peek.  What sets it apart from the other rock flicks is not its
intelligence (which is only average), nor its special effects (which are
fine, though not extraordinary).  The acting is the key here, and the cast
does not disappoint.  Tyler and Affleck are a great screen couple, the
epitome of young lovers who are uncertain of the future and what it may
bring.  Thornton is also excellent as the NASA official helping out the
team from the ground.
        Surprisingly, humor is a big part of the film's charm; witness Steve
Buscemi (Reservoir Dogs, The Wedding Singer), who's played primarily for
laughs here and comes through in spades.  His observations about the
space shuttle's construction are particularly entertaining.  Other moments
to look for: an amusing cameo by Godzilla in the film's opening scene, a
Russian cosmonaut afflicted with a serious case of space madness, and the
wonderful scenes in which the crew members undergo NASA psychological
testing.
        Although Aerosmith is not credited with the film's musical score,
they do perform the lion's share of the tunes.  No doubt this is because
Liv Tyler (daughter of Stephen, Aerosmith's lead singer) stars.  If you
like Aerosmith, you're in for a treat.  If you don't... well, sorry.
        I hope this film does well at the box office.  Not because it's
a great artistic achievment, mind you; I simply want director Michael
Bay to make enough money to buy a tripod.  I've never seen a movie so
afraid of static shots.  Some scenes vibrate as though the cameraman was
bouncing around the set on a pogo stick; others make me wonder if the
photographer mistook the camera for an etch-a-sketch and was trying to
erase the picture he'd drawn.  The visual style of the film is often quite
effective, though, particularly in the outer space sequences.  My
recommendation?  Bring along some Dramemine, check your brain at the door,
and just enjoy the ride.
This review was originally written: July 5, 1998
Copyright (c) 1998 by Joe Barlow.  This review may be freely distributed as
long as ABSOLUTELY NO CHANGES are made and this disclaimer remains attached.
It may not reproduced for profit without the written consent of the author.
If you have comments or questions, please send them to: jbarlow at earthling
dot net (substituting the appropriate symbols, to discourage spam).

Title
Review for Simple Plan, A (1998)
        Money has a bad reputation these days, and rightfully
so.  In addition to being "the root of all evil," it has the
power to divide loyalties, skew perception, and terminate
previously healthy relationships.  Its lure can cause the most
gentle of people to rationalize (and justify) criminal behavior.
Even those who would never contemplate robbery or theft find
themselves singing a different tune when confronted with
millions of dollars, a moment in which loyalties can change
on the proverbial dime.  But is wealth worth the loss of
one's innocence?
        Hank Mitchell (Bill Paxton) is an honest, intelligent man
content with his hand in life.  His lovely wife Sarah (Bridget
Fonda) is expecting a child, and although money is tight, they
manage to get by.  Hank's dim-witted but friendly brother Jacob
(Billy Bob Thornton) stops by periodically, sometimes bringing
his drinking buddy Lou (Brent Briscoe) with him.  Although
Lou and Hank despise 

Title
Review for Stuart Little (1999)

What astonishes me about Stuart Little is not its
aggressive cuteness (of which there is no shortage) but its
abundance of wit.  Works geared towards children are often
insultingly banal, both to the parents who are forced to
endure them and to the kids themselves.  (I remember
reading several "young adult" books while in elementary
school and wondering why the author was "talking" to me
like I was an idiot.)  I'm not sure who to credit for
the story's wit--the screenwriters?  The director?  The
actors, who convey the dialogue with such natural
rhythm that it sounds almost musical at times?  No matter;
I'm sure the film's charm is a sum of all these parts,
a feat made even more impressive by the fact that Stuart
himself was inserted into the footage weeks after the actors
had finished shooting their scenes and gone home.

Title
Review for Vita  bella, La (1997)
STARRING:  Roberto Benigni, Nicoletta Braschi, Giorgio
                Cantarini, Horst Buchholz, Sergio Bustric
DIRECTOR:  Roberto Benigni
WRITERS:   Roberto Benigni and Vincenzo Cerami
RATED:     PG-13
RELEASED:  1997 (1988 in the USA, subtitled)
        Roberto Benigni's "Life is Beautiful" is the sort of film
which exemplifies the power of cinema: it's art without pretension,
hope without fear, dreams without restrictions.  Although it has been
criticized as a sanitization of the Holocaust, the movie pulls no
emotional punches; by sharing the hardships and joy of the characters,
we are reminded just how precious and remarkable the human spirit is.
        It's 1939 Italy, and Guido Orefice (Benigni) is a pleasant,
amiable waiter who works in a restaurant owned by his uncle.
Clever and impulsive, Guido uses humor as an ally while serving his
customers, making him well-liked, especially by Dr. Lessing (Horst
Buchholz), a German who shares Guido's fondness for puns and riddles.
Their relationship is particularly intriguing, as Guido is Jewish.
        When a chance meeting with the lovely Dora (Nicoletta
Braschi, Benigni's real-life spouse) sets his heart aflutter, Guido
goes to great lengths to win her love, despite her engagement to
a snooty government official.  Their mutual affection gradually
deepens into something more, culminating in a wonderful scene in
which Guido disrupts Dora's engagement party to whisk her away on
horseback.  It's here that a more conventional film would end... but
there's nothing conventional about "Life is Beautiful," and this scene
occurs less than halfway through the story.
        Flash forward six years to 1945: Guido and Dora are happily
married, and are now parents to a five-year old son named Giosue'
(Giorgio Cantarini).  Fortune has been good to them: Guido even owns
the bookstore he's always wanted!  But Guido's Jewish heritage is
discovered by a facist-filled government, and he and his son are sent
to an unidentified concentration camp.  Dora, a Gentile, is not
required to attend the camp, but she demands to go with her family;
her devotion to her husband and child is that selfless.
        Young Giosue' is frightened, but it's here that Guido
gives his greatest performance, convincing his son that they are
embarking on a grand adventure, an epic game that will be exciting
and fun.  (The prize for winning the game?  A full-size tank!)  Guido
knows that the Nazi officers who run the camp are looking for reasons
to dispose of the prisoners, so he tells Giosue' that he (Giosue') can
win extra points for hiding, remaining silent for long periods of
time, etc.  These are poignant scenes, as father and son rekindle each
other's enthusiasm and optimism (Dora is in a different part of the
segregated camp).  Although the other children in the camp are
gradually disappearing into the camp's gas chambers, Guido uses humor
to keep his son oblivious to their fate, sparing Giosue' from the
emotional agony and sense of helplessness that he himself is feeling.
        The structure of "Life is Beautiful" is somewhat like Robert
Rodriguez's "From Dusk Til Dawn," in the sense that each half of
the film has a completely different tone, joined together by a
startlingly abrupt transition.  It's ingenious and effective: both
halves of the movie are masterfully constructed, but as different as
night and day.  The warm, sunny first half establishes these wonderful
characters and their relationships; we see Guido's remarkable
personality in full-swing, and witness the passion and joy he derives
from simple, ordinary activities.  These early moments also set up
his fairy-tale love affair with Dora (Guido refers to her as his
"princess" throughout the story), and their devotion to each other is
made clear-- we understand why she is willing to follow Guido to a
concentration camp.  The story's second half, by contrast, uses their
love as a foundation on which to build triumph and tragedy.  The
construction is as elegant as any I've encoutered.
        It's impossible not to like Benigni's warm portrayl of Guido,
the sort of clown who inspires laughter as much by accident as
deliberate effort; his mannerisms are so broad and cartoonish that
comparisons with Chaplin are justified.  Benigni, who not only
starred but also directed and co-wrote the screenplay, has a
masterful sense of comedic timing.  The material flows effortlessly
through him, lending both spontaneity to the gags and power to the
drama.
        Benigni doesn't skimp on the humor, despite the subject
matter; even during the horrific scenes inside the camp, Guido is
full of life and optimism-- a veritable beacon of hope and sunshine
for his fellow prisoners and, most importantly, his son.  There are
those who have called the film "offensive" because of the way it
handles its Holocaust-related material.  They are mistaken: this movie
isn't *about* the Holocaust; it's about humanity, love, and the
desperate facade one man must invent to spare mental anguish for
his son while suffering *through* the Holocaust.
        There are perhaps ten genuine laugh-out-loud moments in
"Life is Beautiful," sprinkled in among the tragedy; like the
characters in the film, Guido's antics make the despair bearable for
us, right up to the movie's final moments, which involve the triumph
of the human spirit over the unimaginable forces of adversity.  The
film soars, heartens, saddens, uplifts, rejoices... and, like life, is
beautiful indeed.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing
list.  Or, you can subscribe directly from my web page.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Office Space (1999)
        In my other life, the one in which I'm not pretending to
be Roger Ebert, I work for a nationally-known computer company.
I'm all too familiar with corporate bureaucracy, inefficient
procedures, and managers who think redundancy is the answer to
everything.  Dilbert is my soulmate.
        For those of you in the same boat, take note: the first
half of Mike Judge's "Office Space" is so dead-on in its portrayal
of corporate America that I had to resist the temptation to throw
up my hands and yell "Get outta my head!" at the screen on several
occasions.  Judge, the man who garnered fame for his animated
satirizations of youth culture (Beavis and Butthead) and Southern
life (King of the Hill), pulls no punches with his depiction of
Initech, the sort of faceless corporate conglomerate that many of
us can relate to.  You've probably worked somewhere similar: a
carpeted labyrinth of cubicles, where the fax machine rarely works,
the computers are woefully slow, and the managers have nothing to
do but hire consultants and chastise employees for improperly
filling out cover pages.
        Peter Gibbons (Ron Livingston) is a programmer working on
the Year 2000 problem for Initech, but he finds his job so tedious
and meaningless that he spends most of his time staring at his desk.
His friend and co-worker, the unfortunately-named Michael Bolton
(David Herman), enjoys listening to rap music as an act of defiance
to the singer of the same name.  Samir (Ajay Naidu), an Indian
computer guru, gets so frustrated by the traffic problems he
encounteres on the way to work every morning that he can't even
articulate the curse words.  And Milton (Stephen Root), a timid,
middle-age nobody who speaks with the voice of Droopy Dog, is about
to reach his breaking point after years of abuse by the corporation.
        After his boss (Gary Cole, sounding like a real-life
version of Mr. Mackay from "South Park") orders him to cancel his
weekend fishing trip because of a work backlog, Peter visits a
hypnotist in an attempt to relieve some work-related stress.  The
therapy works a bit too well, however: soon Peter is so relaxed
and laid-back that he's wearing T-shirts and shorts to the office,
completely ignoring his boss, and skipping work on a regular basis.
This new attitude intrigues Joanna (Jennifer Aniston), a waitress
suffering from workplace woes of her own.  The therapy gradually
wears off... but not before Peter's new approach to work is deemed
"refreshing" by the consultants, who recommend him for immediate
promotion even as the hardest-working employees are being laid-off.
        There are a lot of big laughs in "Office Space,"
particularly during the first hour; gags fly around with such
rapidity that I can almost picture director Judge jumping up and
down in the editing room, clapping his hands with glee.  I can
relate to these characters and empathize with their plight.  I'm
pleased to see someone else trying this type of humor; apart from
cartoonist Scott Adams (the creator of "Dilbert"), this genre has
been largely neglected.  He's done well; the majority of "Office
Space" works splendidly.
        It's a shame, then, that Judge is not confident enough with
the material to let it stand on its own.  Characters like Peter,
Michael and Joanna are fun, because they seem like real people.
Others, like Milton and Lamberg (Peter's boss), are cardboard-thin
and serve more as a distraction than anything else.  How extraordinary
"Office Space" could've been if it had stuck with believable people
and situations, rather than giving us character stereotypes and two
ridiculous plot twists in the film's second half.
        But a critic must judge a movie by what it contains rather
than what it lacks, and much of what's here is gold.  "Office Space"
bills itself as a comedy, and it certainly kept me laughing.  If you
work in a corporate environment and hate your job, get together with
a bunch of your fellow cubicle-dwellers and give this one a peek.
We are definitely not alone in our frustrations.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to: joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com

Title
Review for Opposite of Sex, The (1998)
        Actress Christina Ricci closes a door on her life in Dan Roos'
brilliant new film, "The Opposite of Sex."  Gone forever are the days of
Wednesday Addams and "That Darn Cat"; here, Ricci delivers a performance
that is strong, confident, memorable... and more adult than we have any
right to expect from an actress her age.  (The end credits actually carry
a message assuring that "No minors engaged in any sexual activities during
the filming of this movie.")
        To say that sixteen year-old Dedee, the character Ricci plays, is
a bad seed would be a gross understatement.  She's sassy, mean, tough,
and so resentful of her parents that she hurls stones and obscenities at
the coffin during her stepfather's funeral.  She chain-smokes, has no real
friends, and is so fond of the physical aspects of life that when she
suddenly finds herself pregnant, any number of boys/men could be the father.
        Hating the atmosphere at home, Dedee flees to the house of her rich
gay brother, a man she has seen exactly once in her life.  Putting on her
most pathetic-looking face, the manipulative Dedee weepily asks to stay.
Her brother Bill (Martin Donovan), taken in by her charm and apparant
helplessness, caves in at once.  Poor Bill doesn't realise that he's making
the biggest mistake of his life.
        All goes well until the restless Dedee takes a liking to Bill's
boyfriend Matt (Ivan Sergei).  The two forge an uneasy friendship, with
the homophobic Dedee trying to convince Matt that he'd enjoy sex with a
woman if he'd only try it.  Dedee offers him her body, and eventually
Matt sucuumbs... giving Dedee the opportunity to name Matt as the father
of her child.  Matt, who isn't exactly the sharpest stick in the bunch,
believes her completely.
        All this takes place in the first few minutes of the film; the
rest of the movie depicts Bill and his friend Lucia (Lisa Kudrow) chasing
Matt and Dedee across North America as her pregnancy develops.  Along the
way the characters will fall in and out of love with each other, commit
felonies, and wonder what the hell they're doing.  As well they should.
        That capsule summary may make the film sound like nothing more than
an empty-headed teen-comedy, but the film is more than this-- much more.
It's closer to "Taxi Driver" than "Cannonball Run."  Roos presents us with a
movie as heavy on satire as darkness.  This is a staggeringly funny film,
but an underlying intelligence runs through it, thanks to the outstanding
screenplay.  It's an undeniably dark and twisted ride... yet it also
contains the highest joke-to-scene ratio of any movie since "Clerks."  The
movie's split-personality is a big part of its charm.
        The film is narrated by Dedee, and she constantly reminds us that
we shouldn't like her.  She knows she's a bitch and couldn't care less.
"I don't have a heart of gold, and I don't grow one by the end of the movie,
okay?" she warns in the opening voice-over, and it's true.  But amazingly,
Dedee never feels like a caricature or stereotype.  Ricci plays the role
with all her heart, giving us a memorable character that manages to grow
and change over the course of the movie despite her best efforts not to.
Dedee will never be Mother Teresa, and that's fine, but neither is she a
one-note heroine/villain.  The life Ricci brings to the role has to be
seen to be believed.  There's already talk of an Oscar nomination for her,
and I couldn't agree more.
        Ricci is obviously getting the most attention of the film's cast,
but she's not the only one doing admirable work.  Just try not to smile at
the amiable Carl (Lyle Lovett), a shy policeman who only has eyes for
Lucia... who in turn only has eyes for Bill... who's still in love with
Matt... who ran off with Dedee... who feels alone.  Moments like these are
exactly why the film works so well: love is not always a wonderful thing.
It frequently hurts, disappoints, offends, and frustrates.  Carl is easy to
love; Lovett's portrayl conveys the sense of longing we've all felt,
wanting someone who doesn't know we exist.  "Real" moments like this are
what make the movie soar.
        This is admittedly not a film that has much use for political
correctness; it will offend as many as it thrills (indeed, it already has).
But if you're not bothered by a movie that challenges you, get to a theater
immediately.  This is by far the best film I've seen this year.
This review was originally written: July 6, 1998
Copyright (c) 1998 by Joe Barlow.  This review may be freely distributed as
long as ABSOLUTELY NO CHANGES are made and this disclaimer remains attached.
It may not reproduced for profit without the written consent of the author.
If you have comments or questions, please send them to: jbarlow at earthling
dot net (substituting the appropriate symbols, to discourage spam).

Title
Review for Dead Man on Campus (1998)
STARRING:   Tom Everett Scott, Mark-Paul Gosselaar, Poppy Montgomery
DIRECTOR:   Alan Cohn
WRITERS:    Anthony Abrams and Adam Larson Broder
RATED/YEAR: R/1998
        "Dead Man on Campus" is a dark comedy about the ancillary benefits
of college life: non-stop parties, free booze, and more sex than anyone
could possibly want.  Sound like your college days?  No?  Okay, okay.
"Dead Man on Campus" is a dark comedy about the stereotypes inherent in
college life, such as the belief that all higher-learning activities
revolve around the above items.  But considering the film is brought to
us by MTV, a network built around stereotypes and the lowest-common
denominator, that shouldn't be a surprise.  Thanks to their programming,
I've learned that all musicians, particularly women, are rail-thin and
gorgeous, something I honestly didn't know.
        Tom Everett Scott is Josh Miller, a smart, amiable guy from Iowa.
Bookworm Josh's GPA has earned him an academic scholarship to Daleman
University, a school whose medical studies department is unparalleled.
Josh, who honestly intends to make something of himself, knows that with
a great deal of hard work and studying, he can earn his medical degree
and make his family proud.
        His roommate Cooper (Mark-Paul Gosselaar), however, makes this
very difficult.  A rich kid who's at college only to procure the items
mentioned in this review's opening paragraph, Cooper turns goofing off
and procrastination into an art form.  He doesn't go to a single class,
but does learn a great deal about herbal recreation, much to Josh's
chagrin.
        It doesn't take long for the film to turn into a combination of
"The Odd Couple" and a buddy picture; although straight-arrow Josh is
initially turned off by his roomate's hell-raising antics, Cooper's
personality is infectuous.  Too infectous, perhaps; soon, Josh is spending
all of his time partying, getting high with his new friend, and having
staggering amounts of sex with the lovely Rachel (Poppy Montgomery).
        By the time midterms roll around, both boys know they're in
serious trouble: Josh is in danger of losing his scholarship, and Cooper's
dad may force him to leave school and come work in the family business, a
fate which Copper considers worse than death.  Sensible Josh suggests that
the two of them become study buddies and work extra-hard on their
schoolwork to make up for lost time.  Cooper, however, has a different
plan.
        It seems that Daleman University's charter contains a provision
which could save both of them, without forcing them to resort to anything
as vulgar as studying.  The rule: if any Daleman student commits suicide,
his or her roomates will be awarded straight A's, regardless of prior
academic standing.  Kinda like a consolation prize, to help the mourners
deal with their grief.  Cooper's plan: steal the University's psycho-
logical records, find a suicide-prone student, convince said student to
move in with the two of them, and gradually pressure him into killing
himself.
        The rest of the film deals with Josh and Cooper's attempts to
accomplish this lofty goal, as a succession of roommates, all of whom
are memorable and entertaining in their own way, file into their spare
room.  Fratboy Cliff (Lochlyn Munro) is such a wild-child that he nearly
kills himself accidentally several times over the course of the story;
Cooper suggests that if they can tolerate his presence just a while
longer, they might get lucky.  Computer geek Buckly (Randy Pearlstein) is
a conspiracy-theorist who believes that Microsoft's Bill Gates is out to
steal his brain.  But their best bet may be Matt (Corey Page), a
chronically-depressed punk musician who writes downbeat songs (with
titles like "Sperm"), and talks constantly about his vivid, recurring
dreams of putting a pistol in his mouth.
        The premise is morbid yet very funny; handled a different way,
the material could've transcended from merely "entertaining" to
"hysterical."  Although the film is being billed as black humor, I
dispute that label, since too much of the movie's emphasis is on
physical comedy.  While that's not neccessarily a problem, the story's
premise is amusing enough that it doesn't really need these forced
additions.  The movie works best when the humor comes from Josh and
Cooper's attempts to instigate suicidal thoughts into their roommates'
minds.  (Cooper, for example, volunteers for the school's suicide hotline.
As he's being trained on how to discourage callers from ending their
lives, he jots down the opposite of what his instructor is saying, to
give him new things to try out on his roomates.)  It would have been
interesting to see what someone like David Lynch, a director well-versed
in "dark," could've done with this material.
        The cast is quite good.  Tom Everett Scott, fresh from his
starring roles in "That Thing You Do" and "An American Werewolf in
Paris," is very likeable as Josh, and Mark-Paul Gosselaar (Saved by
the Bell)'s portrayal of Cooper is equally warm; while you wouldn't
neccessary want to live with him, he'd be good company on a Friday
night.  But both of their performances are eclipsed by their various
roommates'.  The depressed (but incredibly rude) Matt was my favorite, as
he moped sadly in his room, singing self-pitying songs on his guitar,
while Josh and Cooper passionnately urge him to end it all.
        But the ladies of the film, through no fault or their own, don't
fare nearly as well.  Josh's girlfriend Rachel feels so out of place here
that I strongly suspect her inclusion in the script was an afterthought.
It feels as though her presence is the result of a demographic study, which
revealed to the studio bosses that a love interest of some sort was needed to
hold the attention of female movie-goers; therefore, Rachel was invented, her
lines hurridly scribbed down on a napkin, then shoe-horned into the already
completed script.  Poppy Montgomery does an adequate job of portraying the
character, but she's given so little to do or say that the performance never
really catches fire.  Rachel's two friends Lucy and Kristin (Alyson Hannigan
and Mari Morrow, respectively) fare even worse; they're reduced to walk-on
parts, with an occasional bit of slapstick thrown in for good measure.
        There are some great moments in the film, and I laughed out loud
perhaps half-a-dozen times.  The opening credits sequence is one of the
most innovative that I've ever seen, the music is very catchy, and the
story's resolution is actually far more clever than I expected the movie
capable of being.  Nonetheless, the film is perhaps half an hour too long,
primarily in the opening scenes; hence, the story doesn't really get
rolling until we're nearly 45 minutes into it.  Still, this is a pleasant
enough diversion, with a fresh premise and some occasionally funny moments.
Seen with a large group of friends, this movie could be great fun.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.
-----
  "Average Joe" Barlow * MiSTie #73097 * Writer/musician/aspiring filmmaker
       http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow jbarlow@earthling.net

Title
Review for Flawless (1999)
You have to pity poor Joel Schumacher. Not only is he accused of
single-handedly destroying the Batman franchise, but his last film,
the bleak 8mm, was ridiculed by the majority of critics in America. I
can visualize Schumacher's conversation with himself: "Hmm... I've
just made several critical duds in a row. What am I doing wrong? Let's
see. The Batman films and 8mm all share dark, creepy atmospheres, and
that genre's obviously not working for me. Let's go the opposite route
on the follow-up." 
It's almost cute the way Schumacher rolls with the punches, and it's
no surprise that in Flawless, a title that almost dares critics not to
like the movie, the writer/director tries to play it safe... or at
least as safe as any film which centers around a flamboyant
transvestite can be considered to be. Everything here seems
specifically constructed to avoid offensiveness or friction, and it's
the movie's single biggest problem: everything has been so homogenized
that what could have been a fascinating film comes out as a cinematic
vanilla pudding, lacking any sort of flavor whatsoever. 
Walter Koonz (Robert De Niro) is a cranky ex-cop and raging homophobe
who finds himself partially paralyzed and unable to speak properly
after suffering a stroke. Embarrassed by his condition, Koonz begins
taking voice lessons from Rusty Zimmerman (Philip Seymour Hoffman), a
local transvestite who adheres to every gay stereotype and cliche'
imaginable. You'll no doubt be shocked to learn that as they grow
closer, they form a deep bond. Just consider this the low-calorie
version of As Good as it Gets. 
Flawless desperately wants to be The Odd Couple, and there are moments
in which it comes close, drawing us into the lives of the characters
as they come to terms with each other and their differences. Both De
Niro and Hoffman are engaging actors, with Hoffman's bubbling screen
persona serving as a brilliant counterpoint to Hoffman's gruff
demeanor. They each have a firm handle on two very challenging
characters (De Niro actually wore weights in his clothes to help him
prepare for his role as a stroke victim), and they work well together.
But sadly, the performances are all Flawless has going for it. The few
sparks of fire De Niro and Hoffman are able to inject into the story
are quickly extinguished by Schumacher's adherence to the lowest
common denominator, such as the laughable finale, which is so deeply
mired in cliches that it's hard to resist the temptation to hurl
popcorn at the screen. Nor is the drama helped by the unimaginative
shooting methods employed by Schumacher. We may as well be watching a
TV sitcom--or a play. 
I'll give Schumacher an 'A' for effort: with Flawless he's
demonstrated a willingness to deviate from his previous work, and he's
created a film with the potential for power and drama. Unfortunately,
the director does not yet appear to have either the confidence or
ability to helm a project which requires such depth; hence, we're
treated to countless gay stereotypes and unimaginative plot twists
(Stolen drug money? Yawn). Oh well. It was a nice try, Joel, and I
mean that. Maybe next time. 

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film: http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write to:
joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com. 

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
In October of 1994, three student filmmakers began work on a
documentary about the Blair Witch, a creature of urban legend (ala
Bigfoot or the Loch Ness Monster) which supposedly lives in the woods
outside Burkittsville, Maryland. Laughing at these children's tales,
which many of the townsfolk still believed, the trio entered the woods
in search of material for their 'Blair Witch project.' 
But their story did not vanish along with them: nearly a year after
their disappearance, their film was found by a group of archaeology
students from a nearby university. Using this footage, and only this
footage, filmmakers Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Snchez have pieced
together an 88-minute account of the trio's last days, revealing an
intimate portrait of an expedition gone horribly wrong. It's a raw,
heartwrenching tale, drenched in slowly mounting paranoia and madness.
Through their own camera lenses, we witness the group's skyrocketing
sense of desperation, as well as their growing alienation from one
another. Things go wrong-- major things, all of which culminate in
their inability to escape from the mysterious entity (or entities)
quietly stalking them in the darkness. 
There's something cathartic about fear--a certain trait which allows
us to put our own lives into perspective. Things could always be
worse, horror movies assure us. Many films have attempted to
capatilize on our love and need for terror over the years-- stories
like Jaws, The Exorcist, Friday the 13th, The Shining, and hundreds
more. Often these movies succeed in giving us a harmless case of
nighttime shivers (and who among us hasn't enjoyed watching horror
movies with our friends, later professing that you weren't really that
scared even though you know deep down that you're lying?), but rarely
do the images stay with us after the sun comes up.  
No film, in fact, has triggered quite the same sensation of impending
doom and crawling flesh that I received from a recent screening of The
Blair Witch Project. This achievement is even more remarkable since
the movie, a small production even by independent cinema standards,
contains no name actors, no special effects, no script, only a handful
of props, and a budget residing somewhere in the 'used car' price
range. 
It's very rare indeed to find a film, any film, which offers not only
a fresh, intriguing premise and superior performances, but also a
complete retooling of the entire filmmaking process. There is no
musical score here, nor smooth, clean editing (the story is presented
as it was shot--with abrupt starts and starts courtesy of the amateur
camera operators). But the movie's biggest surprise is the way that it
doesn't feel like a movie at all: it's more akin to a historical
record, like the infamous Zapruder Super 8 reel which captured John F.
Kennedy's assassination for posterity. 
The movie is ficticious, of course, but you'd never know it. The
performances are so incredibly astounding that the tale could easily
pass for a real documentary (and in fact, it has fooled many viewers).
Of particular note is the incredible Heather Donahue, the leader of
the trio, who flawlessly conveys many complex emotions and, through
her flawless performance, makes us feel them too. She gets the movie's
standout scene, the one that will go down in movie lore ala the shower
scene from Psycho: a mesmerizing monologue, delivered directly to the
camera, in which she begs for forgiveness from her parents and the
families of her two male companions. She believes that she is to blame
for their current hopeless predicament, due to a judgment error made
early in the journey. Heather seems to know, as do we, that time is
running out for the group, and her plea for absolution is so
hardhitting, the look in her eyes so tragic and terrified, that the
viewer can easily be forgived for blinking back involuntary tears of
his or her own. The film's skillful manipulation of the audience's
fear is only accentuated by our knowledge that these precedings cannot
possibly have a happy ending. 
In terms of pure originality, The Blair Witch Project is sheer genius.
It is quite simply the most original approach to filmmaking I've seen
in recent memory, as innovative and disarmingly unique today as
Citizen Kane was upon its release nearly sixty years ago. It's proof
that films don't have to cost a hundred million dollars to be
fascinating. The movie is intense, scary, brilliant, and perhaps the
best film of 1999 thusfar. 
But be warned: much of the story's terror comes not from watching the
events of the story on the screen, but from witnessing them on mental
instant-reply as the clock ticks away the long, early hours of the
morning, when every sound in the darkness of your bedroom could be the
Blair Witch, come to get you. I wasn't particularly scared while
watching the movie. Then I tried to go to sleep an hour later. 
(The Blair Witch Project haunts the suburbs of your psyche on July
30th.) 
---------------
Copyright (c)1999 by Joe Barlow. This review may not be reproduced
without the written consent of the author. 
E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film: http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
----
"Average Joe" Barlow  (jbarlow@earthling.net)  MiSTie #73097
Joe Barlow on Film: http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
"The one good thing about the [life-size sticker of
 Jar Jar Binks on the door of Taco Bell] is you can
 pretty convincingly throw the SOB a roundhouse punch.
 I found it satisfying."   --Renard A. Dellafave

Title
Review for King and I, The (1999)
STARRING    (the voices of): Miranda Richardson, Martin Vidnovic,
                Alan Hong, Armi Arabe, Ian Richardson, Darryl Hammond
DIRECTOR:   Richard Rich
WRITERS:    Richard Rogers, Oscar Hammerstein II, Arthur Rankin,
                Peter Bakalian, Jacqueline Feather, David Seidler
RATED:      G
RELEASED:   1999
        Warner Brothers' "The King and I" is an animated retelling
of the Rodgers and Hammerstein stage classic, or at least that's what
it claims; in truth, it's more mockery than homage.  The film is the
cinematic equivalent of Cliff-notes, to be employed by those who don't
have the attention span for anything longer or more intellectually
challenging than a "Road Runner" cartoon.
        At cursory glance, the plot appears to be the same: a British
schoolteacher named Anna (Miranda Richardson) is offered a job as
tutor to the King of Siam's children.  She accepts, on one condition:
she wishes to be given a house of her own, located outside the palace
walls.  Although the king (Martin Vidnovic) agreed to this stipulation
via letter, he is much less reluctant to grant the wish once Anna and
her son actually make it to Siam.  But the teacher is a fiercely
determined woman, not afraid to stand up for her rights; soon the
king grows fascinated with the intelligence and charisma of the new
arrival.  Although the monarch and the teacher come from varying
backgrounds, they are eventually able to put aside their differences
and strike up a friendship.
        That's about where the similarities between the two versions
of the story end.  This new animated incarnation cheerfully jettisons
all the thought-provoking aspects of the original work (like the
conflicting emotions the king feels over the issue of slavery, or
his confusion over how the world could've been created in six days
according to the Bible, when science clearly says it took millions
of years).  This "adaptation" (I call it butchery) is strictly
vanilla fare, with all the meat watered down to the point where it
tastes indistinguishable from the broth.
        So what does director Richard Rich do with the leftover
space which remains after he's stripped away half the story?  Why,
add a bunch of cartoon staples, of course.  Since it's impossible to
make an animated feature without including a number of easily
marketable animal sidekicks, the film gives Anna's son Louis (Adam
Wylie) an obnoxious pet monkey.  The King himself gets a jet-black
panther named Rama, and slave-girl Tuptim (Armi Arabe) befriends an
adorably big-eyed baby elephant that seems to be in this movie for no
other purpose than to give Warner Brothers a stuffed animal that's
guaranteed to fly off toy store shelves.
        The original "The King and I" had no central villain, per se.
The King wasn't a bad man, just ignorant of British culture.  But
since you can't make an action figure out of "ignorance," this
adaptation has turned the King's Prime Minster, Kralahome (Ian
Richardson), into an archetypal evil villain stereotype.  He appears
to be the twin brother of Aladdin's Jafar, both physically and
mentally: Kralahome possesses sorcerer's powers, has mad ambitions
of ruling the kingdom, and will stop at nothing to dethrone the
king (although he takes time periodically to leer and break into
demented laughter, to make sure the audience knows that he's evil).
And just as Jafar had the obnoxious Iago for a sidekick, the prime
minister is followed around by a short, fat, incredibly stupid
companion named Master Little (Daryl Hammond).  Little is just as
flat and cliched as his boss; although the children at the screening
I attended seemed delighted by his madcap antics, I found him
infuriating, particularly during a ridiculous subplot involving
Little's tendency to involuntarily lose his teeth.  Why does a story
that's supposed to be a tragedy need such obnoxious comic relief?
        I say "supposed to be," because this film turns the thought-
provoking scenes of the original story into a trite, giddy smile-fest.
Gone is the heartwrenching moment in which the king dies of a
mysterious illness (which appears to be a broken heart), replaced
with a chase scene involving a hot-air balloon and a couple of
elephants.  I expected the king to be a brave man, but who knew he
was a Jackie Chan-wanna be?
        Perhaps most disappointing is the way the original tale's
emotional axis, the forbidden love affair between Tuptim and a
freeman, is relegated to a status of irrelevance.  The affair
ends tragically in the original film, giving the king (and the
audience) much to think about.  But here, Tuptim's love interest
is none other than the crown prince himself (who was a boy in the
earlier version, but appears to be roughly sixteen here); therefore,
all sense of tension is immediately irradicated.  Obviously the
king is not going to harm his son, so these scenes play off as
nothing more than cheap formula: the conclusion that they'll live
happily ever after is foreordained, but nonetheless, cliche' requires
the inclusion of a romance, leaving a story that proceeds so
transparently that there is no way for us to be surprised by
anything we're seeing.
        The movie is not devoid of merit, however.  The animation is
spectacular-- so good that the film may actually be worth a peek
simply to bask in its remarkably vivid colors.  Of particular note
is a montage of scenes in the palace gardens, which are rendered so
brightly and beautifully that I actually whispered the word "Wow."
The tune "Getting to Know You" also puts in a stellar appearance
here: in the original movie, the song is performed by Anna and the
children in their palace classroom; here, Anna takes the kids on
a field trip to the village just outside the palace gates (which
the kids have never seen).  It gives new meaning to the lyrics, and
is clever and touching at the same time.  Had the film been daring
enough to reinterpret the material in this fashion more often, rather
than "dumb it down," it could've provided a fresh new slant on a
beloved story; as it stands, it's the only such moment in the movie.
        This remake of "The King and I" is painfully disappointing.
It adheres to the belief that children are idiots who won't be able
to fathom a tale that possesses some depth and intelligence, and
steadfastly refuses to raise any issues worthy of thought and
discussion.  Instead, we're given an overabundance of cuteness, a
false-feeling happy ending, and cartoon cliches.  This isn't so much
"The King and I" as "The King and I and His Kids and the Villagers and
a Pointless Romance and a Bunch of Animals and Cardboard Villains and
our Merry Life Together in the Magical Land of Dreams..."; or, as the
king himself might say, "Et cetera, et cetera, et cetera."

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to: joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com

Title
Review for Rage: Carrie 2, The (1999)
        My friends, I have seen bad films.  I have laughed in the
face of "Batman and Robin," cackled maniacally at "The Avengers,"
giggled all the way through "Highlander II"... and received a
perverse sort of pleasure from them all, I might add.  When it
comes to the enjoyment of bad movies, you will be hard-pressed to
find my equal.  An Ed Wood retrospective?  Count me in!  A Roger
Corman marathon?  I'm there, my friend, I'm there!
        That introduction was necessary in order for you to
understand the magnitude of what I'm about to say: As God is
my witness, I have never seen anything like "The Rage: Carrie 2,"
a film which has no reason to exist on this planet other than to
emotionally scar anyone who sees it.  I'm not sure, but I think
it made me sterile.
        Who in the hell thought "Carrie," Brian de Palma's 1976
macabre masterpiece about a teenage girl cursed with telekinetic
powers, needed a sequel in the first place?  The tale, based on
Stephen King's novel of the same name, was engrossing and
touching, as the outcast Carrie (Sissy Spacek) fell for a handsome
senior (William Katt), not realizing that his friends were using their
relationship as the set-up for a cruel joke.  Carrie was warm and
undeniably human; we could understand her pain, which made the
film's final 20 minutes all the more tragic.  (Even people who have
never seen the movie know all about the famous prom scene, which
ranks right up there with "Psycho's" shower montage in terms of
pop-culture familiarity.)
        "The Rage: Carrie 2," which is really more of a remake
than a sequel, doesn't bother to give the same depth to its
so-called "heroine," a goth-girl named Rachel (Emily Bergl).
We're supposed to sympathize with her, I think.  I guess.
Maybe.  Couldn't tell you why.  Like Carrie, Rachel is a social
outcast who possesses a limited telekinetic ability, which grows
stronger when she gets angry.  Unlike Carrie, Rachel never earns
our sympathy: most of her problems seem avoidable, and if she
appears to be an outcast at school, I blame it on the fact that
she's a bitch to everyone she encounters.
        In her defense, the script doesn't give Bergl much to
build her performance on.  We learn very little about Rachel
over the course of the story.  What are her hobbies?  Her
aspirations and goals?  How does she feel about her mother,
who is locked up in a mental institution?  The movie couldn't
care less, and nothing I saw made me curious to know more.
Nor does Bergl possess the ability to rise above the material--
her main method of dealing with a crisis is to deliver her
dialogue to the floor.  (See for yourself!  Anytime she gets a
major speech, Rachel drops her eyes, as though she were talking
to the ground.  I was actually disappointed the floor didn't
receive a co-acting credit for its fine work here.  It certainly
gives the best performance in the movie.)
        It's not just Bergl's fault.  Every character in this
film is here for one specific purpose, and no more: Rachel's best
friend is here to die, thus allowing Rachel's emotional stress
(and her telekinetic power) to skyrocket.  The "in-crowd"
characters are here to instigate this movie's equivalent of
the prom scene massacre.  Jesse (Jason London) is here to fill
the Katt role from the first movie: he's the handsome, popular
jock who goes out with the shunned girl, earning the scorn of
his friends in the process.  He's supposed to be likeable, but
he's not: witness his notebook, in which he keeps track of all
the girls he's had sex with and awards them points based on
their physical attractiveness.  But the most laughable character
is Sue Snell (Amy Irving, reprising her role from the original
film), who is here to gasp dramatically at key moments.  She's
the school's guidance counselor, and makes her living by consoling
distressed students with helpful observations like: "Losing people
close to you can hurt sometimes."  Not exactly Sigmund Freud,
is she?
        Events are so obviously set up that only a dummy -- or
Rachel -- wouldn't be able to see through them.  She's tormented
by the popular kids.  Her life is traumatic.  When she starts dating
Jesse, the in-crowd at school pretends to accept her.  Rachel
finds out that they're just putting her on during a crowded party,
thus giving her a reason to go ballistic and wipe out most of the
people in attendance.  And because the story opens with a scene
of Rachel and Jesse discussing the end of "Romeo and Juliet," we
know that either Rachel or Jesse, or perhaps both, will be pushing
up the daisies by the end of it all.  Blame the directors (yes, it
apparantly took two directors to make a film this bad) for adhering
to cliche and violence, rather than story and characterization.
        The movie eschews restraint during its climactic apocalypse.
We're treated to graphic decapitations, and numerous shots of people
being speared like pieces of fruit in a mixed drink.  A young man's
testicles are separated from his body before our very eyes.  Thank
you, movie.
        But even this doesn't begin to convey the pure wretchedness
of this piece of excrement.  Just how bad is "The Rage: Carrie 2?"
Well, here's a list of things I learned while watching it:
        1) If a teenage girl hears a knock on the front door when
she's clothed in nothing but a towel, she should immediately fling
the front door wide open without bothering to establish the identity
of the visitor.  If no one is there, she should poke around the dark
shadows which surround her on every side, while still wearing the 
towel.
        2) Breaking out of an asylum is a piece of cake.  One
merely has to say "Hey, look over there!" to the guard.  (At
least "In Dreams" made it look like it took some ingenuity to
escape from this type of place.)
        4) Shaking the camera equals cheap telekinetic effects!
It's hours of fun for the whole family!
        5) If the guy you're dating likes your kind of music, he's
obviously your soulmate.  Rachel eyes Jesse warily for the first
half of the movie, until he mentions that he likes the band Garbage.
Immediately she perks up: "You like Garbage?"  Obviously he does:
he's in this movie, isn't he?  And in case you miss their passion,
a computer-generated spark is inserted when their fingertips brush
together.
        The only moments of life contained in this film are the
flashbacks from the original "Carrie," which really have no
business being here at all, but do at least make this piece of tripe
watchable.  (Hint for the filmmakers: don't insert footage from a
good movie into the middle of your really bad one.  It just makes
your offering look even worse by comparison.)  Actually, I take it
back: there *is* a reason to include these flashback scenes: to entice
teenagers into buying a copy of the original "Carrie," which is now
23 years old and has probably not been seen by the sequel's target
audience.
        Why would anyone take a classic film like "Carrie" and
butcher its memory so badly?  I tell you, Stephen King must be
rolling over in his... great big pile of money?  Under no circum-
stance should you see "The Rage: Carrie 2."  Your very salvation
depends on it.
  ("The Rage: Carrie 2" hits theaters Friday, March 12th.)

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to: joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com

Title
Review for Eyes Wide Shut (1999)
        I really wanted to love "Eyes Wide Shut," the much-hyped
final film from the the late Stanley Kubrick.  I'd hoped to use
this review as a soapbox from which to praise and mourn one of
cinema's most innovative filmmakers, and I wanted to be able to
tell you that "Eyes" is a remarkable achievement, a visceral
odyssey of sight and sound that would prove, like Kubrick's best
work, impossible to shake.  Such words would make the director's
untimely death (he passed away four days after completing work
on the project) even more tragic, as he appeared to be on a
creative upswing: Kubrick had reportedly been gearing up for
another film, a promising sci-fi thriller entitled "A.I."  But
now, whether he intended it or not, this final movie must
forever bookend the remarkable career which began with 1953's
"Fear and Desire" and progressed through such cinematic milestones
as "2001: A Space Odyssey," "Spartacus," "Lolita," "The Shining,"
"Dr. Strangelove" and "A Clockwork Orange."  Could any film
possibly ascend to such lofty heights?
        Preliminary signs looked good: "Eyes" has generated
positive word of mouth from the handful of people who were
allowed an early peek at the completed film.  Even with the
good buzz, however, relatively few plot details were available
for the asking: a fierce veil of secrecy, reportedly instigated
by Kubrick himself, has blanketed the project almost from the
start.  About the only details I knew going into the screening
were: a) the film reportedly takes a cerebral look at sexual
dysfunction; b) the movie was nearly rated NC-17 because of
its nudity and depiction of sexual acts; and c) the film's
stars (and real-life spouses) Tom Cruise and Nicole Kidman have
plenty of opportunity to 'get jiggy' with each other on-screen.
Walking into the theater, I wondered exactly what I was going
to get.
        So how does the movie stack up?  Well, I'll put it this
way: I saw the film on opening day with two of my closest
friends, and our opinions covered the entire spectrum.  While I
had significant problems with the story, I found much of the film
brilliant, overflowing with the Kubrickian touches that have made
his work such indelible artistic achievements.  Friend #1 was
basically indifferent, citing a couple of things he enjoyed and
a couple he didn't, but overall possessing no strong opinion either
way.  Friend #2 called it "unquestionably the worst movie I have
ever seen in my entire life."
        I can understand all three viewpoints.  "Eyes Wide Shut"
is far from perfect and nowhere near Kubrick's best work, but I
think that one's potential appreciation (I hesitate to use the
word "enjoyment") of the film will depend primarily on the
expectations the viewer brings into the theater.  As usual,
Kubrick establishes a laconic pace early-on for the story, which
will unquestionably bore many viewers (never have I heard so
much restless shuffling from an audience).  Surreal images float
dreamlike across the screen.  Long passages of the film are
rendered in absolute silence as the director allows our eyes,
not our ears, to convey the full story.  It is, in short,
business as usual for a Kubrick film.
        The marketing campaign is directly responsible for
the disappointment and confusion many audience members feel
after screening the movie.  "Eyes Wide Shut" is being
advertised as a rauchy sex-fest, but it's nothing of the
sort-- although the film contains a rather extreme amount of
nudity, the concept of sexual dysfunction is explored with a
cool, aloof eye from Kubrick.  Yes, there's a lot of on-camera
sex, but it's neither erotic nor passionnate.  Everyone has
been objectified to the point where all desire is irradicated.
People here seem to make love simply because it is expected
of them, not because they have any wish to perform the
action.  Despite the nudity, you'll be hard-pressed to find
a LESS erotic movie.
        The story, in a nutshell: Bill Harford (an excellent
performance by Tom Cruise) is a happily-married doctor living
with his wife Alice (Nicole Kidman) and their daughter in
upper-middle-class bliss.  Bill's life seems perfect until
Alice drops a bombshell on him, admitting that she still thinks
about sex with other men despite the decade-long marriage the
couple have enjoyed.  After Alice confesses that she nearly
cheated on her husband with a naval officer, Bill enters a
48-hour state of mental turmoil, during which he becomes
immersed in a seedy underworld where sex, scandal and
death are bedmates.
        First, the good news: "Eyes Wide Shut" is constructed
with the considerable technical virtuosity that Kubrick has
demonstrated in nearly all his films.  It boasts the loveliest
cinematography I've seen in recent memory (Kubrick was a staff
photographer for LOOK magazine before he embraced filmmaking,
and he knew how to use lighting, angles and color to maximum
effect), making the film fascinating to watch even when the pace
lags.  Tom Cruise turns in an Oscar-caliber performance for
his role as the confused and hurt Dr. Bill.  The film boasts
a rich, chilling gothic atmosphere, which serves the story's
tone well.
        Now, the not so good: "Eyes Wide Shut," even by Kubrick
standards, is excessively long and often uninvolving.  The sparse
musical score (consisting almost entirely of a solo piano playing
two notes) is repetitive to the point of madness.  (I'm sure it
was done for atmosphere, but by the end of the movie the audience
burst into laughter each time it appeared.)  And at times, the
movie seems unsure of what it's supposed to be, and what it's
trying to say.
        Still, even if it doesn't quite work, "Eyes Wide Shut"
will likely be remembered as a great experiment gone slightly
wrong.  I respect Kubrick's attempt to embrace complex themes
and tell an astoundingly orignal story, rather than adopting cheap
cliches and formula, as so many other filmmakers choose to do.
It's not a perfect film, but Kubrick afficianodos, a group I
consider myself part of, will no doubt find much to like, even
if these praiseworthy aspects have more to do with the film's
technical elements rather than the actual storytelling.  It's
not the be-all, end-all Kubrick film that I'd hoped it would be,
but it has much to offer the patient viewer.
        Whether non-fans will like it is another question
entirely.  It's possible, as long as they're expecting a
cerebral odyssey and not a porn movie.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to: joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Title
Review for Waterboy, The (1998)
        Call him juvenile, call him sophomoric, call him annoying,
but don't call him poor.  Adam Sandler, the most recent "Saturday
Night Live" alumnus to graduate to the big screen, has made a
career out of playing eccentric, offbeat characters that terrify
critics while simultaneously endearing themselves to the masses.
(Witness "Airheads," "Billy Madison" and "Happy Gilmore.")
Appealing primarily to teenage boys, Sandler's movies perform
respectably at the box office, even as confused adults scratch
their heads in bewilderment.  But 1998's "The Wedding Singer,"
co-starring Drew Barrymore, broke with convention and allowed
Sandler the chance to experiment with a more low-key acting
style.  The result was arguably his best film to date, and the
new, more "mature" actor seemed poised on the brink of bigger
and better things.
        "The Waterboy," alas, is a step backwards.  Full of
cheap humor, stereotypes, and jokes that misfire as often as
not, the film drags us through a story which contains not an
ounce of freshness or originality.  One set-up leads to another
so predictably that the only thing that surprises us is the fact
that director Frank Coraci thought he could get away with it.
        Sandler plays Bobby Boucher, a 31 year-old Louisiana
simpleton whose only passion is serving as waterboy for his
local college football team.  After the despicable Coach
Beaulieu (Jerry Reed) fires him, our lowly hero accepts a
similar position with a rival team, headed up by the eccentric
but friendly Coach Klein (Henry Winkler, in a performance
that's definitely the movie's bright spot).  Although Bobby
lives for the team, they despise him and his feeble mind.  Even
though he's kind and friendly to them, they call him names and
subject him to cruel pranks.
        But when the shy, introspective waterboy is finally pushed
to his breaking point, he reveals a side no one previously suspected:
sheer animal rage.  Noting this, Coach Klein devises a plan to end
the team's losing streak.  Giving him a defensive position on the
team, Klein instructs the confused Bobby to pretend that their
opponents are people who have personally insulted him.  With this
mental trick, Bobby becomes an unstoppable tackling machine.
        From this point on, things progress exactly the way we
expect them to.  The team gradually gets better.  The people who
hated Bobby at the outset of the story will eventually come to
respect him.  Everything will culminate in a big game, which Bobby
will have a chance to single-handedly win or lose.  And naturally,
our hero will fall in love.
        The gal in question is Vicky, a tomboy played by Fairuza
Balk (the spooky gal from "The Craft").  Her character serves no
purpose whatsoever other than to provide the requisite sexual
titillation and "falling in love" scenes (once again proving the
BArlow Theorem of Cinematic Amour (B.A.T.C.A.), which states:
"A movie's main character is never in a happy relationship at the
outset of the story").  Balk is a fine young actress, but I wish
she'd actually had a reason to appear in this film.
        Other facets of the movie are also disappointing, not the
least of which is the silly voice Sandler uses throughout the
tale.  A high-pitched, mumbly, lip-smacking Louisiana drawl, it
starts out moderately amusing, but begins to grate on one's ears
after... oh, three minutes or so.  Sandler uses the exact same
voice for a character called The Southerner in some of the
stand-up routines on his comedy CD, "What the Hell Happened to
Me?".  It's funnier on the album, possibly because the skits
last no longer than two minutes each.  After twenty minutes of
hearing him speak in "The Waterboy," I wanted to crawl under
my chair.
        Henry Winkler, on the other hand, is tremendous from start
to finish.  His performance as Coach Klein is eccentric, goofy, and
impossible not to like.  I admired the way Winkler threw self-
consciousness to the wind, going all-out for a role that certainly
didn't deserve his considerable talents.  But Kathy Bates is more or
less wasted as the fretful mother who wants to make sure her Bobby
isn't playing "da fooz-ball."  She's a walking stereotype, included
only for cheap comic effect.  This is the same actress who won an
Oscar for "Misery?"
        Is "The Waterboy" funny?  Yeah, at times... like when Bobby
tells his mother that his black eye was caused by a rampaging gorilla,
to disguise the fact that he's playing football.  Other scenes, such
as those involving the mule that the Bouchers keep in their house (as
though it were a cat), border on the surreal and are equally
entertaining.  But most of the other gags are standard physical comedy
fare (including a shot of the former Fonz's uncovered bottom, which I
quite honestly could've done without).  The movie's not exactly
overflowing with intellect, but it does have spirit, and is neither
the best or worst of Sandler's offerings.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to: joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com

Title
Review for Vertigo (1958)
The easiest way to identify a master filmmaker is to observe
how well his or her work holds up to multiple viewings. All too
often a story's luster fades quickly--even a movie beloved
during the initial screening can feel stale and formulaic the
second time around. The rare film which actually demands more
attention on subsequent viewings is to be cherished indeed.
Vertigo may not be Alfred Hitchcock's best film, but it's
probably his richest--the one that keeps calling us back for
further analysis, the one hardest to release from our minds
after the end credits roll. The story, adapted from the French
novel D'Entre Les Morts (From Among the Dead), is certainly one
of cinema's most compelling, as famous for its magnificent
construction as its actual entertainment value. A rich
masterpiece of macabre obsession, Vertigo is not so much a
movie as a web that entangles and ensnares both the characters
and audience.
John "Scottie" Ferguson (played by Hitchcock regular James
Stewart, in the last film they would make together) is a
detective who leaves the force after a near-fatal misstep
during a rooftop chase leaves him with an incapacitating fear
of heights. Having little to occupy his time, Scottie answers a
plea for help from an old college friend, Gavin Elster (Tom
Helmore). Elster confides to Scottie that his (Elster's) wife,
Madeleine, may be in danger:
The complete review is located free of charge at:
 http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/vertigo.htm

Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)
        Approximately one week after my largely critical review of
"Saving Private Ryan" appeared on the Internet, I've become the target
of many readers' anger.  New mail continues to flood into my mailbox
every hour, saying pretty much the same thing: "You don't know what you're
talking about!  This is the best movie of the year!" etc.
        I've responded to the majority of these messages, but since I've
basically found myself saying the same things over and over, I've decided
to write this public addendum.  This will be my final word on the movie:
I've moved on to other reviews, and since each lengthy "SPR" reply takes
fifteen minutes or more to complete, I must now look ahead or face the
possibility of getting behind in my viewing of new films.
Here are some of the more articulate charges which have been leveled
at me (some messages have been edited slightly to remove profanity and
correct minor typos):
        While I regret that my comments have offended so many people,
I do not apologize for my opinion.  As a film critic, I have to identify
the good and the negative as I see them.  I am not on a personal vendetta
against this, or any, film.  One reader accuses me of trashing the movie
simply because everyone else likes it, assumedly to draw attention to
myself.  Not so.  I saw the film on opening day, before I'd read a single
review or heard any comments.  Only later did I discover that my opinion
was in the minority. (My exact words: "When so many people disagree
with me, then hey, maybe it's just me.")  As I said in my disclaimer,
which apparently this reader didn't bother to look at, I never had any
intention of reviewing the movie.  It was only because I received several
e-mails which specifically asked for my opinion that I compiled my notes
into a critique.
        For the record, I didn't hate "Saving Private Ryan."  The war
scenes are well-done, and as stated previously, Tom Hanks does his usual
wonderful job.  Is the film significantly flawed?  In my eyes, yes.
But if the movie fails on a spectacular basis, it's only because it risks
so much more than the average film.  For that reason alone, Spielberg has
my respect.
        This doesn't change the fact that the opening sequence is
irrelevent to the story line, and that the characters border on
caricature.  I found the film terribly unfocused, as if Spielberg did not
know what he wished to do.  Is he trying to show the horrors of warfare?
A documentary would've been more effective.  Or was Speilberg trying
to make a character-intensive drama?  If so, the war footage appears
intrusive.  One reader criticises me for attacking something as
"inconsequential as character development."  I'm sorry, but character
development is an important part of ANY drama.  If Spielberg didn't
want to develop his characters, I reiterate: he should've made a
documentary.  By attempting to create both The Greatest War Film Ever
Made and a Touching Drama, he has, in my opinion, distilled the effects
of both.
        In my own defense: the review of "Saving Private Ryan" which
appeared on rec.arts.movies.reviews was an early draft; the later
version is available on my website.  While the criticisms are basically
the same, I did elaborate a bit more on certain points.
        I will also note that after my review appeared, I spotted two
other critical essays about the film.  The Raleigh "Independent," a local
newspaper, gave the film one star out of a possible five.  Another
Internet film critic, whose name I didn't catch, gave the film two stars
out of a possible five.  Both cited many of the same flaws that I did.
I'm pleased to learn that I'm not the only one who spotted problems; I
was honestly beginning to wonder.
And one piece of information I was grateful to receive:
(Thanks to Amy Snyder Hale for sharing this with me.)
        One reader, however, sent me a message so profound that it has
actually given me pause.  She writes:
    This is an excellent point, and it's one that I quite frankly had
not considered.  That's great food-for-thought, and who knows?  It may
prompt me to significantly re-think my opinion of the movie.  Thank you,
Linda.
        I'd also like to thank those of you who wrote me kind messages,
thanking me for not sugar-coating my opinion and for stating how I
honestly felt.  You're welcome.  I will continue to do so.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.

Title
Review for Matrix, The (1999)
        What is "reality?"  Most people would probably describe it
as the day-to-day events that comprise our existence.  Or perhaps
you'd call it the conglomeration of sensory input relayed to your
brain via your eyes, ears, nose, tounge and fingers.  Either is an
acceptable definition.
        But are there other levels?  If you find yourself trapped
inside a terrifying dream from which you can not awaken, is that
reality?  What if you'd spent your entire life trapped inside Star
Trek's Holodeck, and had no idea that everything around you was
a fabrication created by a giant computer?  It's all you've ever
known... but is it "real?"
        Now, suppose everyone else you've ever known is trapped in
that Holodeck with you, and none of you have any idea that the world
is anything less than it seems.  What do you call that?
        The Wachowski Brothers' new science-fiction thriller is
a slick, cerebral flash of ingenuity out of the clear blue sky.
Painted with broad strokes of characterization, the film is smart
and thought-provoking as it drags the viewer along with the sheer
force of its momentum.  The story borrows heavily from science-
fiction's illustrious past, plundering such works as "Pi,"
"Alien," "Tron," "Sliders," "Metropolis" and even "Nightmare on
Elm Street" for the parts from which it constructs its
Frankensteinian tale.  Such a haphazardly-built plot should
reek of staleness, but "The Matrix" takes its well-worn ingredients
and recycles them into an appealing mix all its own.
        Thomas "Neo" Anderson (Keanu Reeves) is a software
programmer cursed like so many of us with a job that he hates.
He toughs it out for one reason: it allows him to pay the rent
as he struggles towards his true goal: the decipheration of a
complex mathematical theory he refers to as the Matrix.  This
Matrix is part of everything in the universe, yet remains
intangible-- a bit like The Force in "Star Wars."
        Indeed, I'm curious to know whether the Wachowski
Brothers actually used George Lucas's famous trilogy as the basis
for this work, as the parallels are striking.  We have an
average guy for a hero, plucked seemingly at random and charged
with saving the universe from a formidable tyranny.  Along the
way he learns the ways of the Matrix (aka The Force).  There's
even an Obi-Wan character: Neo receives assistance in his quest
from a mysterious hacker named Morpheus (Laurence Fishburne),
who knows more about the Matrix than Neo's mind is able to
comprehend.  Morpheus recognizes his friend's confusion and
skepticism: "You have the look of someone who is accepting what he
sees only because he expects to wake up at any moment," he observes.
Nonetheless, Morpheus works diligently to help Neo learn the ways of
the Matrix.  He is sure that Neo is "The One"-- the person who will
be able to shatter the illusion of reality, thereby bringing
enlightenment to the world.  It is not an exaggeration to say that
Morpheus plays Ben Kenobi to Neo's Luke Skywalker as he trains his
apprentice in the ways of this strange power.
        "The Matrix" is one of the most kinetic films you're
likely to see this year; it's not a work that slows down for the
small details-- stop focusing on the screen and you're likely to
find yourself lost, if only temporarily.  Nor is the film a slave
to its effects: our characters here are interesting and well-acted,
with Keanu Reeves hitting the right note of confusion and
befuddlement required by his character.  (That sounds like a slam,
but it's not intended to be.  The same traits that made him so
laughable in "Bram Stoker's Dracula" make him a perfect Neo.)
As always, Laurence Fishburne is strong, confident, and impossible
to ignore.
        "The Matrix" raises a lot of thoughtful issues; the minimal
plot description I have given is really only the tip of the
proverbial iceberg.  This is a visionary work, and comes highly
recommended for fans of science-fiction.  Warner Brothers apparantly
thinks so too: there's already talk of turning the film into a
trilogy (yet another "Star Wars" comparison!).  I'll be interested
to see whether it can survive the onslaught of "The Phantom Menace"
in May.  It deserves to.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to: joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com

Title
Review for Rushmore (1998)
        If Wes Anderson's "Rushmore" isn't black comedy, it at
least has a healthy tan.  In an era when bodily functions are too
often mistaken for humor, it's a great joy to encounter a film that
draws inspiration from the ordinary and mundane, then turns them
into something witty.  In "Rushmore," laughs come from unexpected
places, while satire is stretched to the point of absurdity.  It's
a funny story, but it never sacrifices its characters for a cheap
laugh.
        Max Fischer (Jason Schwartzman) is a brilliant fifteen-year
old with a flair for theatrics.  He's delighted to be a student at
Rushmore, a prestigious private school.  Max, who won an academic
scholarship because of a one-act play he penned about the Watergate
scandal, is so enthusiastic that he throws all of his time and
energy into extracurricular programs, becoming a member (and often
the president) of nearly ever club on campus.  He also leads a
successful campaign to reinstate Latin, after the language is
dropped from Rushmore's curriculum in favor of Japanese.
        Max has basically missed the point of the word
"extracurricular," however: these activities occupy so much of
his time that he never gets around to studying, and he soon
finds himself in danger of losing his scholarship.  Max pleads
with the school's dean ("Couldn't you just let me float by, for
old time's sake?"), but is nonetheless placed on academic
probation.  If he fails one more class, Max will be forced to
consider the unthinkable: public school.
        But Max has another distraction: Rosemary Cross (Olivia
Williams), a new Rushmore teacher.  Max develops an instant crush,
and it's not hard to see why: Rosemary is wise, passionate,
beautiful, and, in Max's eyes, the perfect woman.  Who cares if
she's twice his age?
        Well, she does, for starters.  As Max gradually tries to
convert the budding friendship into something a tad more amorous,
his pal Herman Blume (Bill Murray), a Rushmore alumnus, tries to
talk him out of pining for a relationship they both know will
never happen.  Max sees the logic in Blume's words... but when he
discovers that Herman is seeing Rosemary on the sly, he declares
all-out war on his former friend.
        These scenes are scathing, yet director Wes Anderson
handles them with a light touch.  Max and Herman are too caught
up in their own petty bickering to realize what's painfully obvious
to the audience: neither of them deserve Rosemary.  Fortunately,
she's aware of this fact.
        "Rushmore" is a delicate balance of humor and drama.
Even though the plot description may sound like something from
the Marx Brothers, the movie feels real; even at its zaniest, we
never lose sight of the pain and confusion of our two suitors.
Yet the film never plays without the hint of a smile.  (There's
a great moment, for example, in which Max starts to realize the
seriousness of his academic probation.  "Maybe I'm spending too
much time starting clubs and putting on plays," he solemnly muses.
"I should be spending more time scoring chicks.")
        What impressed me the most was the way in which the film
conveys both touching drama and ridiculous dialogue simultaneously.
When Max and Rosemary realize they've each lived through the death
of a loved one, Max bluntly announces, "I guess we both have dead
people in our families."  His lack of tact works as screwball comedy,
yet remains touching in its honesty.  Or, during an angry
confrontation with Herman: "I saved Latin.  What have YOU ever
done?"
        Much has been written about Bill Murray's performance here,
and justly so.  We all know Murray can be funny; what's impressive
about his role as Herman Blume is the fact that he often attracts
big laughs by playing the straight man.  Herman is perhaps the most
downbeat character Murray has ever played, and the amount of
subtlety and restraint he shows is admirable-- a lesser actor might
have chosen to shoot for the moon, but Murray hits exactly the right
tone: Blume is a rather boring middle-age man stuck with a life and
family he despises, and a more upbeat performance would've been
disastrous to the character's believability.  This role indicates
a maturity I've never before seen in Murray's approach.
        Newcomer Jason Schwartzman is also splendid as Max, a
confused but highly intelligent young man whose hormones tell him
things his brain would just as soon not hear.  Watch how devoutly
he pursues Rosemary, turning away the affections repeatedly offered
by Margaret (Sara Tanaka), a sweet girl just the right age for him.
Max is the sort of person who would rather dream of the impossible
than accept the reality that's offered.  We feel sad for him, but
we can relate: many of us are guilty of the same crime.
        I never once knew where "Rushmore" was headed, and though
I tried to guess on a few occasions, I was wrong every time.  This
is a movie that's smart enough to know that the things in life
which appear simple often end up being insanely complicated, and
in this simplicity lies the story's success.  Anderson has crafted
a clever film that deviates from the beaten path in almost every
conceivable way.  I applaud him for it.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to: joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com

Title
Review for Antz (1998)
STARRING:  (the voices of) Woody Allen, Sharon Stone,
                Dan Ackroyd, Sylvester Stallone, Gene
                Hackman, Danny Glover, Anne Bancroft
DIRECTORS: Eric Darnell, Lawrence Guterman, Tim Johnson
WRITERS:   Todd Alcott, Chris Weitz, Paul Weitz
RATED:     PG
RELEASED:  1998
        "Handling dirt is not my idea of a rewarding career,"
laments Z, the unwitting hero of Dreamworks' remarkable
animated odyssey, "Antz."  His frustration is understandable,
for he lives in a rigid society that eschews individuality.
All ants are expected to march, walk, think, and even dance
in exactly the same fashion-- not good news for someone like
Z, who longs for fun and love, even if it means reducing
productivity.
        The colony's social pecking order is well-established;
at birth, all ants are sorted into one of two groups: "workers"
(who construct tunnels) or "soldiers" (who defend the colony
against predators).  Although society has deemed him a worker,
Z (voiced by Woody Allen) could more aptly be called a dreamer;
his mind wanders constantly, and his co-workers consider him a
clumsy weakling who can lift a "mere" ten times his body weight.
        Z's luck changes when he meets a fascinating gal named
Bala (Sharon Stone) at the colony's watering hole.  They have
fun together, but she's way out of his league: not only isn't
she a worker, she's royalty-- the daughter of the Queen (Anne
Bancroft) herself!  But even so, the lovestruck Z can't forget
her.  He convinces his best friend, a soldier ant named Weaver
(Sylvester Stallone), to switch places with him for one day,
hopefully giving Z the chance to speak with her again.  It's a
sound plan, but unexpected complications creep in when the
soldiers are suddenly ordered to defend the colony against a
possible termite invasion.  Z, woefully unprepared for battle,
suggests alternatives to combat ("Can't we just influence their
political maneuvers via campaign contributions?"), but to his
chagrin the confrontation is unavoidable.
        "Antz" is a thoroughly involving film, filled to the
brim with lovingly constructed visuals and a number of clever plot
twists; the summary I gave in the preceding paragraphs reveals only
a very small portion of the storyline.  If it contained nothing more
than entertaining visuals and humorous characters, the story would
be perfectly acceptable.  But the creators didn't rest on their
laurels; surprisingly, "Antz" sneaks a fair amount of social
commentary
into its frames.  It's not hard to recognize ourselves and modern
society
in the film, which is perhaps the reason the tale works so well: we
all know people who act like the various inhabitants of the ant hill.
        The intelligence of the screenplay was one of the biggest
(and nicest) surprises for me; in addition to the predictable
(though admittedly well-done) gags involving magnifying glasses
and picnics, "Antz" depicts a level of religious satire uncommon
in what's obstensibly a kid's movie.  How?  (SPOILER WARNING!)  While
watching the film, it occurred to me that Z is essentially playing
the role of a Christ figure: he becomes a teacher to the masses and is
denounced by naysayers ("Does Z really care about us?  Then where is
he?").  In the finale, Z's selflessness saves the other ants, although
he "dies" in the process... only to return from the dead.  Hmm.  I
guess it's possible the filmmakers didn't intend any of these scenes
to have religious overtones, but they seemed pretty obvious to me.
Social satire also appears: the film's biggest laugh came when an
insightful worker ant announces, "The workers control the means of
production!"
        The final shot of "Antz" borders on brilliant: the "camera"
lifts up out of the ant hill and pulls further and further back...
until we see that all the grand sights and visuals that have taken
place over the course of the story happened only a few yards from
each other.  The message is clear: perception is everything, and
even big problems don't seem so insurmountable after you get some
distance from them.  It's a message we'd all do well to remember.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing
list.  Or, you can subscribe directly from my web page.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Prince of Egypt, The (1998)
        Even apart from the possible religious controversey,
Dreamworks has taken a serious financial risk with their first
animated release, "The Prince of Egypt."  Not only have they
done the unthinkable (challenge the supremacy of "The Mouse"
in the field of feature-length animation), they've chosen a
topic with the potential to offend as many as it entertains.
There's also the strong possibility that the film's target
audience, children, may not wish to attend a "religious" movie,
which often has the stigma of boredom attached to it, even
when animated.
        But never fear: Dreamworks has created an entertaining
film that can be enjoyed even by those who have little interest
in the Bible.  Setting aside the stoic morality lessons that
religious epics so often attempt to convey, "The Prince of Egypt"
is a fun, fast gallop through the Old Testament's Book of Exodus,
covering the life of Moses beginning with his mother's desperate
attempt to save his life, and culminating with his deliverance of
the Ten Commandments to the Hebrews.  But although the movie's
tone is often light-hearted and comical, it finds a striking
balance with the seriousness and drama that source material of
this nature demands.  It's a delicate high-wire act, but the film
doesn't stumble.
        Moses (voiced by Val Kimer) and Ramses (voiced by Ralph
Finnes, whose career seems to be recovering nicely after "The
Avengers") are sons of the Pharoah Seti (an excellent vocal
performance from Star Trek's Patrick Stewart).  Wild and carefree,
the two boys are the best of friends, in addition to being brothers.
This changes after Moses learns the truth from his sister Miriram
(Sandra Bullock): he is not the true son of the Pharoah after all.
Leaving behind the only life he has ever known, Moses wanders into
the desert and finds contentment and happiness with a band of
gypsies.  Eventually, however, God speaks to him and reveals
Moses's true mission: free the Hebrews from the grip of the
tyranical new Pharoah... who happens to be none other than his
former "brother," Ramses.  This is the stuff of which great
drama is made, and the film wisely concentrates the majority of
its screen-time with the difficult relationship between these two
young men, each uncomfortable with their new animosity... but
both nonetheless unyielding in their beliefs.  The vocal
performances by Kilmer and Finnes are excellent, with each
properly conveying the tone and frustration that each character
possesses.
        Visually, "The Prince of Egypt" is overflowing with
stunning moments and incredible imagery; in fact, I believe that
it contains the highest quality animation I've ever seen in an
American film.  The alternating seriousness and comedy works
very well, each providing an intriguing counterpoint to the other,
yet never detracting from the epic qualities of the story.  (And to
my great delight, Dreamworks didn't feel the need to throw in any
cute, talking animals with a fondness for singing and dancing.)
The influence of Disney is felt in one significant way, however:
musical numbers, and plenty of 'em.  Although they're not bad when
taken on their own, I observed that on a few occasions they greatly
hindered the story's pacing.  A minor flaw, perhaps, but I frequently
found myself waiting for the tunes to end so I could get back to the
actual plotline, which interested me far more.
        "The Prince of Egypt" is nonetheless a cinematic triumph,
offering proof that Disney doesn't have a monopoly on quality
American animation.  Parents should be aware, however, that this
movie is rated "PG," rather than the tamer "G" that most Disney
films receive.  It has a number of intense moments which could
conceivably scare younger members of the family: the
slaughtering of the Egyptian first-borns gave *me* chills, as did
Moses's eerie "hyroglyphics" dream sequence; also, some of the
children at the screening I attended seemed quite frightened by
the sight of Pharoah's hordes descending down upon the Hebrews
at the Red Sea.  You're the best judge of what your kids can
handle, but do be aware that moments of the film are quite livid.
But if you can handle it, you're in a for a treat.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write
to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing list.  Or,
you can subscribe directly from my web page.  Thanks.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Out-of-Towners, The (1999)
        Ever have one of those days?  I'm not referring to a
mere "bad day"-- we all have those on occasion, and in the
end things usually work out okay.  No, I'm talking about the
kind of day where the universe itself seems to be on a personal
vendetta against you; when life flings catastrophe at you like
bread crumbs at a duck pond; when you'd give anything to be
having ONLY a "bad day."
        Henry Clark (Steve Martin) isn't merely having one of
those days; he's having one of those *lives*.  He no longer
knows how to relate to Nancy (Goldie Hawn), his wife of
twenty-four years.  His daughter has dropped out of medical
school to pursue an acting career.  He's recently been fired
from his job, although he's afraid to tell Nancy.  And his
son Alan (Oliver Hudson, the real-life son of Goldie Hawn)
is about to move to London, which will leave the house empty
except for Henry and his wife... a thought which terrifies
the couple, since they will now be forced to communicate with
each other.  So when Henry gets an interview with an advertising
firm in New York City, a land of golden opportunities, he and
Nancy think it may be a sign that their luck is about to change.
They are correct: it's about to get much, much worse.
        The trip starts off with a bad omen: their plane is
rerouted to Boston due to heavy fog, an event which will
eventually result in Henry and Nancy arriving in the Big Apple
with no money, no credit, no food, no clothes, no patience, and
no idea how to resolve their predicament.  From this moment on,
"The Out-of-Towners" shifts gears into slapstick comedy while a
never-ending string of disasters besets our weary, hungry couple:
Rest assured that anytime Henry or Nancy enter a new locale,
something horrible is about to happen to them.  I sighed.  Since
the film seemed to be in the process of settling into a rut of
cheap comedic payoff, my expectations plummeted.
        But a funny thing happened on the way to the lowest
common denominator: Henry and Nancy came to life on the
screen!  I found that against all logic, I was actually
becoming interested in the fate of our two lead characters,
and started cheering for them to triumph over their
circumstances.  Credit Martin and Hawn, last seen together in
1992's "Housesitter," for possessing a plethora of screen
chemistry and the ability to rise above a screenplay that has
no sense of restraint.  Somehow, their characters find the
time to experience the beauty and pulse of New York, despite
all the wretchedness they're going through.  This could be the
reason I liked them so much: I'm dreadfully tired of movies
in which the people do nothing but whine.
        Director Sam Weisman ("George of the Jungle") repeatedly
stages the movie's most intimate moments in public places: in
hotel lobbies, on sidewalks, in Central Park, on crowded airplanes,
etc.  It's an interesting choice, perhaps intending to reflect an
urban culture in which privacy is a privilege, not a right.
Through Henry and Nancy's public displays of emotion (both good
and bad), we understand and identify with the frustrations of
these two wonderful people.  Hawn brings a fiery streak to Nancy,
giving her an impressive dramatic flair (I liked the scene in
which she attempts to seduce a businessman (Mark McKinney) in a
madcap plan to obtain some food), while Martin has imbued the
loveable Henry with the fierce sense of sarcasm he (Martin)
displayed so hilariously in "The Muppet Movie."  For example,
during an exchange with an auto-rental clerk:
        "Monty Python's" John Cleese is also wonderfully evil in
his extended cameo as Mr. Mersault, a snooty hotel clerk whose
driving passion seems to be making the Clarks' lives miserable.
        "The Out-of-Towners" is based on Arthur Miller's 1970
film of the same name, which starred Jack Lemmon and Sandy Dennis
in the lead roles.  I haven't seen the original movie, and have
no idea how faithful this version is to it, but I must admit that
I had a good time.  The cast is absolutely wonderful, the dialogue
has teeth, and if the film occasionally borders on absurdity, then
hey, so does life.
        "The Out-of-Towners" is marvelous fun, and I laughed both
loudly and often.  And how wonderful to see a romantic comedy
that has the guts to cast two middle-age actors in the lead
roles!  The way Hollywood seems to make movies, one would think
that all hormones magically evaporate from the human body around
age 35.  Kudos to someone for telling it like it is.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to: joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com

Title
Review for Thomas Crown Affair, The (1999)
Thomas Crown is a man who has everything, but still finds his life
unfulfilling. Although possessing nearly unlimited funds (witness his
impulsive $100,000 bet on one hole of golf simply because it
eradicates his boredom for a few fleeting seconds), Crown (Pierce
Brosnan) lacks the ability to enjoy the simplest pleasures. Even
though his house is staffed with a large live-in crew (including his
lawyer!), he finds himself drowning in a pool of loneliness. 
He does have one hobby, however: planning the perfect crime. More for
a lack of something to do than any real desire to own it, Crown
manages to liberate an invaluable Monet from his favorite art museum. 
Crown's ploy is eventually discovered by Catherine Banning (a
remarkably annoying Rene Russo), an insurance agent in charge of
locating the missing painting, who spends most of the film trying to
decide whether to capture the hero or hop into bed with him. You know,
I think I saw this movie once already this year, only it was called
Entrapment and was a heck of a lot better the first time. 
The Thomas Crown Affair is a remake of the 1968 film of the same name,
which I never saw, but I'm sure it's better than the present
incarnation, simply because people remember it fondly. This version
lacks any discernible entertainment value. Speeches are delivered
without passion, actions are undertaken without urgency, and the
story's most interesting subplot (Crown's theft of the painting and
the repercussions of this action) are cheerfully jettisoned in favor
of a formula romance so stale and unconvincing that it probably
wouldn't have seemed fresh no matter what year the movie was released.
There's a lot of tension and excitement during the opening and closing
scenes, when the crime is at the forefront of the plot, but we sure
have to wade through a swamp of sentamentality inbetween these
bookending sequences. 
But the one thing that hurts the film, that moves it from "mediocre"
to "painful," is its leading lady. As portrayed by Rene Russo, the
character of Catherine Banning is an unsympathetic Gillian
Anderson-wannabe, so confident in her sexuality that she forgets to
display a single redeeming characteristic throughout the course of the
entire movie. She just expects her (if I may speak frankly) very
limited sex appeal to carry her through the events in the story. Russo
is a poor choice for the part: she has neither the dynamic
personality, oozing sexuality, or magnetic screen presence required to
make Banning convincing and likeable. It's not so much that she's a
bad actress, but she's definitely miscast here. Imagine Kathy Bates in
the Catherine Zeta-Jones role from The Mask of Zorro, and you'll
understand what I mean. 
Pierce Brosnan, on the other hand, fares somewhat better. With his
rugged good looks and intense gaze, Brosnan demonstrates the same sort
of charisma he's shown in the James Bond franchise: you may not like
him, but it's hard not to watch whatever he's doing. 
Unfortunately, that's hardly enough to make this movie terribly
memorable.  The film invites us to ponder what we'd do if we had
everything. The execution of "The Thomas Crown Affair" leaves little
doubt in my mind: I'd find a more interesting person to fall in love
with, cut the last ten minutes of deadwood from my story, and spend
less time straying from fascinating crime scenes into a mundane
romance that no one cares about.  

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film: http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
To receive my movie reviews by e-mail, write to:
joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com
----
"Average Joe" Barlow  (jbarlow@earthling.net)  MiSTie #73097
Joe Barlow on Film: http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
"The one good thing about the [life-size sticker of
 Jar Jar Binks on the door of Taco Bell] is you can
 pretty convincingly throw the SOB a roundhouse punch.
 I found it satisfying."   --Renard A. Dellafave

Title
Review for Entrapment (1999)
        "Entrapment" is a sneaky little movie-- a child, if you will,
with one hand perpetually stuck in the cinematic cookie jar.  So taken
was I with the film's flash and style that it wasn't until driving
home after the screening that I realized just how disjointed the story
was.  Plot twists that appeared plausible (if unlikely) while watching
the film shed their coherence when subjected to mental instant-replay.
Is that enough to derail the movie?  I didn't think so, but I suppose
that's up to the individual viewer.
        To say much about the plot is to risk spoiling the surprise
ending(s), so I must tread carefully.  Suffice it to say that
professional burglar Robert "Mac" MacDougal (Sean Connery) and
insurance agent Virginia 'Gin' Baker (Zeta-Jones), who also dabbles in
theft, team up to pull two big jobs which could net them a paycheck in
excess of eight billion dollars.  Can they trust each other?
Certainly not, and this problem forms the cornerstone of the entire
second half of the film.  But damn, it's fun watching them try.
        The movie itself is skillfully directed by John Amiel, who
infuses the story with plenty of action and entertaining moments.  Nor
is the script without merit: in addition to some great Lawrence
Block-type burglar humor, "Entrapment" is one of the few films of
recent years that seems to have a pretty good grasp of how computers
work.  It's also the first story to do something intelligent and
interesting with the concept of the Year 2000 bug.  The movie's
failing, and it's not necessarily a fatal one, is a lack of coherence.
Clever pay-offs are sacrificed numerous times for cheap action-film
cliches.  Nothing new here.
        Also, a couple of glaring technical problems took me out of
the story.  For example, why do the security doors close so slowly
when Mac and Virginia are busted in a high-security setting?  The
whole point of these doors is to trap any burglars who make their way
into the restricted area.  Shouldn't those things SLAM shut instantly?
But no, our two thieves have ample time to continue putzing around
with the computer before casually making their escape through the not-
yet-shut doorway.  A minor problem, but irksome.  And why does
Connery's character happen to have a *parachute* of all things with
him during one puzzling scene?  (The biggest head-scratcher for me,
though, is still the duo's plan to "download" billions of dollars onto
a recordable CD-ROM.  Come again?)
        Sure, there are flaws, but when the performances are this
much fun, who cares?  Zeta-Jones in particular does great work
here, as I expected she would: she proved in "The Mask of Zorro"
that she's not just another pretty face, but a fine actress as well.
This film will only increase her notoriety, particularly among the
audience's hetereosexual males. Ving Rhames (from "Pulp Fiction")
also turns in a good performance in a role that's an interesting
variation on his usual hard-nosed gangster persona.
        "Entrapment" is by no means the year's best action-movie ("The
Matrix" still bears that distinction, at least until "The Phantom
Menace" opens in three weeks), but it's hardly the worst.  With a
great bittersweet ending that winks at "Casablanca," the film is
clever more often than not.  It's also a good deal of fun... and isn't
that why we go to the movies in the first place?
     ("Entrapment" captures your local theater on Friday, April 30th.)

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to: joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Title
Review for Yellow Submarine (1968)
Yellow Submarine is the spirit of the '60s compressed into ninety
minutes of movie magic. I can't think of any other film, before or
since, that so completely encapsulates the era in which it was made.
For that reason alone, George Dunning's animated musical odyssey would
be worth seeing even if it didn't happen to be utterly charming in its
own right--a rock and roll Fantasia, if you will. 
The plot is ridiculous enough to suit the story's offbeat narrative
style. When the benevolent citizens of Pepperland find themselves
threatened with impending invasion by the Blue Meanies, a force
determined to destroy all joy and music, they send the bumbling
Captain Fred (voiced by Lance Percival) away in a magical submarine to
find help. Fred, a kindly but incompetent soul, manages to convince
Britain's greatest band, the Beatles, to come to Pepperland and help
save his beloved utopia from extinction. Along the way, lots of
groanably bad puns will be spoken, much silliness will ensue, and some
of pop music's loveliest melodies will tumble forth from your
speakers. 
The entire review can be found at:
http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/cc101.htm

Title
Review for Simoom: A Passion in the Desert (1998)
        This is a strange one, kids.  Even though independent films
frequently tackle subjects which Hollywood considers taboo or unmarketable,
"Passion in the Desert" raises the bar to new heights.  Interracial love
stories are uncommon enough on the silver screen... but interspecies?
        Such is Lavina Currier's vision.  The tale, adapted from a short
story by Honore' de Balzac, opens in the Egyptian desert circa 1798 A.D.
A small group of soldiers have been assigned to escort Napolean's favorite
artist (played by Michel Piccoli) on a cross-country march as he draws and
paints pictures of the landscape.  The land is staggeringly hostile, and
the group has its hands full coping with the crippling heat, scorpions,
sandstorms, and frequent attacks by rogue nomads.
        During a particularly fierce sandstorm, the artist and a solider
named Augustin Robert (Ben Daniels) get separated from the rest of their
group.  They find themselves lost, hundreds of miles from civilization, with
no supplies to speak of.  They realise the severity of their predicament at
once ("The desert is totally unpredictable, like living in the tempest of a
woman's heart," observes the artist in one of the film's most memorable
lines) and immediately begin the search for the rest of their group.  The
heat claims their horses fairly quickly, and the two men manage to survive
only by drinking the artist's paint.  Even so, the elderly artist is
quickly overcome by the sweltering temperatures, and Augustin (who is the
spitting image of Kenneth Branagh) is forced to leave his friend beneath
a small tree, promising to return with help as soon as he can.
        Little more than a zombie at this point, Augustin chances upon a
nomad camp which appears to be deserted.  In a wonderfully tense scene, he
sneaks inside, searching for food and water.  I won't reveal what he
discovers there (it's one of the film's best scenes), but soon after, our
hero finds himself trapped in a cave with a leopard who won't allow him to
leave.  No matter how he attempts to flee, the leopard always outsmarts him.
Augustin realises that he must earn the creature's respect, and thus begins
a fascinating game of wits.  It's "The English Patient" meets "Dr.
Dolittle."
        Yes, he succeeds, and the two become friends.  It's at this point
that the film switches gears, changing from an exciting drama into something
else completely.  Augustin and the leopard become very close indeed as they
learn to trust and respect each other.  They share food and water.  They
cuddle and play.  They hunt together.  They kiss.  They lick each other's
skin.  God help us, they even slow dance.  In short, they... they... fall
in love, basically.  No, I'm not making this up.  Now it's "Dr. Dolittle"
meets "Lolita."
        From this point on, I had no idea who I was supposed to root for.
Do we hope Augustin makes it back to civilization safely?  That he and the
leopard live happily ever after?  That the SPCA shows up and shoots them
both?  I'm not sure, and that may be the film's biggest flaw: we have no
idea what the ultimate goal of the movie is, nor why Augustin forsakes the
artist after he befriends the leopard.  Surely he could've brought some
water to the old man.  But no... from the moment he enters the nomad camp,
he never seems to think about his companion again.  Why?  I have no idea.
        However, you will not see a single movie this year that's better
photographed than "Passion."  One could literally take a random freeze-
frame from any moment of the film and have a "National Geographic" cover
photo.  From the innovative use of camera angles and shadows, down to the
color of the costumes and the sky itself, this is a movie whose images
have been meticulously planned, down to the smallest detail.  Visually, it
makes "Titanic" look like a home movie (and considering I saw "Titanic" five
times because of its visuals, that should tell you something).  Particularly
impressive is the scene in which we see the leopard for the first time:
darkness.  Then, a pair of glowing green eyes pierce the gloom.  Gradually,
the leopard comes into view... but it looks as though the director is not
so much lighting the set as removing the darkness.  Finally, we get our
first look at the entire creature.  We won't soon forget it.
        The music is also wonderful.  Composed by Jose' Nieto (whose name
I'd never heard before), it features some lovely orchestral work highlighted
by Egyptian instruments.  Best of all, Celine Dion is noticeably absent.
I'll be buying this soundtrack.
        The climax of the film is disturbing, but not unexpected.  Still,
it appears with a suddenness that's a little disorienting.  The movie just
ends, as though the production suddenly realised they didn't have enough
money to buy more film and had to wrap everything up quickly.
        The performance of Ben Daniels in the role of Augustin is admirable.
He conveys all the emotions we'd expect his character to be feeling, and
never seems to be uncomfortable with the material.  We always believe his
sincerity, even as we question his sanity.  (Yes, that's a complement.)
I'd like to see more of his work in the future.
        Truth be told, I found the audience's response just as interesting
as the film itself.  Startled gasps and muffled giggles floated around the
surprisingly crowded theater for much of the screening.  The woman sitting
in front of me stormed out after only an hour and didn't return, but a lady
sitting towards the back wept loudly during the end credits.  And as the
audience filed out, I noticed at least a dozen people wearing expressions
similar to my own-- expressions that said, quite simply, "Did I really see
that?  Is this a joke?"
        This comparison will probably raise a few eyebrows, but "Passion
in the Desert" reminded me of "Dances with Wolves" in many ways.  Both films
are set in the past, and follow the story of a military officer separated
from the rest of his group.  Both characters befriend an animal, are
forever changed by what happens to them, and are reluctant to return to
their former way of life when the time comes.  In all honesty, I think I
liked "Passion" better.
        This film isn't a must-see, but it's not the worst film out there,
either.  The potentially disturbing story is countered by excellent acting,
music, and cinematography.  But be warned: there's quite a lot of violence,
blood, and some full-frontal male nudity.  Leave the kids at home.
This review was written: July 19, 1998
Copyright (c) 1998 by Joe Barlow.  This review may be freely distributed as
long as ABSOLUTELY NO CHANGES are made and this disclaimer remains attached.
It may not be reproduced for profit without the written consent of the
author.  If you have comments or questions, please send them to: jbarlow
at earthling dot net (substituting the appropriate symbols, to discourage
spam).
-----
  "Average Joe" Barlow * MiSTie #73097 * Writer/musician/aspiring filmmaker
       jbarlow@YOURearthling.PANTSnet http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow
              {Remove YOUR PANTS to e-mail me.}        
